Hullo, young Harding!
You're early.
Yes, I had finished up. It was too late to start anything fresh.
What's all this fuss about in the papers tonight, Mr. Cabal?
- Wars and rumours of wars.
- Crying wolf?
Some day the wolf will come.
These fools are capable of anything.
- In that case, what happens to medical research? - It has to stop.
- That will mess me up.
- Mess you up. Mess everything up.
My God, if war gets loose again...
Merry Christmas, everyone!
'While shepherds watched their flocks by night,
All seated on the ground...'
What's the matter with you fellows?
Oh, that. This little upset across the water doesn't mean anything.
Threatened men live long, and threatened wars never occur.
Another speech by him.
I tell you there's nothing in it.
It's just to buck people up over the air estimates.
Now why meet wars half-way? Why not look at the bright side of things?
You're all right, your business is going up, you've got a jolly wife, a pretty home.
All's right with the world, eh?
- All's right with the world.
- Certainly!
Passworthy, you should have been called Pippa Passworthy...
And Cabal, you've been smoking too much.
You're not - you're not eupeptic...
Oh, come on, it's Christmas.
'No-el! No-el!'
'No-el! No-el!'
'Born is the King of Israel.'
Nice toys they have nowadays, nice toys.
The toys we had were simpler.
Ever so much simpler.
Noah's Arks and wooden soldiers.
Nothing complex like these.
You know, I wonder sometimes if perhaps all these new toys aren't a bit too much for them.
It teaches them to use their hands.
And I suppose their grandchildren will see even more wonderful things.
Progress - progress -
I'd like to see - the wonders they'll see.
Don't be too sure of progress.
Oh, listen to the incurable pessimist.
What's to stop progress nowadays?
War!
Firstly, there isn't going to be a war, and secondly, war doesn't stop progress.
It stimulates progress.
Yes, war can be a highly stimulating thing.
But you can overdo a stimulant.
Oh, well, after all, aren't we exaggerating the horrors of war?
Don't we rather overdo that song?
After all, you know, the last war wasn't as bad as some people make out.
We didn't worry. Something great seemed to have got hold of us.
Something greater still may get hold of us next time.
If we don't end war - war will end us.
Well, what can you do?
Yes, what can we do?
Peace on earth,
Goodwill to all men.
A real old-fashioned
Christmas this year.
Fresh, a little snow, with a nip in the air.
What was that?
It sounded like a gun.
No guns here.
Merry Christmas, Cabal - here's to another good year for all of us.
Another year of recovery, eh?
What are searchlights doing now?
Yes.
Anti-aircraft man艙uvres, I expect.
Well, it must be - anti-aircraft man艙uvres.
Man艙uvres at Christmas?
No!
Listen.
Guns again.
Yes? Cabal speaking.
The Hilltown air base at three?
I'll be there.
- Mobilisation!
- Oh God!
Perhaps it's only a precautionary mobilisation.
The unknown aircraft passed over Seabeach and dropped bombs within a few hundred yards of the waterworks.
They then turned seaward again.
By this time they had been picked up by the searchlights of the battleship Dinosaur.
Before they could mount out of range, she had opened upon them with her anti-aircraft guns.
Unfortunately without result.
- Of course everyone has said
'This time they'll start without any declaration of war.' - Oh, listen!
We do not yet know the nationality of these aircraft, though of course there can be little doubt of their place of origin.
But before all things it is necessary for the country to keep calm.
No doubt the losses suffered by the fleet are serious.
- What? Losses of the fleet?
- Listen! Listen!
And it is imperative that the whole nation should at once stand to arms.
Orders for a general mobilisation have been issued and the precautionary civilian organisation against gas will at once be put into operation.
Ah - instructions have just come to hand.
We shall cut off for five minutes and then read you the general instructions.
Please call in all your friends.
Call in everyone you can.
You've got your stimulant, Passworthy.
Something great has got you.
War has come.
War has broken out suddenly.
There may be an air raid, but it is not likely to be a very serious one.
You must be prepared for it.
The danger will not be great.
As soon as the danger is over, bugles will sound 'all clear'.
The streets will be dangerous.
Do not assemble in crowds.
Keep indoors. Go home.
Those who are far from home, can take refuge in the underground railways.
Go home. Go home. Go home.
Get out of the squares.
Get out of the streets.
Go home and stay calm.
Turn out all the lights.
Close all the windows.
Put a wet sheet or a wet blanket over doors and windows.
My dear, my dear, are you sorry we - had these children?
No. Life must carry on.
Why should we surrender life to the brutes and fools?
I loved you.
I wanted to serve you and make life happy for you.
But think of the things that may happen to them.
- Were we selfish?
- You weren't afraid to bear them -
We were children yesterday.
We are anxious, but we are not afraid.
Really.
Courage, my dear.
And may that little heart have courage.
Are you an officer, daddy?
Well, you've got to do our bit, you know, sonny. Got to do our bit.
I'm an officer too, daddy.
That's the spirit.
Carry on, sir. Carry on.
Goodbye, son.
Quick march!
An air raid is approaching Everytown.
An air raid is approaching Everytown.
Gas masks are being distributed.
Give them to those directly behind of you.
Get to cover.
Get under cover at once.
... but our anti-aircraft gunners will speedily dispose of them.
Bad shape, eh?
Why has it come to this?
God, why do we have to murder each other?
Go, my friend. That is my gas.
It's a bad gas.
Funny even if I'm killed by my own poison.
Quick, get this on.
Here - get this on, quickly.
Give it to her.
I've given plenty to others - why should I not have some myself?
Give it to her.
I'm done!
Breathe in and out.
I dropped the gas on her.
Maybe I've killed her father and mother.
Maybe I've killed her whole family.
And then I go and give up my mask to save her.
That's funny.
That - that's a joke!
Look! He's carrying infection!
Iodine, please.
Mary, iodine.
No more left, Father.
This is the last drop.
God!
What is the use of trying to save this mad world from its punishment?
Oh, Father, if only you could get some sleep.
How can I sleep?
See how they wander out to die.
Why don't you shoot them?!
It's their lives or ours!
Let's get guards, make a cordon.
That's how they dealt with their pestilence in the Dark Ages.
- Richard!
- My sister...
Gordon! How do you know?
Her heart beats fast, and she feels faint, and - she won't answer.
What can I do for her? I thought something might be known.
Oh Janet! - and you, you poor dear -
- Richard...
- I might be infected.
Is there nothing to make her comfortable?
Nothing.
There is nothing will make anyone comfortable any more.
No! Don't shoot!
Shoot, I tell you!
Shoot!
That's the way to do it!
Shoot 'em!
Mayday 1970
The Pestilence has ceased.
Thanks to the determined action of our Chief in shooting all wanderers there have been no cases for two months.
The Pestilence has been conquered.
The Chief is preparing to resume hostilities against the Hill People with the utmost vigour.
Soon we shall have Victory and Peace.
All is well - God save the Chief.
God save our Land.
- Have we any more insulated wire?
- We've got no rubbered wire at all, sir.
- Any rubber - tape?
- There's not a scrap left in the place.
We used the last on the other motor.
Oh, what's the use - there's no petrol anyway.
I don't believe there's three gallons of petrol left in this accursed ruin of a town.
What's the good of setting me at a job like this?
Nothing will ever fly again.
Flying is over.
Everything is over.
Civilisation is dead.
Hello.
- It's a Rolls, isn't it? - Yes - it's a good pre-Pestilence machine.
I oil it and turn it over at times.
You think it'll go fast some day? Still?
Oh, I'm not one of your petrol hoarders.
But all the same that engine turns over still.
Why, I remember when I was a lad - when it was new - we thought nothing of going a hundred miles in it - a whole hundred miles. Less than three hours I've done it in.
But all that sort of thing is all gone now - gone for ever! Eh?
- 'Fraid so.
- Richard! - What is it?
- You won't think me mad?
- Why, darling? - I thought
I heard an aeroplane this morning.
At dawn. I thought it was a dream, but -
Nonsense.
I tell you flying is finished.
We shall never get in the air again. Never.
Hey, come on. The Boss.
- Look, the Boss!
- The Boss is coming!
Long live the Boss!
- Anything to report, Gordon?
- Nothing very hopeful, Chief.
I must have those aeroplanes - somehow.
I'll do what I can, but you can't fly without petrol.
I'll get petrol for you, trust me.
You look after the machines.
I know you haven't got stuff - but you can get round that.
For example, transfer parts.
Use bits of one to mend the other.
Be resourceful.
Give me only ten machines in working order. Give me only five.
I don't want them all.
Then we can end this war of ours - forever.
I'll see you get your reward.
This your wife, Gordon?
You keep her well hidden.
Salutation, lady!
You must use your influence with our Master Mechanic.
The combatant State wants his service.
I'm sure my husband does his best for you.
That's hardly enough, lady.
The combatant State demands miracles.
Not everyone can work miracles as you do, Chief.
Oh, I'm sure you could work miracles if you tried, lady.
Rudolf!
Lady, lady, I showed it to you, but you said you didn't want it.
If Wadsky has been up to his tricks again, he'll have to answer for them.
But he has been keeping things back from me again!
It isn't only Wadsky who keeps things back. What do you think of our Master Mechanic here - the one who won't let me have those planes of mine to end this war of ours with the Hill Men.
Well, can't you make him?
I thought you could make everybody do everything.
Some things you can't do, Madam.
You can't fly without petrol.
You can't mend machines without tools or material.
We've gone back too far. Flying has become a lost skill in Everytown.
- And are you really as stupid as that?
- I'm as helpless as that.
- And now Chief - what are you going to do about it? - He's going to let me have those machines and I'm going to let him have coal - stuff to make oil.
It's a lost skill.
It is a dream of the -
There it is - you were right - a plane once more!
Look! There he is!
He's shutting off - he's coming down.
What's the meaning of this?
Have they got aeroplanes before us?
And you tell me we couldn't fly any more!
While we have been fumbling, they have been active.
Here, some of you, you, and you, find out who this is and what it means!
There's only one man in it.
Hold him.
Somewhere they can still make new machines.
I didn't dream it was still possible.
Yes, but who is the man?
How did he dare come here?
Fetch him to the Town Hall. Guard his machine and bring him to me there.
Come along, Mary.
I must see that machine.
Who's in control of this part of the country?
The Chief. What we call the Boss.
Good. I want to see him!
He sent me to arrest you.
You can't do that.
- But I'll come and see him.
- Well, you're under arrest - whether you'll admit it or not.
The country is in a state at war.
Well, come along. I know the way.
I remember this place well.
I used to live over there for years.
- Ever heard of a man named Passworthy? - No!
- Harding?
- Yes! Doctor Harding!
Look, here he comes now!
So you're Harding.
I seem to remember - something about you.
You were a young man.
You are John Cabal!
I remember you!
I used to visit your house!
Here!
Endless years ago.
Before the wars.
You're still flying?!
Your hair is grey but you look young enough!
How are things here?
Who's in control in this place?
We have a chief - a war lord.
The usual thing. I want to look after your war lord.
Where can we go and talk?
My laboratory is the best thing.
It's just over here.
Right.
Here! You can't go in there.
You're under arrest. You've got to go with me to the chief.
All in good time.
I will see this gentleman first.
Well, you've got to go with me.
Orders are orders. The Boss first.
Where is this man?
Why isn't he brought here?
- He has gone off with Doctor Harding.
- He has to be brought here.
I must deal with him.
Here, you can't go to him.
That's impossible. He must come to you.
Send another man for him. Send three men.
He's got to be brought here.
So that's the sort of man your Boss is.
Not an unusual type.
Everywhere we find these little semi- military upstarts robbing and fighting.
That's what endless warfare has led to - brigandage.
What else could happen?
But we, who are all that are left of the old engineers and mechanics, have pledged ourselves to salvage the world.
We have the air-ways, what is left of them, we have the seas.
And we have ideas in common; the brotherhood of efficiency - the freemasonry of science.
We're the last trustees of civilisation when everything else has failed.
I've been waiting for this.
I'm yours to command.
Not mine. Not mine. No more bosses.
Civilisation's to command.
Tell him he's got to come.
If he won't come on foot, well, we'll have to carry him.
I don't know what will happen to me, sir, if you do not come.
Well, what do you want to see me about?
Who are you? Do you know this country's at war?
At war? Still at it, eh?
- We must clean that up.
- What do you mean
'We must clean that up'?
War is war. Who are you, I said?
The law.
Law and sanity.
I am the law here.
I said law and sanity.
Where do you come from?
Who are you?
Wings over the World.
Well, you know, you can't come into a country like this in this fashion.
I'm here.
Do you mind if I sit down?
And now for the fourth time: who are you?
- I tell you - Wings over the World.
- That's nothing. What Government are you under? - Commonsense.
I belong to World Communications.
We just run ourselves.
You'll run into trouble if you try and land here in war time.
- What's the game?
- Order and trade -
Trade, eh? Can you do anything in munitions?
- Not our line of business.
- Fuel - spare parts?
We've got planes - we've got planes -
I've got boys that have trained a bit on the ground.
- But we've got no fuel. It hampers us.
We might do a deal. - We might.
I know where I can get some fuel.
I've got my plans. Later.
But if you could manage a temporary accommodation - we'd do business.
World Communications helps no one to make war.
End war, end war.
I want to make victorious peace.
I seem to have heard that phrase before.
When I was a young man.
But it made no end of war.
Now look here, Mr. Aviator.
Let's see how we stand.
Come down to actuality.
The way you swagger, you don't seem to realize you are under arrest.
You and your machine.
You'll find other planes looking for me - if I happen to be delayed.
We'll deal with them later.
You can start a trading agency here if you like. I've no objection.
The first thing we shall want is to get our planes in the air again.
Why, a laudable ambition.
But our new order has an objection to private aeroplanes.
- The impudence! - I am not talking about private aeroplanes.
Our aeroplanes are public aeroplanes.
This is an independent sovereign State. At war.
I know nothing about any old order.
I am the Chief here, and I am not taking any orders - old or new, from you.
- I suppose I've walked into trouble.
- Yeah, you can take that as right.
Where do you come from?
I flew from our headquarters at Basra this morning.
We have some hundreds of new-type planes and we're building more, fast.
The factories are working again.
We're gradually restoring order and trade in the whole Mediterranean area.
We're scouting this region now to see how things are.
You've found out.
This is an independent sovereign State.
- Yes, we must talk about that.
- We don't discuss it.
We don't approve of independent sovereign States.
- You don't approve.
- We mean to stop them.
- That's war.
- If you will.
Well, I think we know how we stand.
Burton, take this man.
If he gives you any trouble, club him.
You hear that, Mr. Wings over your Wits?
My friends know my whereabouts.
If I don't come back, they'll send a force to find me.
Perhaps they won't find you.
- They'll find you.
- They'll find me ready.
Take him to the detention room downstairs.
- Now was that wise?
- Wise!
Yes, wise; to quarrel with him at once?
Quarrel with him! Confound him, he began to quarrel with me!
'We must clean that up!' -
Clean that up! My war!
- There's things behind him.
- Things behind him!
Some sort of aerial bus driver.
Standing up to me - like an equal.
So you lost your temper and you bullied him.
I don't bully. I just handle the men.
He's the first real aviator that has come this way for years.
Think of what that means, my dear!
You want aeroplanes, don't you?
You want your aeroplanes put in order?
A really clever man would have had some of those machines up long ago.
- I'm sure of it.
- So along comes this stranger who is going to clean me up.
And you expect me to hand my planes over to him, lock, stock and barrel.
- Why talk nonsense? You could have persuaded him - under supervision.
- Supervision.
The sort of oafs I've got here to supervise him.
He'd be too much for them.
Oh, well, of course, if he's gonna be too much for you, why don't you hang him and hide his machine before the others are after you?
I don't agree with you.
I don't agree with you.
Now this stranger hasn't taken me by surprise.
I knew he was coming.
Yes, I knew he was coming.
I felt this conspiracy of air bus drivers brewing somewhere in the world.
I felt they were getting ahead with their aeroplanes down there somewhere.
Very well. Now is our chance.
We've got this fellow bottled up.
They won't even begin to miss him for days.
I've got everything fixed up now for an attack straight away on the Floss Valley to the old coal and shale pits - where there's oil too!
Then - up we buzz.
Victory approaches. Your sacrifices have not been in vain.
Our long struggle with the Hill Men has come to its climax.
Our new victory at the coal pits has brought a great supply of oil within our reach.
Once more we may hope to take the air and look our invaders in the face.
We've forty aeroplanes, as large a force, I venture to say, as any in the world.
This new oil can be adapted to our needs.
That's quite a simple business.
Nothing remains but a conclusive bombing of the hills.
Then for a time we can hope for a rich, rewarding peace, the peace of the strong man armed who keepeth his house (Luke 11, 21).
And now at this supreme crisis you, Gordon, our master mechanic, refuse your help.
- Where are my planes? - The job's more difficult than you think.
Half your machines are hopelessly old.
You haven't twenty sound ones.
To be exact, nineteen. You'll never get the others off the ground.
The thing can't be done as you imagine it. I want assistance.
- What assistance?
- Your prisoner.
Why, you want that chap in black, that - Wings over the World?
You want him released?
He knows his business.
I don't enough.
- Make him my technical adviser.
- I don't trust you technical chaps.
- Then you won't get an aeroplane up.
- I want those planes.
- What if you get him?
- Then I want Doctor Harding out too.
- They're old associates.
- I can't help that.
If anybody in Everytown can adapt that crude oil for our aeroplanes, it's Harding.
- If not, it can't be done.
- We've had a bit of an argument with Harding.
He's the only man who can do this work for you.
Get him.
Undo his hands.
Well?
- Well, what?
- The salute.
Damn the salute.
Never mind the salute now.
We'll talk about that later.
Now look here, let's see how we stand.
You, Gordon, are to undertake the reconstruction of our air force.
The prisoner Cabal is to be placed at your disposal.
Everywhere he goes he is to be under guard and observation.
No relaxing on that.
Neither you nor him to go within a hundred yards of his aeroplane. Mind that!
Now you, Harding, will assist
Gordon with this fuel problem and place your knowledge of poison gas at our disposal.
I'll have nothing to do with poison gas.
You've got the knowledge - if I have to wring it out of you.
The State's your mother and your father, the totality of your interests.
No discipline can be too severe for the man that denies that by word or deed.
Nonsense.
We have our duty to civilisation.
You and your sort are driving us straight back to eternal barbarism.
- But this is pure treason. - I protest against being dragged away from my work.
Confound your silly war!
Your war material and all the rest of it!
All my life has been interrupted and wasted and spoilt by war.
- I will not stand it any longer.
- This is Treason - Treason.
- No, no, no. Stop that.
- We have need of your service.
- Well, what do you want?
- You are conscripted.
You're under my orders now and under no other orders in the world.
I am master here!
I am the State.
I need fuel and gas.
Neither fuel nor gas.
- You refuse?
- Absolutely.
I do not want to be forced to extremities.
May I have a word?
I understand you want all of those out-of-date crocks of yours which you call your air force, to fly again - and fly well?
- They shall.
With the help of that man -
Cabal - you have in the cells, and Doctor Harding here - you may even have a dozen of your planes in the air again.
You!
You're a traitor to civilisation.
I won't touch it.
If you will give me your Cabal, if you leave me free to talk with Harding,
I promise you you'll see your air force - a third of it at any rate - in the sky again.
You talk as if you are driving a bargain with me.
I am sorry, Chief.
It is not I who make these conditions.
This is the nature of things.
You cannot have technical services, you cannot have scientific help without treating the men who give it you - properly.
That's what I've said all along!
You're bullying too hard, my dear.
There's a limit to bullying.
Why! you can't make a dog hunt by beating it.
I want those planes.
I wanted to look at you.
I'm at your service, Madam.
You're the most interesting thing that has happened in Everytown for years.
- You honour me.
- You come from - outside.
I'd begun to forget there was anything outside.
- I want to hear about it.
- May I offer you my only chair?
You know - I am not a stupid woman.
- I am sure.
- This life here - is limited.
War always going on and never ending.
Flags. Marching.
Oh, I adore the Chief.
I've always adored him since he took control in the Pestilence Days when everyone else lost heart.
He rules. He is firm.
Everyone - every woman finds him strong and attractive.
I can't complain.
I have everything that is to be had here.
And yet -
This is a small limited world we live in.
You bring in the breath of something greater.
When I saw you swooping down out of the air - when I saw you marching into the Town Hall -
I felt: this man lives in a greater world.
And you spoke of the Mediterranean and the East, of your camps and factories.
I've read about the Mediterranean and Egypt and Greece and India.
I can read - a lot of those old books.
I'm not like most of the younger people here.
I learnt a lot before education stopped and the schools closed down.
I want to see that world.
Skies, snowy mountains, blue seas, sunshine, palms.
If I had my way - you could fly to all that in a couple of hours.
If you were free...
And if I was free.
I don't suppose any man has ever understood any woman since the beginning of things.
You don't understand our imaginations.
How wild our imaginations can be.
I wish I were a man.
Oh, if I were a man!...
What are you people trying to do to us?
What are you going to do to this Boss of mine?
The immediate question seems what does he mean to do to me?
Something violent and foolish - unless I prevent it.
That's how I see things.
And if he kills you -?
We shall come here and clean things up.
But if you're killed - how can you say we?
We go on. That's how things are, we are taking hold of things.
In science and government - in the long run - no man is indispensable.
The human things go on.
We - for ever.
I see. And this war-like
State of ours here?
It has to vanish. Like the Tyrannosaurus and the sabre-toothed tiger.
Ah, so here you are!
I said I should talk to him, and I have.
I told you to leave that fellow alone.
Yes, and sat up there drinking and swaggering and looking as proud as you could.
Rudolf the Victorious!
And here am I trying to find out what this black invader means.
Do you think I wanted to come and talk to him - this grey cold man?
While you are swaggering here, there are more planes away there at Basra getting ready.
- Basra? - His headquarters.
Have you never heard of Basra?
These are matters for us to talk about.
This lady has been putting me through a severe cross-examination.
But the gist of it is - that away there in Basra new aeroplanes are rising night and day like hornets round a hornets' nest.
What happens to me, is a small affair.
They'll finish you.
The new world of united airmen will finish you.
Listen! You can almost hear them coming now.
- Not a bit of it!
- What he says is the truth.
- What he says is bluff. - Make peace with the airmen and let him go.
That means surrender of our sovereign independence.
But more machines will be coming, and more and more.
And he's here - hostage for their good behaviour.
Come, Madam. Enough of this little - diplomatic mission of yours.
You've got the subtlety of a - bullfrog.
Yes. I don't know what she has been saying to you.
I don't much care.
There's no making peace between you and me.
It's your world or mine, and it's going to be mine.
Roll your threats of - swarms of hornets and so on -
You're a hostage. Remeber that.
And don't be too sure you'll win.
So just sit here and think that over,
Mr. Wings over the World.
Now get round to the other side and look at these engine barrel bracings, quickly.
If I could get to my plane.
There's a wireless there.
- Hopeless... They won't even trust me.
- We shall have to make a job of this.
- I could manage to get your reserve petrol. They'll let me have that for this plane. - Good.
It won't be easy to make a get-away.
These oil pump connections aren't very good.
We will have to risk it.
- I think we'll manage it all right now that Harding knows his part of the job. - Good.
Look! It's your Gordon, he's flying at last.
Look! An aeroplane out of the box, boys!
It's pre-war!
- Where do you come from?
- I come from the north, sir, from Everytown.
- He says Cabal is a prisoner.
- They've got him, sir. He's in danger.
- I had great difficulty getting here.
- You say Cabal is in danger?
A very grave danger.
The Boss there is a violent tough.
- A job for our new squadron.
- Now we've got a chance to try the new Gas of Peace on somebody.
There's no time to lose.
Am I to report to Headquarters?
Yes. Take him to the Council.
- At last we have definite news.
- What is it?
Gordon didn't fall into the sea.
He got away.
A fishing boat saw him making for the French coast.
- Perhaps he reached his pals. - Well?
- Well, he'll be coming back.
He'll be bringing the others with him.
Curse these World Communications.
Curse all airmen and gas men and machine men!
Why didn't we leave their machines and their sciences alone?
I might have known.
Why did I tamper with flying?
Well, we needed aeroplanes - against the Hill State.
Somebody else would have started in again with aeroplanes and gas and bombs if we hadn't. These people would have come interfering anyhow.
Why was all this science ever allowed?
Why was it ever let begin?
Science! - it's the enemy of everything that's natural in life.
I dreamt of those fellows last night.
Great ugly black inhuman chaps.
Half like machines.
- Bombing and bombing.
- Yes, I guess they'll come bombing, all right.
Then we'll fight 'em. Since
Gordon got away I've had those air boys up to see me.
They've got guts.
They'll do something still.
We'll fight 'em. We'll fight 'em.
Huh! We've got hostages...
I'm glad now we haven't shot them anyway.
There's that chap Harding...
Of course! He can tell us what to do against this gas.
If I have to pull his arm off and knock his teeth down his throat.
- Get him - get him.
- Get Doctor Harding!
They have to come to earth sometime.
What is this World Communications?
A handful of men like ourselves.
They're not magic.
To you I entrust these good, tried, tested machines.
You are not mechanics - you are warriors.
You have been trained not to think, but to do - maybe - to die.
I salute you -
I, your Chief.
What do you know about these
World Communications people?
Have they gas? What sort of gas?
- I know nothing about gas.
- Tell us about these masks, anyway.
They're rotten!
They're no good at all.
What sort of gas have they got?
I tell you gas isn't my business.
Well, they can't gas us when you are here anyway.
Here they are. Listen.
They're coming already!
We're there.
Tell them to stand by.
Clumsy great things! Our boys will have them down in no time.
They're too clumsy.
What! - only six of us up.
Where are the rest of our fellows?
Go on - up at him.
- Poor boy - it's got him.
- They're both coming down. Cowards!
But they can't use gas - when we have hostages.
The hostages!
I'm not done yet.
Go on, fetch them, bring them out here out in the open.
Tie 'em up where they can be seen.
Where's the other fellow?
He's the Prize Hostage.
He's the best of the lot.
They'll know him.
Fetch him - fetch him...
Look!
Is that gas?
You won't get out of this.
- You?
- Don't you see we're beaten?
Shoot them - what are you all doing - why don't you move?
I never did you any harm.
I saved your father and I saved you.
Couldn't you call up to your man there - to stop this...
I won't have it like this.
What's happening?
Everything's swimming.
Shoot. Shoot.
We've never shot enough yet.
We've never shot enough.
We spared them.
Now they've got us.
Our world or theirs.
Why should I be beaten like this?
Shoot! Shoot!
Shoot! Shoot!
There they are!
Mary!
Mary is not hurt.
She's asleep like the others.
Cabal's safe!
- Cabal!
- Well done, Gordon!
Well, they laughed at me for sticking to my gas mask.
But thanks to that I'm here and everyone else is sleeping.
- I wonder if they'll ever use gas masks again. - Sir!
What is it?
This man's not sleeping.
He's dead.
Dead and his world dead with him.
And a new world beginning.
Poor old Boss here, and his flags and his follies.
And now for the rule of the Airmen and a new life for mankind.
Our job is only beginning.
For now we have to put the world in order.
It'll be a long and complicated struggle.
But we have the unity of a common order and a common knowledge.
This is how I conceive our plan of operations.
First a round-up of brigands, that last dismal vestige of ancient predatory soldiers, the last would-be conquerors.
Then settle, organise, advance.
This zone, then that.
And at last Wings over the World and the new world begins.
Do you realise the immense task we shall undertake when we set ourselves to an active and aggressive peace, when we direct our energies to tear out the wealth of this planet and exploit all these giant possibilities of science that have been squandered hitherto upon war and senseless competition?
We shall excavate the eternal hills.
We shall make such use of the treasures of sky and sea and earth as men have never dreamt of hitherto.
I would that I could see our childrens' children in this world we shall win for them!
But in them and through them we shall live again.
Is it a better world than it used to be?
I rebel against this Progress.
What have this Progress and this world civilisation done for us?
Machines and marbles.
They've built this great city of theirs - yes.
They've prolonged life - yes.
They've conquered nature, they say, and made a great quiet world.
Is it any jollier than the world used to be in the good old days when life was short and hot and merry, and the devil took the hindmost?
- All the same, what can we do about it? - Rebel.
- And rebel now, now. Now is the time.
- Why now in particular?
Why, because of this Space Gun business.
Because of this project to shoot human beings at the stars.
People don't like it, shooting humans away to hard, frozen darkness.
They're murmuring.
They've murmured before, and nothing came of it.
Because they had no leader.
But now, suppose someone cried,
'Halt!
Stop this Progress!'
Suppose I shouted to the world,
'Make an end to this Progress!'
I could talk, talk.
Radio is everywhere.
This modern world is full of voices.
I'm a master craftsman,
I have the right to talk.
Yes, but will they listen to you?
They'll listen, trust them.
If I shout,
'Arise! Awake!
Stop this Progress before it is too late!'
- I like these History Lessons.
- Uh-uh.
What a funny place New York was - all sticking up and full of windows.
- They built houses like that in the old days. - Why?
They had no light inside their cities as we have.
So they had to stick them up into the daylight - what there was of it.
They had no properly mixed and conditioned air.
Everybody lived half out of doors.
They had windows of brittle glass.
The Age of Windows lasted four centuries.
They never seemed to realise that we could light the interiors of our houses with sunshine of our own, so there was no need to stick them up ever so high into the air.
They keep on inventing new things now, don't they?
And making life lovelier and lovelier?
Lovelier - yes... And bolder...
I suppose I'm an old man, my dear, but some of it seems like going too far.
This Space Gun of theirs that they keep on shooting.
What is this Space Gun, great-grandfather?
Well, it's a gun they discharge by electricity - it's a lot of guns inside one another - and each one discharges the gun next inside. I don't properly understand it.
But the cylinder it shoots out last, goes - swish - right away from the earth.
I wish I could fly round the moon.
Well, that in time. Won't you come back to your history pictures again?
I'm glad I didn't live in the old world.
I know that John Cabal and his airmen tidied it all up.
Did you see John Cabal, great-grand-dad?
Oh, you can see him in your pictures.
But you saw him when he lived, you really saw him?
Yes. I saw the great John Cabal with my own eyes when I was a little boy.
He was a lean brown old man with hair as white as mine.
He was the great-grandfather of our Oswald Cabal, the President of our Council.
I take it the Space Gun's passed all its preliminary trials and there's nothing left now but to choose the two who are to go.
That's going to be the trouble.
Thousands of young people have been applying - young men and young women.
I never dreamt the moon was so attractive.
Practically the Gun's perfect now.
There are risks but reasonable risks.
And the position of the moon in the next three or four months gives us the best conditions for getting there.
It's only the choice of the two now that matters.
- Well? - There are going to be difficulties.
That man Theotocopulos is talking on the radio about it.
He's a fantastic fellow.
Yes, but he is making trouble.
It's not going to be easy to choose these young people.
With all these thousands offering themselves?
We've looked into thousands of cases.
We have rejected everyone of imperfect health.
Or anyone who had friends who objected.
And the fact is, we want you to talk to two people.
There is Raymond Passworthy of General Fabrics.
- You know him? - Yes, I know him.
- And his son.
We want you to see the son -
Maurice Passworthy.
- Why?
- He asks to go.
We think you ought to see him.
He is waiting here.
Is Maurice Passworthy there?
- He's on his way.
- Good.
- You want to talk with me?
- Forgive me, Sir.
I came straight to you.
- You're asking a favour?
- A very big favour.
I want to be one of the first two human beings to go round the moon.
It means danger.
Great hardship anyhow.
You realise there's an even chance of never coming back alive.
A still greater chance of coming back a cripple.
Give me credit for not minding that, Sir.
Yes, a lot of you young people don't mind that.
But why should I give a favour?
Well, I'm the son of a friend of yours.
- People seem to feel you oughtn't to send some one you do not know, Sir -
- Go on.
We've talked about this over and over again
- We? - Yes, both of us. It's her idea even more than it's mine.
Her idea? Who is she?
Some one much closer to you than I am, Sir.
- Go on.
- It's Catherine - your daughter.
She says you can't possibly send anyone's child but your own.
I might have known.
We are going to put it forward plainly.
Is this thing to go on, or are we sane and normal human beings to put an end to it and an end to all such follies forever?
What is this Progress?
What is the good of all this
Progress? Onward and onward.
We demand a halt, we demand a rest.
The object of life is happy living.
We will not have human lives sacrificed to experiment.
Progress is not living, it should only be the preparation for living.
They stage the old Greek tragedy again and a father offers up his daughter to his evil gods.
And that voice is sounding to the whole world.
I might suppress it. No.
They'll have to hear him, and make what they can of him.
What does this Space Gun portend?
Make no mistake about it!
The slaveries they put upon themselves to-day they will impose to-morrow upon the whole world.
Is man never to rest, never to be free?
A time will come when you in your turn will be forced away to take your chance upon strange planets and in dreary, abominable places beyond the stars.
An end to Progress.
Make an end to this Progress now.
Let this be the last day of the Scientific Age.
Make the Space Gun the symbol of all that drives us and destroy it!
Now!
I wonder what they will make of him?
All very well for you, Cabal.
You are the great-grandson of John
Cabal, the air dictator - the man who changed the whole course of the world.
You've got experiment in your blood.
You - and your daughter!
But I'm - I'm more normal.
I don't believe my boy would have thought of it.
- The two of them must have got together.
- They will come back together.
This time there is no attempt to land on the moon.
When -  when is this - great experiment to be made? How much longer have we got before they go?
- When the Space Gun is ready.
- Some time this year, you mean? - Soon.
Then is there no way of saving our children from this madness?
But would it be saving our children?
Oh, here they are.
- Father, we're to go?
- Yes, you're to go.
- It's announced?
- Two hours ago.
Your speech has struck fire.
All the people are excited and angry.
Some are already going out of the city towards the Space Gun.
Nothing is wanted now but leading.
We must go right on with this.
To the Space Gun!
And so we end an age.
Young people. Just beginning life.
And you want to go into that outer horror!
Why don't you send somebody who is sick of life?
They want fit young people, alert and quick.
And we are fit young people.
We can observe, and come back and tell.
Cabal! I just want to ask you one plain question.
Why do you let your daughter dream of going on this mad moon journey?
Because I love her. And I want her to live to the best effect.
Dragging out life to the last possible second is not living to the best effect.
The nearer the bone, the sweeter the meat.
The best of life, Passworthy, lies nearest to the edge of death.
I am a broken man.
I don't know where honour lies.
You haven't got things right,
Passworthy.
Our fathers and our fathers' fathers cleaned up the old order of things because it killed children, it killed those who were unprepared for death, because it tormented people in vain, because it outraged human pride and dignity, because it was an ugly spectacle of waste.
But that was only a beginning.
There is nothing wrong in suffering, if you suffer for a purpose.
Our revolution didn't abolish danger or death.
It simply made danger and death worth while.
Cabal!
Cabal! The gun's in urgent danger.
It's a race against time now to save it.
Theotocopulos is out with a crowd of people already.
He is going to the Space Gun now.
They're gonna break it up. They say it's the symbol of your tyranny.
- Have they weapons? - Bars of metal.
They can smash delicate apparatus.
They can do endless mischief.
But you have a traffic control.
Can't they produce a police?
Very few... We've nothing but the Gas of Peace and it isn't ready.
It will take hours yet.
We must hold this crowd back - at any cost - for a time; until the Gas of Peace is ready.
Hear this?
Look!
Cabal, they're rioting.
It's barbarism come back.
- Who are you? - William Jeans, the
Astronomical Department - Space Gun.
Well, we've stopped the air ways.
They'll have to go on foot.
And they'll take an hour or more to get there. Even those who've already started.
That Gun mustn't be broken up. After all the final experiments have all been made!
- When everything was ready!
- When everything was ready.
If they smash up this infernal gun then, honour is satisfied and you needn't go.
- They won't smash the Gun.
- Suppose the Gun was fired now?
- Would the cylinder reach the moon?
- It would miss and fly into outer space.
It is five now. If the gun were fired before seven...
- And... it could be? - Yes.
- Then... - We go now.
No, no, no! I don't know what to say, but - Don't go. Don't go.
But, Father, we must go now, or we may never go.
And then for the rest of our lives we'll feel that we've shirked, and lived in vain...
We must go now.
Quickly! This way!
- If you go up to the platform, we'll guard this below. - Right.
Contract all your muscles when the concussion comes.
In five minutes you'll be able to get loose and move about.
There is the man -
There is the man who would offer up his daughter to the Devil of Science.
What do you want here?
We want to save these young people from your experiments.
We want to put an end to this inhuman foolery.
We mean to destroy that Gun.
We have a right to do what we like with our lives -
- with our sort of lives.
We don't grudge you your artistic life.
You have safety, plenty, all you want.
We want to make the world safe for men.
No one prevents you.
How can we do that when your science and inventions are perpetually changing life for us - when you're everlastingly contriving strange things?
When you make what we think great seem small.
When you make what we think strong seem feeble.
We don't want you in the same world with us.
We don't want this expedition.
We don't want mankind to go out to the moon and to the planets.
We shall hate you more if you succeed than if you fail.
Destroy the Gun!
Before you can even reach the base of the gun, it will be fired.
Beware of the concussion.
Beware of the concussion.
Stand by, Control Room.
Clear all outside observers.
Standing by for fire.
There! There they go!
That faint gleam of light.
- I feel that what we've done is monstrous.
- What they have done is magnificent.
- Will they come back?
- Yes. And go again. And again - till the landing is made and the moon is conquered.
This is only a beginning.
If they don't come back - my son and your daughter?
- What of that, Cabal?
- Then presently others will go.
Oh God! Is there never to be any age of happiness?
Is there never to be any rest?
Rest enough for the individual man.
Too much and too soon, and we call it death.
But for MAN no rest and no ending.
He must go on - conquest beyond conquest.
First this little planet and its winds and ways, and then all the laws of mind and matter that restrain him.
Then the planets about him, and at last out across immensity to the stars.
And when he has conquered all the deeps of space and all the mysteries of time - still he will be beginning.
But we are such little creatures.
Poor Humanity.
So fragile - so weak.
Little - little animals.
Little animals.
And if we're no more than animals - we must snatch each little scrap of happiness and live and suffer and pass, mattering no more than all the other animals do - or have done.
It is this - or that.
All the universe or nothingness...
Which shall it be, Passworthy?
Which shall it be?
Which shall it be?
Which shall it be?
Which shall it be?
- Ain't you afraid?
- Of old Ygor? No.
- I say that I, for one, will not.
- Enough!
He'll be met exactly as arranged.
Now, friends, on his deathbed... the old Baron Frankenstein gave me this chest of papers... to deliver to his son, and deliver it I shall.
Haven't we had enough of that name here?
There was a time when our village was prosperous and happy. Look at it now.
Forsaken, desolate, shunned by every traveller, and why?
Because of these Frankensteins.
We live in the black shadow of that cursed place up on the hill... where only that crazy Ygor, with his broken neck, dares to stay.
And now we go to the railway station to welcome another Frankenstein.
This one is probably just as bad as his father... who created a monster in the devil's own image.
It's in the blood, I tell you.
We've said these same words a thousand times, and they get us nowhere.
Fine talk, Herr Inspector.
But Baron Frankenstein does arrive tonight to claim his heritage.
- And then what?
- Yes, what then?
That's true, but he'll find no friends here.
Nothing but locked doors and darkened windows... locked hearts and bitter hatred.
Let that, too, be a part of the Frankenstein heritage.
Come, gentlemen.
We'll be there soon, darling.
That's good. So I can see Amelia.
That's right. Amelia will be there waiting for you, and so glad to see you.
What strange-looking country.
Not much like America, is it?
On my first trip to Europe,
I was prepared for anything... but I'm glad we went to London and Paris first.
We must be getting close to the village now.
It's exciting, isn't it?
Out there in the darkness, a new life lies before us.
No more college classrooms or faculty meetings.
- I feel rather like an explorer.
- That's what it is.
We're going to explore something so foreign to us... we can't even imagine what it'll be like.
A medieval castle.
I wonder if there's a moat.
And a drawbridge, and a great tall, dark tower.
And battlements.
Perhaps there's a haunted room.
Yes, there's sure to be a haunted room.
The castle itself is supposed to be haunted.
- Because of...
- Yes.
Because of the things my father did there.
I remember the stories Mother used to tell me when I was quite young in England.
It wasn't my father's fault that the being he created... became a senseless, murderous monster.
He was right.
You understand that, don't you, dear?
He was right.
It was the unforeseen blunder of a stupid assistant... that gave his creation the brain of a killer instead of a normal one.
And how my father was made to suffer for that mistake.
His name has become synonymous with horror and monsters.
Why, nine out of ten people... call that misshapen creature of my father's experiments...
Frankenstein.
- Herr Baron Frankenstein?
- Yes.
I will see that madam and the bags are placed in the car.
The Burgomaster's on the platform waiting for you.
Thank you.
- Herr Baron Frankenstein?
- Yes.
I am Burgomaster of the village.
It's a great pleasure to see you,
Herr Burgomaster.
These are the gentlemen of the council.
We come to meet you, not to greet you.
I deliver you these, on the instructions of your late father.
Thank you.
The large box contains certain papers pertaining to the estate.
- The small one, the key that will open it.
- Thank you, I...
It is unfortunate that we cannot offer you a more cheerful welcome.
But we can't.
Herr Burgomaster, gentlemen of the council, villagers.
I quite realise that it was my father's misfortune... to be the unwilling, unknowing cause of tragedy.
I'm so sorry that I don't remember him... because I've been told that he was a good man.
And I know how greatly your tragedy must have weighed upon his mind.
I can't undo the wrongs that you've suffered... but I beg of you, let the dead past remain buried.
My wife and I, and our son... we want so much to be your friends.
There is a car waiting, Herr Baron.
Thank you. Thank you for your courtesy.
- There's my little darling!
- Amelia!
I am glad to see you, Benson.
- Thank you, sir. Should I take this?
- No, just take my coat, will you?
I'm so glad to see you.
Bless you.
What a comfort to find you here.
- Welcome, madam. Good evening, sir.
- Good evening, Amelia.
Peter had better go right to bed.
It's been a long trip.
Come along, darling.
Amelia, are the bedrooms cheery?
Yes, madam, quite cheery.
I think you'll be surprised.
It's medieval.
It's exciting, exhilarating.
You really feel that you belong here already?
Yes, I think I do.
Why? Don't you like it?
It all seems so unreal, but I'm excited, too.
Good night, Daddy!
Daddy, look at me.
I'm way up here on a mountain.
Good night, son.
I'll go and freshen up a bit and see that Peter is put to bed.
I'm terribly glad you're here with me.
Amelia, wait for me.
I don't want to get lost.
Where did you get those other servants?
They look like Tyroleans.
They are. None of the people of this province would serve here... no matter what I offered to pay them.
Strange, superstitious creatures.
- Where's the library, if there is a library?
- Here it is, sir.
I think you're rather like your father, sir.
If only I could have some small portion of his genius.
Think of it, Benson.
Here, in this very study... the luminous facets of his brilliant mind conceived his outstanding theory... of the source of life.
Here, he planned a miracle... and saw it come to pass.
A miracle that the good people of Frankenstein called a monster.
They call it a lot worse than that, sir.
Such stories as I've never heard.
- Would you like a brandy, sir?
- Yes, thank you, Benson.
"My son.
"Herein you will find my faiths, my beliefs, and my unfoldments.
"A complete diary of my experiments, charts, and secret formulas.
"In short, the sum total of my knowledge, such as it is.
"Perhaps you will regard my work with ridicule or even with distaste.
"If so, destroy these records.
"But if you, like me, burn with the irresistible desire...
"to penetrate the unknown, carry on.
"Even though the path is cruel and torturous, carry on.
"Like every seeker after truth...
"you will be hated, blasphemed, and condemned.
"But mayhap where I have failed, you will succeed.
"You have inherited the fortune of the Frankensteins.
"I trust you will not inherit their fate."
To you, sir.
Our Father... help me be a good little boy, and bless Mummy and Daddy. Amen.
Good night, my darling.
I'll close the curtains, madam, so the lightning won't bother him.
Please don't close them,
'cause I like lightning.
He isn't afraid of anything, is he, madam?
His father has taught him never to be afraid, and he isn't.
Do you think he'll be all right here?
Yes, madam. Nothing can happen to him.
I'll leave my door open.
Please do.
Why do you suppose they ever built in these beds in this strange position?
An old superstition.
"If the house is filled with dread, place the beds at head-to-head."
Come on, gentlemen, see!
More bags for Frankenstein.
- Good evening, Inspector.
- Good evening.
- The Baron is in, I know.
- Yes, but...
A policeman.
- Herr Baron Frankenstein?
- Yes.
I am Inspector Krogh of the district police.
I am glad to see you, Inspector.
Benson, take the Inspector's cape.
Yes, sir.
- Won't you come in?
- Thank you.
- Come over and dry out by the fire.
- Thank you.
I've been studying some old papers of my father's.
- Care for a brandy?
- Thank you, no.
I have come here, Herr Baron, to assure you of protection.
- Protection? From whom?
- From a virulent and fatal poison.
Am I to be poisoned, then?
You are poisoned already by your name.
To the best of my knowledge, it has served my family faithfully for over 700 years.
You recommend that I change it to, say, Smith?
I'm afraid that wouldn't help.
You might change your name, but you can't erase the brand. That's indelible.
As long as you continue to live in this place, you're in danger.
You're speaking in riddles, Herr Inspector.
Danger from whom?
The Burgomaster and his inhospitable villagers?
I think I can guarantee to control their animosity, but not their fears.
What are they afraid of, ghosts?
Perhaps.
I'm afraid I don't believe in them. Do you?
When they commit murder, yes.
- You're referring to the monster.
- Perhaps.
My dear Inspector, he was destroyed years ago.
Perhaps.
Can we stick to facts, Inspector?
That my father instilled life into a dead man is perfectly true.
But I'm also convinced that stories of this creature... have been so greatly exaggerated in the telling and the retelling... that the simple folk of this neighbourhood now believe him to have been... the most fiendish monster that ever walked this earth.
Do you honestly know of one criminal act that this poor creature committed?
Did you ever even see him?
The most vivid recollection of my life.
I was but a child at the time, about the age of your own son.
The monster had escaped and was ravaging the countryside... killing, maiming, terrorising.
One night, he burst into our house.
My father took a gun and fired at him... but the savage brute sent him crashing to a corner.
Then he grabbed me by the arm.
One doesn't easily forget, Herr Baron, an arm torn out by the roots.
No, I...
My lifelong ambition was to have been a soldier.
But for this...
I, who command seven gendarmes in a little mountain village... might have been a general.
I wish I could do something to...
- Won't you change your mind for brandy?
- Thank you, Baron.
I apologise if I've aroused your sympathy... but I have found that by explaining my affliction... it ceases to be quite such a curiosity.
You said there have been other murders committed since the destruction of the...
- Of my father's work.
- Yes.
- How do you account for it?
- Well, I can't.
Neither can the special agents imported for the purpose from Scotland Yard... and the Sureté Francaise.
There have been six, all unsolved... and all men of some prominence in the village.
In each case, the autopsy disclosed that death was caused by a violent concussion.
There were no marks on the bodies... except a slight discoloration or bruise at the base of the brain.
But the hearts of all the victims were ruptured.
In fact, they had burst.
Hence the local superstition of the murdering ghost.
Need I add that it is always alluded to as Frankenstein?
Now it's rumoured that you, like your father, are a scientist.
The villagers have seen the strange instruments that preceded you.
That's why I've come to warn you.
Inspector Krogh,
I should indeed seem ungrateful... if I were not to thank you for your interest in my welfare.
But I can assure you
I am not engaged in any black magic... nor in the creation of monsters, however the villagers may think.
Nevertheless, Herr Baron,
I stand ready when you need help.
I shall not need it.
When you need help, you have but to ring the alarm bell in the tower... and I shall hear it wherever I may be and hasten to your assistance.
- Good night, Herr Baron.
- Good night and thank you, Inspector.
Darling, this is Inspector Krogh of the police.
- How do you do?
- Madam.
He called to assure us that he's at our service.
It's very good of you, Inspector.
Perhaps you'll honour us one night soon at dinner.
Madam, I...
I shall be honoured, madam.
Wasn't he odd?
Yes. He said if the villagers bothered us, he'd take a hand.
We seem to be rather undesirable characters.
They'll change their attitude when they get to know us a little better.
What a dreadful storm.
What awful lightning!
It's magnificent.
Nothing in nature is terrifying when one understands it.
Think of it, darling.
My father drew that very lightning from heaven and forced it to his own will... to bring life to a being that he created with his own hands.
Why should we fear anything?
Thank you, Benson.
Well, hello!
Good morning, son.
- Did you have a nice sleep?
- Yes.
- What are you going to do now?
- I'm going out hunting.
- What are you going to get?
- Elephants and tigers.
That's fine. You better come along down here. There's some stairs over there.
You see, it isn't so bad in daylight, is it?
No, but I just hope we don't have any more nights like last night.
It's nights like that that make beautiful mornings like this.
I'm going to look over the estate... and I'm going to take my gun with me, too.
You never can tell what you'll see, can you, Peter?
You might see some rhinoceros or alligators.
What's that, Daddy?
That? That's a boar.
Like Aunt Fanny?
No, Peter, not like Aunt Fanny.
A wild boar.
I hope I don't have teeth like that.
- Why, darling?
- They'd be too hard to clean.
Now you run along with Amelia.
Don't go far.
- Goodbye, Peter.
- Goodbye.
What's that weird-looking structure across the ravine?
That's my father's laboratory.
They blew the roof off when the monster was destroyed.
I can't wait to see inside it.
Sulphur.
Hey, you, come down here!
Come on, hurry up.
Come on, get up.
Why did you try to kill me?
- I thought you came here to kill me.
- That's a fine story.
It's all right for you people to hate me, but attempted murder is another thing.
Who are you?
My name is Ygor.
Let me go, Frankenstein.
- I'm turning you over to Inspector Krogh.
- No!
- Not give me to Krogh.
- Why?
Krogh not want dead man. Ygor is dead.
What are you talking about?
You see that?
They hanged me once, Frankenstein.
They broke my neck.
They said I was dead.
Then they cut me down.
Hanged you?
- Why did they hang you?
- Because I stole bodies...
- they said.
- Yes. Well, what are you doing here?
They threw me in here long ago.
They wouldn't bury me in holy place like churchyard... because I stole bodies, they said.
So Ygor is dead.
You Dr. Frankenstein, like your father?
Yes, but I can't mend a broken neck.
Nobody can mend Ygor's neck.
It's all right.
So you doctor?
Yes, I'm a doctor, amongst other things.
You come with me.
My grandfather.
My father.
Is this what you wanted to show me?
He's alive!
- How long has he been here?
- Long time.
He is my friend.
He does things for me.
- Has he always been here?
- Nearly always.
This is place of the dead.
We're all dead here.
- But he's not dead.
- No, not dead.
Asleep.
Sick.
He has been so many months.
What happened?
- Did you...
- Oh, no.
It happened one night when he was outside.
Outside?
Yes. He was... hunting.
There was a great storm.
He was standing under tree... when lightning strike.
- How did he get in here?
- I find him and bring him home.
But he walks no more.
Evidence of trauma... exactly the same as a human being.
- He was supposed to be destroyed.
- No.
He cannot be destroyed.
Cannot die.
Your father made him live for always.
Now he is sick.
Make him well, Frankenstein.
- I don't know whether I...
- Your father made him.
And Heinrich Frankenstein was your father, too.
Do you mean to imply then that... that is my brother?
But his mother was lightning.
Electricity. We'll see.
I'll get my instruments from the castle.
We'll take him up there.
No!
You cannot take him away.
Just up there in the old laboratory... where I have light and room.
Please. You understand.
No one must see him, Frankenstein.
But does anyone know that he's here?
Good.
And no one will know that he is here... until your creation, Father, walks again.
What's going on at Castle Frankenstein?
The whole village is alarmed with anxiety.
- Our men report nothing but quiet.
- Quiet?
There's nothing so ominous as quiet.
Besides, it isn't quiet.
From the cemetery on Crag Hill...
Hans Stenble can see Castle Frankenstein with his field glasses.
The servants have been moving large crates and boxes into the old laboratory.
They even have old Ygor helping them.
We Frankensteinians are as nervous as cats.
We grovel at the howl of a wolf.
When the wind slams the door or a shutter... we tremble in our shoes and hide ourselves like frightened rabbits.
And always will with a Frankenstein in our midst.
What's he doing?
That's all we want to know.
Yes, we want to know.
Let's get Ygor here and make him tell us.
Yes!
All right, Ygor, make it fast.
Ready?
Ready!
No!
What's the matter with you?
What are you doing?
He cannot come in here. No one.
You want me to make him well?
Very well, then. I'll need some help.
This man is not just my servant.
He's been with me for years, helping me with my experiments.
I need him now to make notes.
All right, I'll not make him well.
But if he tells...
All right, come along, Benson.
Get your notes, Benson.
Iris contracted.
Marked sclerectasia.
Mental abnormality.
Considerable osteodermia in the frontal region.
Apparently these are the exterior electrodes.
The means by which my father inducted the vital energy into the body.
Systolic pressure, over 300.
Diastolic, over 220. Three times normal.
Definite hyperpituitary. Minus 65.
That accounts for his great size.
No human heart could possibly function like that... especially in his condition.
It's beating at over 250 to the minute.
He's completely superhuman.
Get your notes, Benson.
Left ventricular preponderance.
And look at this, Benson.
- Do you know what those are?
- No.
Bullets. Two bullets in his heart.
But he still lives.
I've never seen blood like that before.
Polymorphocellular.
Extreme hemachrosis.
The alpha leukocytes apparently do not dissolve.
The structure of the blood is quite different from that of a normal human being.
The cells seem to be battling one another... as if they had a conscious life of their own.
- What was in those boxes?
- All kinds of things. Machines.
- What kind of machines?
- All kinds.
Wheels turn around, electric lightnings come out.
Bottles, big ones, little ones.
Medicine. All kinds.
He doctor.
I don't understand his business.
I am blacksmith.
Body snatcher, you mean?
Yes.
Has he asked you to rob any graves?
- To get him a body?
- No!
Tell us the truth, or we'll hang you again and make a better job of it next time.
No, you no can hang me again. Can they?
No, that's been settled.
You were hanged and pronounced dead.
But he was not dead.
He was pronounced dead by Dr. Burgher.
And all the others Burgher's pronounced dead for the last 30 years... have been dead, haven't they?
If Ygor came to life again, it's the devil's work, not the court's.
You mean that if he commits another crime, he can't be hanged again?
- Yes, but...
- I do nothing.
I help Frankenstein.
He good man. He pay me money.
Well, you watch him.
And if he starts to do anything like his father and you don't tell us...
I'll see that you hang again.
You? Alone?
It took eight men before to say I was to be hanged.
The same eight will find you guilty again.
So?
- The same eight aren't here, Weber.
- No?
Well, I'm one of the eight, and I'll be one again with pleasure.
You, Neumüller.
You were one.
And I, too.
Yes. You, too, Lang.
That's right. I remember.
That's all here now?
Yes.
The other six are all dead.
They die. Dead.
I die. Live.
Quiet! That'll be all, Ygor.
Go back to Castle Frankenstein and be careful.
- You spit on me!
- I am sorry. I cough.
You see, bone get stuck in my throat.
The results of my extensive examinations establish beyond doubt... that the creature was brought to life originally... by an electrical impulse of terrifying potency.
It appears that my father thought that he could extract from lightning... some super-violet ray of life-giving properties.
From a careful analysis of his electrical hookup...
I've learned that he actually attracted cosmic rays... which neither he, nor anyone else in the world of science at that time... even knew existed.
Of course, since then, many of our most profound scientists... have come to believe that these rays are actually the very source of life itself.
This creature is indeed a monster.
There is not one part of his physical being that's like that of human beings.
From his warped brain... down to the tiniest argumentative cell of his huge carcass... he's unearthly.
Every fantastic story told of him by the people of Frankenstein...
I now believe to be absolutely true.
I, as a man... should destroy him.
But as a scientist...
I should do everything in my power to bring him back to conscious life... so that the world can study his abnormal functions.
That would vindicate my father... and his name would be enshrined among the immortals.
Benson, turn on the generator.
- Stop!
- Quiet, you fool!
It's no good, Ygor.
I've done everything I can.
I'm afraid we'll never get him out of this coma.
Come on, Benson.
Take off these electrodes.
I'm not going to work at Castle Frankenstein any longer.
I've seen enough to make me suspicious.
I'm going to quit.
No, you're not.
You'll stay there and report to me everything you see and hear.
I'll call there myself this afternoon.
You'll be well repaid.
Now go back and don't tell anyone you've seen me.
- Understand?
- Yes, sir.
I'd like very much to visit the village, but I'm ashamed to say I don't dare.
I think you're very wise, madam.
There's a definite feeling of tension there... and I'm sure you'll be much better off not to risk the discourtesy of the villagers.
Yes, that's what Wolf said.
I suspect the Baron, too, finds time heavy on his hands here.
No, never. He's almost constantly in his laboratory.
- Laboratory?
- Yes.
He's fixed over his father's old one, you know.
He's deep in some experiment.
I see. What sort of experiment?
I'm sure I don't know.
I never bother him at times like this.
He's terribly preoccupied now.
But as soon as his problem's solved, he'll be as gay as a lark again.
He's like that.
- Is he in his laboratory now?
- No.
He came in to lunch looking grey as a ghost.
I could see he was on pins and needles... so I suggested that he go out into the open air for a while.
He's been gone for hours.
- You don't mind being left alone?
- Not in the daytime, but at night...
- Good afternoon, Inspector.
- Good afternoon, Herr Baron.
- I trust you enjoyed your walk.
- Yes, very much.
There's nothing like a good walk through the woods for clearing one's mind.
- Won't you sit down?
- Thank you.
Yes, you scientists must have to have clear minds and steady nerves.
The Baroness has just been telling me that you're knee-deep in experiments.
- Yes.
- And working in your father's laboratory?
The villagers call it
"the Monster's home."
Haven't seen him stalking about by any chance, have you?
No.
- I fear he'll never stalk again.
- That's a relief.
But I'm curious to know why you chose that place to work.
- It was my father's.
- But without a roof?
I sealed it up with some heavy canvas.
Don't the sulphur fumes bother you?
- No, not at all.
- Sulphur fumes?
Forgive me, perhaps I shouldn't have mentioned that. I thought madam knew.
- Tell me.
- You see, our family history states... that the structure was built by the Romans over a natural sulphur pit... and used by them as mineral baths.
One of the first health resorts, perhaps.
Health resort.
Yes, possibly.
But during the succeeding centuries, the boiling sulphur increased in its intensity... until now, I believe, it is over 800 degrees Fahrenheit.
- Exactly.
- Even the stoutest Roman... couldn't venture into that today... without being parboiled to the bones in just a few moments.
Wolf, you do pick the strangest places.
I'd like to see how you fixed it up.
I'll have you come there some time and parboil you.
Well, hello!
- Mother, may I come in?
- Come on in, son.
Peter, this is Inspector Krogh.
- How do you do?
- How do you do, sir?
You're not supposed to shake hands with a left hand.
I'm sorry. That was very rude of me.
You're not supposed to wear gloves in the house, either.
- Son.
- Sorry again.
But, you see, I only have one real arm.
This one isn't mine.
Well, whose is it?
You see, Inspector Krogh lost his other real arm... in the war.
He's a soldier.
- Are you a general?
- No, he's more than a general.
He's an inspector.
Well, I'm a soldier myself, and I've been hunting all day long.
Hunting? Did you get anything?
Yes, a few elephants and a few tigers.
Did you have a nice long nap, darling?
No, not a very long nap.
A giant came in here and woke me up.
A giant? What an imagination.
No, Amelia, it wasn't imagination.
It was a giant and he woke me up.
And when I got up, he had a hold of my arm.
Did you chase him away with your gun?
No, he was a nice giant.
I gave him my picture book and then he went away.
Are there lots of giants around here?
Only one that I ever heard of.
That must have been him, then.
Perhaps.
You're pretty much of a giant yourself, aren't you?
Aren't we getting heavy?
Excuse me, Inspector.
I'll take him up to the nursery.
It's almost his suppertime.
Here we go.
It must be that book
Jack the Giant Killer... that's got into his head with his great imagination.
Here we go up the big mountain.
Duck your head.
Hold tight. We're almost there.
Here we are.
Now, Peter...
I want you to tell me all about the elephants, the tigers... and that giant.
Really, Daddy, there weren't any elephants and tigers.
I just made-believe that.
- But what about the giant?
- What giant?
The one you gave your storybook to.
He's real.
What did he look like?
He was a great big man with a hairy coat on.
And he walked like this.
What an imagination!
Yes. See you later, son.
What a boy!
Going out, Herr Baron?
Yes, I just remembered a thing
I have to check in my laboratory.
I almost forgot the time.
I'm getting sort of absent-minded.
I'll have to hurry, if you'll excuse me.
Ygor!
Ygor!
Ygor!
How did he get out of here?
You make him well with your lightning.
After you go, he get up and walk.
Now he's all right again.
Come.
Good man.
He must never get out again. Never.
He just do what I tell him, always.
See?
Go.
No one must know that he's here.
No one know now, but you and Benson man.
He'll never tell.
No, he will never tell.
Come.
Igor.
Ygor, I made him walk, but I haven't made him well.
He isn't well here. You understand?
I must continue my experiments.
He's well enough for me... and you no touch him again.
If you want him to be well, you must keep him here always.
- Understand?
- I keep him here.
You sent for me, sir?
Yes, Benson.
Inspector Krogh is still in the library.
I can't stand his suspicious look, so I called you in here.
Yes, sir.
- Benson, it's alive!
- Alive? You mean...
- Yes, alive!
- But you said our experiment...
I know. I, too, at first thought that we failed, but I've actually seen it walk.
Walk?
It's like some huge animal.
Never in my life have I known cold fear... until that moment that I felt his hand on my shoulder.
I was like a child's doll in those huge hands.
He could have crushed me as I would have crushed an eggshell.
- How did you escape him, sir?
- Ygor came in.
It's amazing the control he exercises over that thing.
It's hypnosis, or something more elemental perhaps.
- What are you going to do about it?
- Do? Continue my experiments.
- But what if he...
- I'm not worried.
He's dangerous, of course, but he loves Ygor and obeys him.
My problem is how to make Ygor obey me.
But what about madam and Master Peter, sir?
Oh, yes, I'll have to send them away.
I'll suggest tonight that they make a trip to Brussels.
Get some tickets for the noon train tomorrow.
I hope you forgive me speaking my way, but I've served you for many years.
I think it would be better if you called in
Inspector Krogh and told him everything.
No, I will not!
I have begun this thing and I'll finish it.
I'll not be halted by anything... till I'm the complete master of this living, breathing, intelligent creature... my father dreamed of creating.
- Herr Neumüller. How are you?
- Fine, Schmidt.
- Thank you.
- I hope you don't feel I'm an intruder.
Not at all, Inspector.
Well, I practically invited myself to dinner, but I...
No, of course not.
It's a great pleasure to have you.
You're our first guest.
I never thought I'd have the privilege of being entertained at Castle Frankenstein.
No, it's a great pleasure to have you here.
You see, you're our first guest.
You just said that, didn't you, dear?
Well, you are.
Where is Benson?
Why isn't he serving dinner?
We don't know, madam.
He went up to the nursery for the baby's supper tray... and we haven't seen him since.
Have you seen him, Wolf?
Yes, dear.
I sent him over to the laboratory to get some notes for me... that I want to work on after dinner tonight.
But how long ago?
Perhaps my instructions were a little complicated... and he may have become confused.
You know, he hates to make mistakes.
That awful knocker.
Fritz, will you see who it is, please?
Wolf, couldn't we install an old-fashioned doorbell?
That boom almost makes me jump out of my skin.
Yes, dear, I'll have a bell put in.
The knocker must have been used in the old days to arouse the entire household.
A sort of call to arms in times of danger.
It's one of your men, Inspector.
There has been an accident in the village.
A sudden death.
He requested that you come at once.
I'm terribly sorry. Please excuse me.
What a shame to leave a delicious dinner like this for so sordid a thing as...
I trust that nothing has happened to your butler, madam.
- Thank you.
- Good night.
Baron.
I think you ought to try and find Benson.
I'm terribly worried about him.
- Yes, I will.
- But don't go alone.
Silly. I'll be all right.
- What's the matter with him?
- He's asleep.
- Have you seen Benson?
- Yes.
- When?
- About two hours ago.
- Where?
- Here.
He say you tell him monster walk again.
He came to see.
Monster walk.
Benson run!
Where did he run to?
He isn't at the castle.
He just run away in the woods.
That thing's enough to scare anyone.
I didn't think Benson would come here.
Are you telling me the truth?
You didn't kill him?
No.
Why, I scare him to death.
I don't have to kill him to death.
Where does the ladder into the sulphur pit lead to?
- A cave.
- A cave?
It's warm. We stay there in winter.
- Where does the cave lead to?
- Just cave.
My deepest sympathies, Frau Neumüller.
How did it happen?
He must have been asleep and fallen off his wagon.
The wheels passed over his legs breaking them, and crushing his chest.
See here?
Will you all leave while Dr. Burgher and I make out the death certificates?
Any other marks or bruises?
Examine the back of the neck.
- You don't think that...
- Perhaps.
We won't know until you perform an autopsy.
Examine the heart, and report to me at once.
- What happened to Benson?
- I don't know, really, dear.
I've been working him pretty hard lately.
Maybe he just wanted to go out and get drunk.
But Benson doesn't drink.
Well, perhaps he does sometimes.
He'll be back in the morning bright and early. You'll see.
- Don't worry about him.
- It's you I'm worried about.
You aren't yourself.
Are you keeping something from me?
No, darling.
Is this place getting on your nerves?
I hate it here, Wolf.
- I'm terribly afraid all the time.
- I'm sorry, dear.
I'm going to send you and Peter away in the morning.
I want you to take a trip to Brussels, and I'll follow you in a few days.
I've tried so desperately to match your bravery, but...
My dear.
I'll be all right.
There's a good girl.
- Where are you going?
- To get Peter.
I'll feel better having him in here with me.
No!
Good morning, Inspector.
You're up rather early, aren't you?
You're early yourself, Baron.
I came to inquire about your butler.
Have you found him, dead or alive?
No, but he'll be back.
He's done this sort of thing before.
These sudden disappearances.
Can I give you a light?
Thank you, no.
He was in the war, you know.
He was wounded in the head.
It makes him rather funny at times.
But don't worry about him.
I'm going down to the village.
Will you come along with me?
The village? There's not a shop open.
No, I'm going to the railroad station.
My wife and child are going away for a slight holiday.
So?
So, you see, I have to do all the arranging myself...
- now that that stupid Benson's gone.
- I'm afraid I must ask you not to go, Baron.
Neither you, nor your wife, or child.
That accidental death that called me from your dinner last night... was another burst heart.
Listen.
Ygor, shut up!
He's been playing that thing all night.
There's a mob at your gate.
They have a strange notion that you had something to do with it.
Silly, isn't it?
Silly? They're mad.
I'll go down there and tell them so.
- No, you won't go, Baron.
- Why?
We'll talk it over... inside.
All right, if you like.
- Inspector.
- Madam.
My dear, I assume from the Inspector's attitude and pointed implications...
- That I'm under arrest.
- Arrest?
It appears we've returned to the Middle Ages.
The villagers have laid siege to the castle and are crying out for blood!
Madam, I...
A man is murdered a mile away, and do you know what killed him?
My name.
The very name of Frankenstein burst his heart.
And now the happy little villagers are clamouring for my blood!
I'm afraid the Baron is in a humorous mood this morning.
I suppose it has its humorous side, but you're not under arrest, madam.
I'm merely here to guarantee you protection against any unprovoked assault.
Unprovoked assault!
Inspector, you mean it isn't safe for us to leave?
I'm afraid not, madam.
But is there any reason why you shouldn't be perfectly safe here?
If one simple-minded villager as much as sets foot inside that door...
I'll shoot him like a dog!
You can tell them that for me... as long as you won't allow me to tell them myself.
I've never seen him so violent.
Madam, last night I missed my dinner, and this morning I've had no breakfast.
Now, do you think...
Certainly. I'll order some at once. If you'll...
Herr Baron, shall we go into the library?
I prefer to remain here, thank you.
Shall we go into the library?
I don't mind telling you, Inspector, that as a guest in my own house... you'll find me extremely disagreeable.
Sailing, sailing, over the bounding main
- May I come in?
- Come in, Inspector, please.
Thank you. Hello, young man.
- Your mother said I could visit you.
- Hello, General.
I'll be back in a moment, darling.
Excuse me, please.
You see, I have no young son of my own.
Oh, that's too bad.
- Have you done any more hunting lately?
- Yes.
- Has the giant paid you any more visits?
- Yes.
- He's a great big fellow, I imagine.
- Yes.
So big, possibly, he can hardly get through that door?
No, he doesn't come through the door.
No? Where does he come in?
Through the window? The fireplace?
- Through the wall.
- Through the wall?
- Where?
- Over there.
That's very interesting.
You're not afraid of him at all, are you, Peter?
No, he's a nice giant.
He gave me a watch.
- A watch?
- Yes.
- Would you like to see it?
- Very much.
Thank you.
Yes, it's a very nice watch. A very... nice watch.
Peter, shall we go downstairs and have some nice hot chocolate?
Yes.
- If the General will come with me.
- I'll be very pleased, sir.
Here we go.
- Hurry up.
- All right, I'm coming.
Superstitious, blundering idiot!
Prying, insinuating, accusing.
I'll kick him out of the house!
I'll not be heckled by a stupid, intolerable policeman.
Wolf, the way you're carrying on... if I were a policeman,
I'd be suspicious myself.
- You would?
- Yes, I would.
Mysterious things have happened.
A murder in the village.
Our own dear Benson disappears for no reason.
They probably think you, like your father, have created another monster or...
He's got even you, my own wife, believing that I...
I believe nothing.
I don't care about Krogh.
But I'm afraid for you, for Peter.
And only you, Wolf, can restore my confidence.
Please, darling, Elsa, please have faith in me!
I'm sorry that I lost control of myself.
I've no reason for being nervous like this.
But I've been working too hard.
A terrific experiment, one that I wanted to surprise you with... one that would establish me and my work. My work... as something outstanding in the world of science.
But believe me, darling, there's nothing to be afraid of.
I wouldn't be afraid if I hadn't, for the first time, sensed you were afraid.
Me? Oh, silly.
Everything's under control.
I'll not lose my temper again. You'll see.
Inspector.
Sorry, young man. I shan't be able to take chocolate with you.
Tell your father and mother
I'll be back very soon.
- Goodbye, General.
- Krantz, remain here on guard.
Now I can go to the lab.
I mean, I must go to the lab.
Only for a minute, dear.
I won't be long, really.
No touch him, Frankenstein!
No touch him... or something happens to you worse than dying.
- How long has he been here?
- All night.
You liar! He was in the village.
- You made him kill Herr Neumüller.
- Yes, why not?
Neumüller kills me.
Eight men say Ygor hang.
Now eight men dead.
- All dead!
- You crazy fool!
If Krogh finds him, he'll kill him.
Then he won't be any good to either of us.
You get out of here. If I find you hanging around here again, I'll...
He's mine! He no belong to you!
You go away, not me!
Get back!
Where is everybody?
The Baron's in the library, sir.
The rest of the family are at dinner.
I've had to send to Bandleheim for additional police.
Krantz, you report to Sgt. Schiller at the lower gate.
- The crowd is becoming unmanageable.
- Herr Inspector.
Come in.
Good evening, Inspector.
I thought that I'd see you sooner.
Sorry. I've been busy.
Very busy indeed, for me.
My job is usually a rather sleepy one.
- Have a drink?
- Thank you, no.
I'm afraid I shall require all the wits I've got tonight.
I've never seen you disturbed before, Inspector.
- You've even forgotten to take off your hat.
- Not forgotten, Herr Baron.
Merely a matter of form.
My business tonight is official, not social.
Rather a crude custom, I agree... but a custom.
Well, sir, what news from the front?
Another death. Another inquest.
When did it occur? This afternoon?
No. Sometime last night.
It was only discovered late this morning.
Herr Lang, this time.
The village apothecary.
A very old and dear friend.
He'll be mourned.
- Too bad.
- Yes, isn't it?
Herr Lang? Never heard of him before. Oh, well.
I suppose the villagers will say
I killed him, just the same.
No, not that you killed him, but that you know who did.
Really? But of course I know who did.
Haven't you heard? The Monster!
Yes, that's what they think.
Is it the old legendary monster of my father's time... or am I supposed to have whipped one up... as a housewife whips up an omelette?
I've been here over a month, you know.
Your wife and child are in danger.
So? From what?
- You tried to send them away.
- I will tomorrow, in spite of you.
You forget I have my hat on.
Meaning that I'm under arrest?
Yes.
I promised your arrest to the villagers to keep them quiet for the moment.
For the murder of Lang and Neumüller?
No. For the murder of Benson.
A technical charge, for the time being.
Why don't you search the laboratory?
You have my permission.
I've searched it already without your permission... with two men the other night.
We found nothing incriminating but a very large table... fit for a giant.
Yes, it was my father's.
I reconstructed it out of curiosity.
Why don't you search it again?
By George...
I think I know who your monster may be.
Good. Who?
Old Ygor.
Of course. Why not?
Everybody wants to hang old Ygor again... yet he has a perfect alibi.
He was constantly under observation when every murder was committed.
It's curious that the entire jury that hanged him is dead.
But he was never seen at the scene of the crime.
Yet it would be too simple to hang old Ygor.
I don't trust him!
I'm gonna find him and kick him off the estate... with your permission.
Yes.
If you like.
Amelia, you can put Peter to bed at once, but stay with him.
Yes, madam.
Inspector, I'm more terrified every minute.
Madam, I personally guarantee to get you and your son out of here in the morning.
And Wolf. He's a bundle of uncontrollable nerves and...
Yes. I'm going in now to comfort him.
Thank you.
Come in.
- Did you find Ygor?
- Yes, I got rid of him. Have a drink?
How did you get rid of him?
I killed him! He tried to murder me with his hammer, so I shot him.
- What are you gonna do about it?
- Compliment you.
For it is he who undoubtedly killed Benson.
He's dead. Murdered.
I just found his body in a secret passageway off the nursery.
Here's his watch.
It was in the possession of your son.
And here's a bit of chain that was attached to Benson's vest.
But Ygor didn't do it, nor did you.
Nor was it done by any ghost.
There's a monster afoot and you know it.
He's in your control.
By heaven, I think you're a worse fiend than your father.
Where is this monster? Where is he?
I'll stay by your side until you confess.
And if you don't,
I'll feed you to the villagers... like the Romans fed Christians to the lions.
I wouldn't put it past you.
In the meantime, will you have a drink?
Or would you like to play darts?
Amelia!
Where is Peter, Amelia? Where is he?
He's gone!
Peter!
- What is it?
- Peter's gone!
I'm going to the laboratory!
Here we are.
Peter!
Open the door!
Daddy!
Oh, baby.
Herewith I deed to you the castle and the estates of Frankenstein.
Do with them what you will.
And may happiness and peace of mind be restored to you all.
Goodbye.
- Goodbye, gentlemen.
- Goodbye, Baron.
- Goodbye, Peter.
- Goodbye, General.
Order.
Order in the court.
This court will recess for 15 minutes.
That Martin's as good as acquitted.
That judge wants to watch his step of the Loder crowd.
They're bad babies to play with.
Hey, lady, I bet you 5-to-2 that Judge Shaw lets Martin go.
- Scram.
- Oh, wait a minute.
Aw, skip it.
I'll bet you 10-to-1 that Judge Shaw lets Martin go free.
- Make it 100-to-1 and I'll take it.
- Oh, professional guy, huh?
Boy, this is a fine thing.
Here's a guy who walks into City Treasury, grabs himself 350,000 bucks...
...and there isn't a judge in town to give him the rap he deserves.
- What are you nervous about, Martin?
- I'm not nervous.
What's that on your forehead, dew?
If it were any other judge,
I wouldn't be worrying.
- I'm not worrying.
- Well, you're not on trial.
Stop looking guilty.
No judge will send you up, not even Shaw.
Yes, you can set up an acquittal headline, and if it isn't used, I'll pay for it.
Rewrite it, sweetheart. This is a feature.
I'll give you the lead as soon as
Judge Shaw comes out of conference.
Roger, you can't go through with this.
There was another telephone call a half hour ago.
A man said if you convict Martin, that they'II...
Roger, I'm afraid.
I've been threatened time and again.
It's the oldest trick in the world.
But don't you see,
I've got to do my duty.
Isn't your duty to your children and to me just as important as your duty to the state?
Roger, I'm afraid.
I wish I was as sure as you are.
What's he calling recess for?
- Oh, stop being a fool.
- What's the matter with you?
He's got the jitters.
You'd think he was on trial.
- Yeah, he's the sensitive type.
- Well, I'm not at all sure.
- Well, you will be.
- Say, I'll bet you...
- I didn't know it was you, boss. I'm sorry.
- Well, what's your bet?
Bet you 10-to-1 Judge Shaw gives Martin the keys to the city.
If you need money that bad,
I'll take you for 50.
- Fifty?
- Yes, 50-to-500. You made a bet, kid.
Yeah.
Order.
Order in the court.
This honorable court is now in session.
Dinner at my house at 8.
We'll celebrate.
The defendant stand up.
Stephen Martin, this court finds you guilty.
Guilty of the charge of diverting public funds from the City Treasury...
...and the misappropriation of said funds as mentioned in the indictment.
It's the judgment of this court...
...that you be imprisoned in the penitentiary for a period of 10 years.
And furthermore, this court recommends that no application for parole be considered.
I can only add that it's the public's misfortune...
...that the law under which you were convicted doesn't carry a heavier penalty.
The court's adjourned.
This court's adjourned.
And I thought I bet on a sure thing.
Aw.
Ha-ha-ha.
Heh, a straight shot and I missed it.
You always miss the straight ones, Nolan.
Your play, Loder.
This isn't the sort of celebration
I had planned for poor Martin.
Don't waste too much sympathy on Martin.
The only thing that's good about him, he can keep his mouth shut.
Sentenced to 10 years in the State Penitentiary.
- It's a long time.
- What are you jumpy about?
Look here, we've gotta do something.
Even if he keeps quiet, we're still mixed up.
Judge Shaw and his DA are on the warpath.
He'll get us all.
Relax, Merritt, relax.
The DA and his office doesn't worry us.
I'll agree that Judge Shaw is a serious menace to our organization...
...but Mr. Loder and I have, uh, decided to give him attention.
I don't get you.
Why do you think we're playing pool with young Trigger?
Yeah, come on, Trigger, take a shot.
Dig for your dimes, boys.
- This is where I do my stuff.
- What do you mean?
Figure it out.
Take a look at this shot.
Nice shot, Trigger.
Now, if you can just drop
Judge Shaw that easy.
What? You're not going to murder him.
- You get it.
- We can't do that.
Sure we can. I never miss.
That's a pay ball, gentlemen.
Dime, please.
- It will be easy for the DA to trace it to us.
- I can assure you it won't.
Murder, as Trigger will tell you, is a very fine art.
- Covering up afterwards is even finer.
- Shaw is a hero right now.
The public is never going to stand for another unsolved murder.
- They'll demand...
- Quite right.
They'll demand a solution and a closed case and we'll give it to them.
I have a splendid solution.
John Ellman, fresh out of prison, sent there by Judge Shaw.
- Are you sure it'll work out all right?
- Positive.
I'll make it doubly sure by personally defending him for Shaw's murder.
- Make the best speech of my career.
- And lose the case.
What name shall I communicate to Mr. Loder?
Tell him, uh...
Tell him it's something personal.
- Very well, I'll tell Mr. Loder.
- Thank you.
But I do not think he will look up on you.
Excuse me, sir.
A nameless person to see you, sir.
- Shall I inform him to remove himself?
- No. Tell him to wait.
Thank you, sir.
Trigger, time you got going.
- Skip out the back way.
- Okay.
- Why are you bringing him here?
- He thinks I'm gonna help him.
He'll be a cinch for the job that Trigger's got for him.
- I'm Loder, did you wanna see me?
- Yes, sir.
My name is John Ellman.
A man told me to come and see you.
He said you're always ready to help a fellow.
Ellman, eh? Oh, yeah, I remember.
Judge Shaw sent you up for second-degree murder.
Yes, for 10 years.
- Some woman in the case, wasn't there?
- It was my wife.
- I struck a man, I didn't mean to kill him.
- Sure, sure.
- Well, what can I do for you?
- I want a job, Mr. Loder.
I'm a musician, and a good one too.
Look, I'Il... I'll show you.
That's fine.
I said, that's fine. Cut it out.
Why, you don't look like you could hold a job if you got one.
You ought to go away somewhere, get a fresh start.
I know, but I haven't any money.
- If you could lend me some?...
- You guys are all alike.
I can pay it back just as soon as I get a job.
- Sure, that's what they all say.
- But they said you'd help me.
Sako, get him out of here.
This way.
Got a light, buddy?
Hmm. Thanks very much.
Kind of tough running out of matches.
Say, I remember your face.
Name's on the tip of my tongue.
Aren't you John Ellman, the fellow they railroaded to prison?
Yes.
Wait a minute, buddy.
I knew I'd seen you someplace before.
John Ellman. Huh.
- How are things going for you?
- Not so good.
It's tough going after a stretch, isn't it?
How long you been out?
- Two weeks.
- Say, you look kind of cold.
How about coffee to warm you up, huh?
- Sure.
- Draw two, Mike.
Yes, sir, two cups of coffee.
That's right.
If you're having tough luck,
I may be able to help you out.
That's very kind of you.
- Could you use a good job?
- Well, what sort of a job?
Oh, it's on the up-and-up.
Sort of detective work.
I need a man to watch the house of Judge Roger Shaw.
Judge Shaw?
- Why, he's the man who sent me to prison.
- He did?
- Well, ha, ha, isn't this a small world?
- Well, just what would I have to do?
He's been playing around a little and his wife wants some evidence.
- I've got to get a man to watch his house.
- Oh, I don't think I could do that.
All you've got to do is watch his house.
Take notes as to when he arrives, and when he leaves.
Now, there's nothing wrong in that, is there?
- Well, no, I guess not.
- That's the stuff.
Imagine, Dr. Beaumont keeping this heart pumping for over two weeks.
I wish he'd do something about making your heart pump.
Don't be funny.
Jimmy, how many more years of payments before this ring is really ours?
- Only a few. Is this sterilized?
- Yes. Only a few?
At the rate you're going, it will probably be 20.
It may not be more that 18.
Oh, ha, ha, Jimmy.
- Are we going out tonight?
- Yes, if I can get away.
He can't keep you.
He's lecturing at the institute.
Tell him you're taking me out.
There he is now.
Jimmy?
- Do you love me?
- Yes, of course. Why?
Why don't you say so sometimes?
That's saying it.
- Here's the solution, doctor.
- Huh?
Oh, thank you.
Pretty girl, Nancy.
Very pretty.
- Thinking of getting married?
- Why, yes, we'd like to.
You're not making much money.
That doesn't matter.
We both like working for you.
- We get along.
- Hmm.
Well, in a few years, you'll be doing big things, Jimmy.
You have a natural feeling for this work...
...but it will demand all of your time and thought.
I'm afraid marriage will interfere with your progress.
Do you think you can postpone it?
We're pretty much used to waiting by now.
You're supposed to be at the institute at 8, doctor.
Huh?
Your lecture.
Oh, ah, yes, yes, yes. Thank you.
Well, how about it, Jimmy?
Do you think you can wait?
- I'm afraid I'll have to, doctor.
- Well, if you do...
...you're a bigger fool than I thought you were. Good night.
- Hey!
- Jimmy, are you hurt?
Uh, they smacked the left side of the car.
I'm gonna get that guy.
Bust my fenders. They can't get away with that hit-and-run stuff.
- Not so fast, Jimmy.
- Oh, it's just my luck.
My insurance ran out yesterday.
Wait. Look.
- Did you get their license number?
- No, they were too far ahead.
Oh, Jimmy, let's go. I'm afraid.
Looks like somebody's been taken for a ride.
Jimmy, we don't wanna get mixed up in a thing like this.
Oh, Jimmy.
Listen, you two, you haven't heard or seen a thing.
Keep your trap shut, understand?
Now beat it.
"Judge Shaw. " Holy smoke!
- It's a lie, a lie. I tell you, I didn't do it.
- Order in the court. Order.
Proceed.
Don't worry.
Ladies and gentlemen of the jury, these facts cannot be denied.
The accused rented the car.
Night after night, he was seen skulking around the deceased's home.
Ten years ago, Judge Roger Shaw did his duty as he saw it...
...and sentenced this man to prison for an offense...
...the details of which, out of fairness to the accused...
...I shall not relate.
Today, this man takes vengeance into his own hands and kills.
If you acquit him, you jeopardize our entire social life...
...our entire legal system.
Morally, you can not acquit.
Morally and legally, you must convict.
The defense's only alibi...
...of a man and woman who could step forward, by waving a magic wand...
...absolve the accused of all guilt, is so fantastic...
...that I shall not presume upon your valuable time by refuting it.
Therefore, ladies and gentlemen of the jury...
...the state asks that you find John Ellman guilty of murder in the first degree.
The state rests.
I can't stand it. I tell you, I can't stand it.
We can't be quiet about this.
- We've got to tell.
- Jimmy, please? Let's get out of here.
Come. Come. Pardon me.
- Hey, buddy?
- Yeah?
- I'll bet you 2-to-1 he's acquitted.
- You're on.
It's a bet, and if I don't win this time...
...I'm gonna go back on relief.
- Yeah.
- This is no ordinary murder trial.
- I don't care.
You can't get mixed up in a thing like this.
It'll ruin your career.
Why, they won't stop with threats.
They'll kill you.
Jim, I love you too much.
Ladies and gentlemen of the jury...
...the greatest fault my client possesses is his firm belief in his fellow men.
He believes, even now...
...that the young couple who have the power to free him will step forward.
We admit the sedan.
We admit the fingerprints on the steering wheel.
We admit the prisoner's record.
We even admit that the notes in this book were written by the defendant.
In fact, we deny nothing but the charge.
Order in the court.
I thought Nolan was defending this bird.
He's pushing the electric chair right under him.
We only ask you to try, ladies and gentlemen...
...try and realize that an unjustly accused man sits in this court.
Sits waiting, not in vain, I pray, for the young couple to step forward...
...and say the words that will definitely establish his innocence.
Never mind, son.
Is that you, warden? Is there any news?
Is there any news, warden?
Tell me, tell me, please.
Am I pardoned?
The governor refuses to intervene.
But those two witnesses.
They know I didn't do it.
Why can't they find them?
Why don't they speak?
They have done everything that can possibly be done.
Let me ask you this, Ellman.
Do you suspect anyone of framing you?
Who'd want to frame me?
Have you any enemies, anyone who might feel, uh?
No. I have no enemies.
We always come back to this point, then, Ellman. It seems inevitable.
But you can't kill me for something that I didn't do.
You can't, I tell you, you can't.
I don't want to die. I want to live.
Well, Ellman, it's within my power to grant any last request you care to make.
You take away my life and offer me a favor in return.
That's what I call a bargain.
Anything you want, within reason.
Anything I want.
I'll give you something easy, warden.
I'd like music.
Have you anyone here who can play a violin or a cello?
Yes.
I'd like him to play my favorite piece as I walk out there.
It'll make it easier.
Is that such a strange request, warden?
I always think of heaven like that.
We were the witnesses that night.
He had nothing to do with the murder.
- How do you know?
- We saw two men drag the body...
...into Ellman's car.
He didn't kill Judge Shaw.
- That's very strange.
- Doctor, you've got to do something.
- You keep looking at your watch. Date?
- Oh, lay off, Nolan.
You know what's the matter.
- I won't feel safe until the man's dead.
- Oh, forget it.
There's a Dr. Beaumont insists on talking to you, sir.
- Dr. Beaumont?
- Yes, sir.
Hello, doctor?
Yes?
Why, I'd be glad to see you.
What?
John Ellman?
What is this, Nolan, a rib?
- Yes?
- I called you as Ellman's attorney.
I tell you,
I have those two witnesses here.
They can absolutely prove
Ellman's innocence.
Oh, Nolan, there isn't a minute to lose.
You must get in touch with the governor.
I can't get in touch with the governor direct.
I'll have to work through the DA's office. Yes.
You hold the witnesses there until I get the DA over.
I'll bring him over if it's humanly possible.
- Yes. All right, doctor. Goodbye.
- What is it? What's happened?
- Those two kids have shown up and talked.
- I knew it.
- I thought you knew the art of covering up.
- What are we gonna do?
- I don't like to be hurried.
- We can't ignore this. It's too dangerous.
At the right time, I'll get in touch with Werner. Then it'll be too late.
In the meantime, let's finish our supper, hmm?
- Step on it. Can't you drive any faster?
- I'm doing the best I can, boss.
I'll bet you 2-to-1 that I'll beat this next stop sign.
- Is the man crazy?
- Traffic light.
Don't stop, fool. There's no traffic.
Even if there was, this is no time to stop.
- You tell me to respect the law, and now...
- Shut up and get going.
They should've been here an hour ago.
Nancy, please.
I don't like the looks of this whole business.
If these two witnesses turn out to be phonies, I warn you...
Can't you forget for once that you're a prosecuting attorney?
It's an innocent man's life at stake.
Ain't you ever gonna get that box tuned?
I still got half an hour.
The man who asked for this is a musician.
It's gotta be done right.
- Okay, I'll tell you when it's time.
- You no have to tell me. I'll know.
- Ah.
- How do you do?
How do you do?
- This is Mr. Werner.
- How do you do?
- These are the witnesses.
How do you do?
May I ask you a few questions?
No, they haven't time for their story.
It's five minutes to 12.
Get the governor, will you? Hurry.
I tried it, but he wouldn't talk to me.
Long distance. Quickly.
It's time, Ellman.
This is District Attorney Werner.
Get me the executive mansion at once.
It's a matter of life and death.
I'll be seeing you.
Keep your chin up.
Show them you can take it, pal.
He'll believe me.
The best pitcher we got on our team goes out on parole tomorrow.
- Tough luck losing a good man.
- What are you worrying about?
Carr Smith the shortstop's coming in here pretty soon.
- He's swell. He'd make our team.
- Well, he's due in about a week.
Got himself in a jam.
He's gonna be here about five years.
Hmm, that's good news.
Warden's office.
Yep?
Yes, sir.
Ellman?
It's... It's too late, governor.
They just gave him the first jolt.
I'll try. Yes, sir.
Yes?
Werner speaking.
Ellman is dead.
Werner, get the governor back.
- Tell him to call off the autopsy.
- Why?
Never mind why. Don't ask questions, there's no time to lose. Call him.
Raise the BP three degrees.
Jimmy, it's impossible.
He was electrocuted.
Increase the oxygen.
If Dr. Beaumont doesn't succeed,
I'll never forgive myself.
Steady, Nancy.
Keep that Lindbergh heart pulsating, Nancy.
See that it doesn't stop.
Prepare the respirator.
He's alive.
He will live.
This concludes America's part in the great international broadcast...
...in honor of the modern miracle performed by Dr. Evan Beaumont.
All right, England. Take it away.
And we of the medical and scientific fields in England pay respect to Dr. Beaumont...
...for the most incredible achievement in the history of medical science.
Now, please, try to remember.
Don't you know your name?
- Uh, name.
- Yes, ye...
Well, do you remember that I brought you back to life?
- Life.
- Yes.
You were in another world.
Do you recall anything of that world before you came back?
I don't know.
Oh, but try to understand.
Please, you must.
You...
This is District Attorney Werner, the man who sent you to the electric chair.
- Chair.
- Yes.
Look at me, Ellman.
Don't you remember me?
I prosecuted you in court.
Do you feel that I'm your enemy?
No.
He sent you to the electric chair for the murder of Judge Shaw. You remember that?
Can't you remember anything that happened before you died?
Please.
Please.
You see, except for this blood clot,
Ellman is apparently sound.
- Is that why he doesn't remember?
- I believe so.
Well, why don't you operate?
Too great a risk. Ellman isn't normal.
Werner, there are times when I feel that man knows everything.
Doctor, when he looked at me...
...and denied me as an enemy,
I felt that too.
- Did you?
- It's uncanny.
- Hmm.
- How do you account for it?
I can't yet.
All I know is that for a short time, the spirit of life left his body.
Now, what happened during that transition?
What effect did the experience of death have on his subconscious mind?
- Can he remember?
- Well, that's rather a large order, doctor...
...and I'm afraid a bit beyond the province of law.
And beyond the province of science too.
But it's a challenge.
And somewhere,
I feel we'll find the key to all this.
If you do, I hope you let me know.
Why, John, you shouldn't have left your...
Oh, please, let me help you...
- Hello, Dr. Beaumont.
- Hello.
I want you to know that the state has appointed me Ellman's guardian.
- And they've awarded him $500,000.
- Well, that's a fortune.
Though I doubt if any suffering can be measured in dollars.
A half a million?
At that rate, I'd be willing to die a little bit myself, ha, ha.
Well, you've worked very hard for him, Mr. Nolan.
And although he can't express it,
I know that he's very grateful to you.
- Dr. Beaumont.
- Yes.
Ellman. Come quickly, please.
John.
Get out.
- Get out.
- What is it, John? What's the matter?
- Get out.
- The man's insane.
I think you better wait in my office.
You're disturbing him.
Very well.
John, what is the matter?
Mr. Nolan's done everything he could.
Because of his efforts, the state's awarding you half a million dollars.
He's the best friend you have.
No, he's my enemy.
Why do you say that?
Eh?
Why do you say Nolan is your enemy?
Tell me.
- I don't know.
- But...
Doctor, a little later, please.
Yes. Take him to his room.
John.
Is he all right?
I wonder what made him act in that way towards you, Mr. Nolan.
I don't know. You're a doctor.
Maybe you can figure it out.
I wish I could.
He seems to be driven by strange impulses.
As if he were the instrument of some supernatural power.
Or why should he show this hatred towards Nolan...
...who is his friend?
You know, doctor,
I don't believe Nolan ever was his friend.
But he defended him.
The state even appointed him
Ellman's guardian.
It's the work of racketeers who have everything in the city under their control.
- And Nolan is the brains of that group.
- No.
I'm convinced they framed Ellman for the killing of Judge Shaw.
You threw a wrench into their machinery when you brought him back.
Well, I haven't the slightest doubt...
...that even though before death
Ellman knew nothing...
...he knows something now.
If he does, he knows things of great importance to me.
Hmm. Do you know the rest of these racketeers?
Oh, yes, very well.
Socially and professionally.
Werner, I'm going to invite my board of trustees...
...and some distinguished doctors and scientists to meet Ellman.
I'd like to try something, and I want your help.
What have you in mind, doctor?
Well, if Ellman shows antagonism towards Nolan, without apparent cause...
...would he react in the same way to?...
Mr. Merritt.
How do you do?
- Mr. Blackstone.
- Glad to know you, doctor.
Mr. Loder.
How are you?
Mr. Nolan you know.
Of course.
- Glad you could come.
- Thank you.
- I hope we're not late.
You're just in time.
That's just fine.
We hate to miss anything.
I hope you won't.
My secretary will show you where to sit.
- This way.
- Thank you.
Not at all. Delighted. Only too happy.
Here you are, Mr. Nolan.
And you sit here, Mr. Blackstone.
And you sit here, gentlemen.
I still don't see why we had to come here.
Good thing we had drinks before we got here.
He certainly has devoted the last 20 years to his experiments.
He really deserves success.
Jimmy, thank you for the flowers.
They're lovely.
- That's all right.
- Well, you don't seem very cheerful tonight.
- I'm worried about you.
- Why?
You've been working so hard on this case that we'll have to take care of you soon.
Jimmy, don't you understand?
I feel I must do everything
I possibly can for him.
You're wearing yourself down.
You can't go on like this.
This means everything in the world to Dr. Beaumont.
- It should mean everything to us.
- It should, but Dr. Beaumont is changed.
He's forgotten everything we started out to do.
All he thinks of is trying to find out what Ellman experienced while dead.
- Trying to put his soul under a microscope.
- Beaumont is doing what he thinks is best.
But in the meantime, we're growing apart.
We don't seem to belong to each other anymore.
Every time I try to see you, it's always Ellman, Ellman, Ellman.
- That man seems to have you hypnotized.
- You shouldn't say that.
I'll say what I please when it concerns us.
If Dr. Beaumont doesn't come back to earth soon...
...I'm gonna get a self-respecting job on the back of an ambulance.
Oh, Dr. Beaumont is ready for us, John.
- Hello, Jimmy.
- Hello, John.
I'll see you later, Jimmy.
I'll be waiting inside. There.
And now, ladies and gentlemen,
I would like you to meet Mr. Ellman.
But rather than embarrass him...
...by putting him on exhibition as the man who returned from the dead...
...I prefer to present him to you as a pianist...
...if that will meet with your approval.
Thank you.
All right, Nancy.
I can't stand that man's eyes.
He looked as though he were strapping me to a hot seat.
- He got me that way too.
- Listen...
...I won't feel safe till he's sent back where he came from.
Get hold of Trigger.
What's the matter? Go on back in there.
- I'm not going back.
- Neither am I.
- I'm gonna put Trigger on that ghost.
- What you wanna do, gum up the works?
With the eyes of the world on Ellman?
Fat chance.
We gotta do something.
This is one of Werner's tricks.
He's gonna get all of us.
That's a lot of baloney.
Do you think for a minute that?...
Don't you appreciate music?
Why, sure we do, when it's good.
Gentlemen, your conduct here tonight...
- ...has betrayed you.
- Of what?
If I'm not too inquisitive, of sending Ellman to the electric chair...
...on a murder charge for which all of you were responsible.
- Where did you get that fantastic idea?
- It's more than an idea, Nolan.
It seems to me you're getting a little careless with your talk.
Remember, I'm Ellman's attorney.
That was the most unfortunate thing that ever happened to him.
You're a smart man, Werner.
What's the matter?
Has Dr. Beaumont's supernatural hocus-pocus gotten you too?
No, it isn't hocus-pocus.
I don't need the aid of the supernatural to read the guilt written all over your faces.
It's elemental, my dear Nolan. Elemental.
Why, look at Mr. Merritt's face.
It's an open book.
Oh, he looks like that all the time.
Well, boys, enjoy yourselves.
Go on, get hold of Trigger, and don't lose any time.
- Maybe you're right.
- What? You all gone crazy?
What are you so panicky about?
Werner hasn't got a thing on us.
The trouble is you all have a guilty conscience.
I haven't.
Now, keep calm and nothing is going to happen.
- I'm going to make sure nothing happens.
- Wait.
- Go ahead. We got nothing to lose.
- Leave it to me.
Yeah?
Yeah, you can talk.
Listen, Trigger, I got a big order for you.
And here's the lowdown.
Ellman? Huh, you don't want much, do you?
Can't you get somebody else?
How do you expect me to get near him?
Well, it's worth double the usual rate.
What?
I said triple the usual rate, and money in advance.
I'll be at your place in half an hour.
Where'd you come from?
Funny, ha, ha.
You and me always seem to be meeting up at the right time.
Here I've been thinking of paying you a visit and, heh...
...you save me the trouble by walking in.
Sit down. Make yourself at home.
Keep it. That's all.
How did you know where to find me?
Why did you kill Judge Shaw?
Lay off that stuff.
I never even seen the judge.
That night, I thought you were my friend.
- You took my life.
- Well, I'm gonna take it again.
Unless you got cat blood, no one's gonna bring you back. Put them up.
You can't kill me again.
Keep away from me, I tell you, or I'll plug you.
- You can't use that gun.
- Keep back. Keep back.
- You can't escape what you've done.
- Stay where you are, I say. Keep back.
Trigger.
What?
Trigger.
That you, Nolan?
Trigger Smith is dead.
- What?
- What's the matter?
Trigger Smith is dead.
I tell you,
I found him lying dead on the floor.
This is no rib, Nolan.
If you ask me, Ellman had a hand in it.
He'll get all of us.
What? Have you gone crazy?
Come over here and have a drink.
Not me. I'm taking no chances.
I'm leaving town tonight.
- Thank you.
- That's all.
Blackstone.
Why...
Why, how did you know I was here?
Why did you have me killed?
Why, I... I...
You're mad. He's mad.
Wait.
"R.I.P." What does that mean?
"- Rest in peace. "
- Good idea, we'll use it.
This is proper. You will find it to your liking for an occasion like this.
It isn't large enough.
Send a big wreath of white chrysanthemums.
- Trigger would like that.
- Sunset Hour Funeral Parlors, Trigger Smith.
- May I have your card?
- That won't be necessary. No name.
Just make it flashy.
We don't care about the price.
Give us something that will knock the mourners' eyes out.
- Mm-hm.
- I understand. Just a moment.
I hope Trigger Smith appreciates this.
- Hello.
- Hello, Merritt.
- Listen.
- What's the matter?
- The DA phoned.
- What is it?
- It's Blackstone.
- What's the matter?
- He was killed last night.
- Killed?
I'm sure Ellman drove him mad.
- That man has supernatural...
- Stop talking like a madman.
You may think I'm crazy, but he's going to get us.
- Shut up.
- Here we are, sir.
- How you like this?
- That looks very good.
Say, that's great.
But you better make it two instead of one.
Huh?
Joe. Hey, Joe.
Where are you? Joe.
- Here we are.
- Where have you been?
Your orders were to stay outside this door.
- There's funny things going on.
- What?
We've been seeing and hearing things around here and there ain't nothing.
Yellow, huh? Fine guards I've got.
- We ain't afraid of nothing alive.
- What's the matter?
- We ain't no use to you, and we're leaving.
- You can't. I won't sleep.
You've got to watch my room.
Wait till morning.
No. Come on, Joe, we're quitting.
- But you can't.
- But we are.
Let's go.
This place gives me the heebie-jeebies.
You're telling me.
- Turn off that radio.
- I can't shave without music.
What are you shaving for?
I'm going to bed.
My whiskers keep me awake.
Leave that alone.
Nolan sent me around here to keep you from cutting out paper dolls.
And if I can't have the comforts that I have in my home, then I'll quit.
- You can't leave. The guards walked out.
- I don't blame them.
Does it mean too much to stop playing that radio?
- Oh, all right, I'll shave without music, then.
- Thanks, Betcha.
To show how I appreciate your sacrifice, this is what I'm going to do.
You were telling me how uncomfortable your bed was last night.
- Tonight you can sleep in my bed.
- So, what's the gag?
You wouldn't be expecting Ellman to pay you a social call tonight, would you?
And have him find me in your bed?
Ha, ha.
- No, thank you.
- Just goes to show you.
Try to be decent and make a fellow comfortable and he thinks it's a gag.
Oh, I'm sorry.
- All right, I'll stay.
- Oh, thanks, Betcha. You're a real pal.
Consider it your room.
You'll find pajamas, cigarettes, a drink, whatever you want.
- Thanks.
- Good night.
Good night. You haven't got an old address book around, have you?
Merritt.
How did you get in here?
What are you going to do to me?
Why did you have me killed?
- The others did it. They framed it.
- You were one of them and you know it.
I tell you, I had no part in it.
If you're going to do anything, get it over with.
Go on, do it.
Don't look at me like that.
I say, don't look at me like that.
Keep away, I tell you. Keep away.
Why, you... Unh!
What do you want? What are you doing?
Your orders were to stay with Merritt.
- He's dead.
- Dead? Who?
- Merritt's dead.
- What are you talking about?
- What happened?
- I don't know.
I heard a window crash and I run into the room...
...looked out the window and there he was laying on the sidewalk.
- I turned around and it was Ellman.
- Ellman?
Do you hear that, Loder?
First it was Trigger, then Blackstone, and now it's Merritt.
I'm beginning to think those deaths weren't a coincidence.
Whether it was or not, we quit stalling.
Listen, you're Ellman's guardian.
You and I are going to Dr. Beaumont's office and get him out.
Wait a minute, there's two of us left.
You're liable to get us both in a jam.
We're in a jam already.
It's either him or us, and I'm telling you, it's not gonna be us.
Dr. Beaumont. Dr. Beaumont.
- I think this is the place.
- John.
Oh, what?... Why, where have you been?
I'm caretaker at the Jackson Memorial Cemetery.
When I came on duty this morning...
...I found him wandering about the tombstones.
He seemed to be in a kind of a daze.
I recognized him from his pictures.
- Thank you very much.
- All right.
Oh, John.
Where have you been?
What have you been doing?
Here, sit down here, will you?
Nancy, give him something hot for him.
That's right. Now, then.
Do you know that Smith, Merritt and Blackstone are dead?
What have you learned that made you think they sent you to the electric chair?
Do you suspect any others?
- Doctor, after some sleep.
- No, Nancy, I must know.
Please, leave me alone.
Now, Ellman, try to think.
I'm positive that Ellman has some knowledge not given to him by man.
He seems to know that these men were responsible for sending him to the chair.
I don't know what the solution is, doctor.
But as district attorney,
I can't let Ellman go on like this.
- No.
- Three men are dead. Others may follow.
- It's like taking justice into your own hands.
- Exactly.
Although I suspect these men of being guilty...
...I've got to get some tangible evidence.
- I'll get it for you.
- How?
I'm going to unlock Ellman's mind.
I shall operate.
What good would that do?
He wouldn't live long enough to tell us.
You said there's only one chance in a thousand he'd live.
- But, it's worth that chance.
- Why?
Werner, the evidence that Ellman will be able to give to you...
...will be nothing compared to the information he'll be able to give me.
Secrets from the beyond.
Things that no man has ever dreamt of are within my reach. Think of it.
Pardon me, doctor.
Mr. Nolan is waiting to see you in your office.
All right.
- How do you do?
- How do you do?
What can I do for you?
- We've come to take Ellman.
- What?
He's a menace to society and should be confined to an institution.
He's not normal.
He shouldn't be running around loose.
- As his doctor, I refuse to allow it.
- And as his guardian, I demand it.
Doctor, I advise you to confine your experiments to animals.
- Just you leave man...
- Stop making speeches.
We got a court order for Ellman's removal.
- Right.
- May I see that?
Why, sure, take a look at it.
Nothing phony about it, Mr. DA.
You better get wise, unless you want a murder charge against you and this man.
- We're taking him right now.
- But he's in no condition to be moved.
He's still under my observation.
He needs treatment, and must remain here until I say he's fit to go.
That makes no difference, doctor.
The court order speaks for itself.
Just a moment, gentlemen.
This order is dated November 17th.
- That still gives us 24 hours.
- What?
- That's right.
- Well, what can we do about it?
We can't do anything for 24 hours.
All right, we'll be back tomorrow.
Just remember, gentlemen, we shall hold you responsible for Mr. Ellman.
- We'll take that chance.
All right, let's go.
Good day.
Well, doctor?
I shall operate before morning.
- Doctor. Doctor.
- Yes?
- Ellman, he's gone.
- Gone?
I looked everywhere.
He's not in the hospital.
Loder, Nolan, they must have taken him.
I'll notify Werner.
No, no, wait. I...
I think I know where he might have gone.
That girl knows where Ellman is.
Good hunch following her, wasn't it?
I hope you're right.
Hey, you lug.
Why didn't you make that turn?
I could've bet odds she went straight ahead.
All right, turn and get going.
You had all the time in the world.
Come on, get out of there.
I'll drive this car myself.
I'll bet you I drive...
I'll blow your brains out instead of Ellman.
Come on, get out of there.
I quit.
Open the door.
Please, open the door.
Oh, John, please.
John.
I've been looking everywhere for you.
Why did you go away?
- John, you're ill.
- No, I'm not.
But we've been so worried about you.
Why did you come back here again?
It's quiet.
I belong here.
- There's her car.
- She must be in there.
Hurry up.
Please. We're only trying to help you.
Of course, Nancy, of course.
You have helped me.
- But you can't stay here like this.
- I must. I must.
I'll call Dr. Beaumont.
Let him have it.
What's the matter with you?
Give it to me.
John.
Yes?
- Yes, Nancy.
- John has been shot. He's dying.
What?
Please hurry, doctor.
All right, Nancy.
Do what you can for him till I get there.
- I fixed a place for him.
- Thank you.
Quickly, doctor.
What is it, doctor?
One bullet struck the base of the skull in the area of the blood clot.
If he can only hold out for a little, we might discover what he learned in death.
Oh, can't you forget your questioning?
You're supposed to be a doctor.
No doctor can save his life now.
But if he could only hold...
Now, John.
John, look at me. Try to remember.
You must.
It's so strange remembering.
What, John?
All the things you wanted to know.
How I knew I had been framed.
But how did you find out?
You knew nothing before your execution.
How do you know now?
It's hard to explain.
Try, John, try.
That's why I brought you back from death.
Leave the dead to their maker.
The Lord our God is a jealous god.
But, John, what is death?
Can't you put it into words?
Tell me.
Tell me. You must.
What is death?
I think I can.
- After the shock...
Yes?
...I seemed to feel...
Yes?
...peace and a...
He's happier now.
It will never be known.
The Lord our God is a jealous god.
MAN: Chandu the Magician.
MAN: In the three years that thou has dwelt among us... thou has conquered the atma of the spirt... and found thy reward in the powers proclaimed by Shiva.
Thou shalt look into the eyes of men... and they shall be as straw in thine hands.
Thou shalt cause them to see what is not there... even unto a gathering of 12 times 12.
My son, I proclaim thee one of the sacred company of the yogi... and bestow upon thee the name of Chandu.
Thou hast done well, my son.
To few indeed of thy race have the secrets of the yogi been revealed.
To you, my teacher, I express my thanks.
- What more can I learn?
- Nothing, now. The world needs thee.
Go forth in thy youth and strength... and conquer the evil that threatens mankind.
I have gazed in the crystal, and I've seen the forces of death and destruction... rising from the brain of a madman.
Look.
- CHANDU: Who is this man?
- YOGI: This man is Roxor.
YOGI: Last of an ancient family that lived in Alexandria.
He has built a home in the rock temple of Madu... that stands on the great cliffs above the third cataract of the Nile.
But why am I appointed to fight this man?
It is fate who has chosen thee for the task, my son.
And because no man fights so well as when he is protecting his loved ones... fate has thrown thine own family in the path of this human monster.
Look.
CHANDU: Dorothy... my sister.
YOGI: Yes. Her husband has brought his family to Cairo... so that he maybe near his friend Roxor.
YOGI: This man, Robert Regent... has a secret of enormous power.
CHANDU:
Yes. For years, my brother-in-law... has worked to perfect a death ray strong enough to destroy whole cities.
- (NO AUDIBLE DIALOGUE)
- He's never found it.
YOGI:
This death ray in the hands of Roxor...
Means an end to goodness...
An end to all that is noble... all that is sane.
Can't you do something?
Surely the police must be able to find some trace of him.
Oh, please telephone me as soon as you have any news at all.
- Thanks.
- Oh, Mother. Mother, you mustn't worry.
- I'm sure we'll hear from Father soon.
- (DOOR OPENS)
- Mother? Look at the letters I found.
- Where did you get them, Betty?
- In the laboratory.
- You didn't go out there in the dark now?
Oh, Mother, how could anyone be hanging around the garden in this sandstorm?
I thought I might find some clues in them.
But you mustn't go outside again.
Why? Did you see something?
Tell me. Did you bolt the door when you came through?
I... I don't remember.
- What did you see, Mother?
- Nothing, Bobby.
It may be foolish, but I thought I saw a face peering in at that window.
Oh, Mother, let's go away from here.
We can't, dearest. Not until we have some news from your father.
- (CLATTERING)
- Listen!
I thought I heard a door close.
- What's that?
- (EERIE RINGING)
Well, what's the matter?
Don't you recognize me?
- Oh, Frank! (SOBBING)
- There, there.
Now, don't cry. Don't cry.
I've come here to help you find Robert.
- Uncle Frank, do you know about Father?
- Yes, dear.
- Do you know where he is?
- I want to talk to you alone, Dorothy.
My, my, Betty Lou, how you've grown.
And Bobby too. But he's too big to kiss.
Sure. We're grown up pretty nearly,
Uncle Frank... so why can't we stay and hear what you know about Father?
- I'll tell you everything later.
- There's something I want to know now.
What was that bell that rang just before you came in?
That was an astral bell.
It tells you when a yogi is near.
- You're really a yogi now?
- Mm-hmm.
And when I hear that bell, I know it's a warning from a yogi that danger threatens.
- (HOWLING)
- What's that?
DOROTHY: It's only a pride of dogs down by the river.
"Now that I know your plans, no money on earth...
"could persuade me to sell you the secret of the death ray.
"If you try to approach me again,
I shall denounce you to the authorities.
I'm convinced you are a madman and should be dealt with accordingly."
Do you know whom this letter was intended for?
- No.
- Roxor.
- Roxor?
- I'm sure of it. Robert's his prisoner.
- Where?
- That I don't know.
I tried to communicate with his mind, but the crystal revealed nothing.
He must be...
- Dead?
- No, no.
Just probably drugged, that's all.
Unconscious.
Robert Regent, I'm calling you. Calling!
You see? It's useless.
Calling him has no response.
(SCREAMING) Help!
Let me go! Stop it!
- Who sent you here?
- Roxor.
- Where did you see Roxor?
- At the wine cellar of... (INDISTINCT)
Open in the name of Osiris... the blind eyes, sealed lips, deaf ears.
- ## (MIDEASTERN)
- (CHATTERING)
I wish to see Roxor.
The effendi is speaking with a friend and may not be disturbed.
He will see me.
Tell him it is Princess Nadji.
MAN: Bring the princess here.
We must not let her find you here, Abdullah.
I don't know yet whether she is to be a friend or an enemy.
If she proves to be an enemy,
I beg you let me deal with her.
Why? Do you hate the princess Nadji?
I hate her.
Yet I want her more than
I've ever wanted any woman before.
Very well, Abdullah.
If Nadji opposes me... and you serve me well... there shall be a new slave in your harem.
ROXOR: Come in.
Let me have your cloak.
Then I may not feast my eyes on your lovely figure?
- Why have you sent for me, Roxor?
- Why?
To offer you my friendship.
- Well, here we are.
- Yes, but how are we going to get in?
You're not going in.
You're going to stay here and watch.
But it'd be much more fun to go in with you.
Listen, Bobby, in case anything happens to me... your mother and Betty Lou will need a man to protect them.
Stay here.
You have the word, brother?
Open in the name of Osiris... the blind eyes, sealed lips, deaf ears.
But my people are happy and contented.
The great dams have multiplied our crops a hundredfold.
What if I destroy those dams?
- What?
- Yes.
I can do it with one blast from my death ray.
Then where will your people be?
More than a billion tons of water will sweep down on them... drowning them like rats.
The greatest flood since the biblical deluge.
So, unless my people join in making you a modern pharaoh... you will annihilate them.
Pharaoh.
I shall be greater than any pharaoh.
Civilization and all its works shall be destroyed.
Men shall return to savagery... following only one supreme intelligence... me.
You see, you're my prisoner.
Every man in this house is my servant.
- You can't keep me here.
- I shan't try.
You are to be sent to a friend of mine as a present.
Did you call me, master?
Take this woman through the tunnel to the river. A boat is waiting.
Come!
Come, Nadji, quick.
- Chandu!
- (MOUTHS WORDS) Come.
What's the matter with you?
Stop them! Stop those two!
After them!
Stop them!
- Everything aboard, Ahmed?
- Yes, effendi.
Very well.
Mother, is she a real princess?
Yes, Betty.
Uncle Frank says she's descended... from a long line of ancient Egyptian kings.
- And are we really going to her palace?
- No, Bobby.
- We're going to her dahabieh.
- Her "daha" what?
Oh, Bobby, don't you know that's a houseboat?
And the princess says we'll have to travel all night by camelback.
Won't that be great?
Wasn't it strange that chance should have sent you... to look for Roxor just when
I needed you most?
It wasn't chance, Nadji. It was fate.
I mean, it was, uh... It was fate that brought me in front of that door.
At first I didn't recognize you.
You see, it's three years since last we met.
- Remember?
- Yes.
Those days in Paris...
I've thought a lot about them.
I know.
In the yogi monastery, there's a pool... where you can see the face of anyone who's thinking of you.
And did you see my face in it?
If you would have looked in it, you would have seen mine much oftener.
Mother, do you think the princess can help us in finding Father?
I don't know, darling, but Uncle Frank says we'll be much safer... as her guests than if we're left here alone.
Well, I shouldn't be frightened anywhere with Uncle Frank.
Oh, look. There are the camels.
El Mahafi, are you ready to leave?
Yes, Princess, and tomorrow's sun will see us there.
Cush. Cush.
You bloomin' idiot.
Don't you understand plain English?
Voulez-vous cush?
Oh, why don't you kneel down when I ask you to?
Aw, I wish I had it.
- Miggles!
- Captain Chandler.
(CHUCKLES) That's all right, Miggles.
Don't salute me, and don't call me Captain Chandler.
We're out of the army now.
What are you doing in that funny-looking getup?
Nursemaid to a blooming camel.
Oh, I'm so happy I met you, Captain.
You've gotta get me out of this.
You've gotta give me a job.
I'll work for you for nothing. After all,
I was a good orderly, wasn't I, sir?
Are you still drinking, Miggles?
Well, sir... (COUGHS)
Changin' the subject, do you still do your magic tricks?
Oh, much better ones. Look at me.
Now look behind you.
- Aaah!
- (CHUCKLING)
Take off your hat.
- Why, you dirty little snoop.
- Who, me?
Oh. Oh, he can talk.
- Oh, take him away.
- (CHUCKLES)
- Make him go away.
- That's all right. He's only in your mind.
Oh, don't tell me I'm going balmy.
He's gone!
How would you like to take a very dangerous trip with me?
Sure. You know me. I love danger.
All right, then. Come on.
Oh, thank you, Captain. Thank you.
Every time you get drunk you're going to see that little fella.
- Understand?
- I understand.
So help me goodness, governor, this is the finish.
When a man starts to see things like that...
- Well, it's time to quit.
- Okay.
- You all right, Princess Nadji?
- Yes.
Miggles. Behave.
I can't thank you enough, Nadji.
Now that Dorothy and the children are safe...
I'll be free to find Robert.
I think I can help you.
- You, Nadji?
- Yes.
Roxor has been seen by some of my people... near the ruins of Madu.
Where are they?
- On the third cataract.
- How far is it?
Not very far.
My boat can be there in 24 hours.
Go straight to Roxor and inform the master... that the princess and the foreigner are on their way to rescue Regent.
Tell him I will see that the white man gets no further than the houseboat.
And now, tell me.
Have you married since I saw you last?
No. That's one feat of magic that requires a beautiful assistant.
- But you've been in love?
- All the time.
(LAUGHS) I might have known.
There are too many charming women in the world.
Not too many.
Oh, now, don't misunderstand me, Nadji.
All the time in love, but always with the same woman.
Do I know her?
You should.
She was a present to your father and mother on your birthday.
(LAUGHS) You're never serious, are you?
Never so serious as now, Nadji.
Tell me. Have you found someone?
Even if I had, my life belongs to my people.
You know, you told me that three years ago.
You think I'm foolish, don't you?
No, dear. Just very, very young... and making an unnecessary sacrifice.
Sometimes I think so too.
Hello.
You have a visitor.
His name is Abdullah.
He's been coming here very often lately.
Oh. I see.
For the white man.
It is Roxor who commands.
NADJI: I'll order some refreshments.
Ali? Some wine.
- You must be choked with sand and dirt.
- You're right.
I love the looks of the desert, but I hate the taste of it.
I thought I'd pay you a surprise visit.
- I'm afraid I'm rather in the way.
- No, not at all.
But unfortunately, my boat is starting at once.
And is the gentleman I just saw making this romantic trip with you?
Romantic is hardly the word.
With a woman as lovely as you are, Nadji... it couldn't be business.
You have a strange way of paying compliments, Abdullah.
Who is this friend of yours?
He is called Chandu.
Chandu.
Beg pardon, Captain.
Is this where the danger starts?
Not yet.
- (RINGING)
- That's funny. A telephone way out here?
That's strange.
You haven't told me yet.
Why are you going up the Nile?
- You know Roxor?
- Ro... Roxor.
Oh, is he that crazy scientist who lives in one of the rock temples?
Yes.
No, I've never met him.
Is he the man you're going to visit?
I understand that Roxor has discovered... many valuable relics of the 12th Egyptian Dynasty.
Wait.
Drink.
Go on, drink.
CHANDU: This wine is... is poisoned
CHANDU: Robert Regent, I'm calling.
Robert Regent, I am calling.
Robert Regent, where are you?
Look. Look!
The crystal's clearing at last.
NADJI: The great rock temple at Madu.
CHANDU:
Roxor is trying to build a huge death ray.
It's Robert. He's still alive.
NADJI: Roxor is there.
CHANDU: Robert hasn't told him the secret.
NADJI:
Oh, he'll torture him until he does.
CHANDU: That's your servant...
The man who gave us the poisoned wine.
Roxor is punishing him because he failed.
NADJI: Chandu, this man is heartless.
Roxor will kill him.
Not as long as he has any hope of forcing Robert to give up his secret.
What was that message the Arab just brought?
I don't know.
Nadji, you say you know the way to this temple?
Yes.
- (MOANS)
- Quiet, Miggles, quiet.
Oh, Captain!
Quiet, Miggles. Quiet.
Miggles, stay here and keep watch.
Yes, Captain. I can manage.
(GASPING) Captain! Captain!
Captain! Captain!
(MOANING) Captain!
Captain! Captain! Captain! Aaah!
Captain! Captain! Captain!
- Captain!
- What's the matter? What's happened?
One of them bloomin' stone idols hopped off his perch and ran away.
- And he pinched my hat.
- You've been drinking again, have you?
So help me, it's true. I swear it on the heads of me unborn children.
Captain! Captain!
Look!
- Chandu!
- Fear not, Princess. You are to live.
But you will see your friends die.
(MOANING) Oh, Mother.
Before we die... accept my blessing.
MAN: Open! Open!
- A fiend!
- A fiend!
Halt!
My will shall be your will.
Now I command you. Take me to the effendi Professor Robert Regent.
- He is not here.
- Speak the truth.
- The master has taken him away.
- Where to?
To the secret market of Bab Doukkala.
There, unless he speaks, he will see his daughter sold as a slave.
- What does it mean?
- It means that Roxor can do nothing... by threatening Robert, so he's kidnapped Betty Lou. Come!
Miggles.
(MOANING) Oh, Captain.
Miggles.
Oh, governor, take away those snakes.
Come on, Miggles.
Pick up your gun. Pick up your gun!
(GASPS) Take it away! Take it away!
Take it away! Take it away!
Never another drop, so help me.
Are you ready to tell me the secret of the death ray?
No.
You still may change your mind.
Never.
- Father! Father!
- Betty Lou!
My child.
What are you going to do with her?
That depends on you.
Will you tell me the secret of the ray?
- No.
- Take her to the block.
- ROBERT: No! No!
- No, no, no! (SOBBING)
- Don't!
- Father!
- (SOBBING) Father!
- ROBERT: Don't take her!
- Don't!
- Please stop! Father! Please!
Let her go!
You shall stand at that window and see her sold.
Help me, Father! Don't!
Let me go! Father, help me!
Kill me.
Kill me if you will, but let her go.
Courage, Betty Lou.
It's not too late to save her.
No. Whatever happens to me or mine,
I'll never tell you.
ROXOR: Get out!
Master! Master!
- (CHIRPING)
- Master! Master!
Allah, save us!
I saw the gold with mine own eyes!
This is magic!
Allah be praised!
Stop that man! Run after him!
Run after him!
Guard!
Abdullah!
Guard!
- Why didn't you hold him at the gate?
- He never passed the gate.
When these hands tried to seize him, there was nothing there but a burnoose.
That one.
- GUARD: The devil!
- (ALL SHOUTING)
Now I know who is fighting us.
Chandu... A man who has at his command the wizardry of the East.
- What is his power?
- Ah.
Hypnotism, nothing more.
Is there no way through which we can attack him?
Yes, one.
Samson's strength was in his hair.
Chandu's strength... is in his eyes.
Mother, here they are.
- Oh, Betty!
- Bobby!
- Oh, my poor child.
- Mother, dear, please don't worry about me.
It was dreadful to see Father like that, his face drawn with agony.
- So desperate!
- Don't. I can't bear it.
CHANDU: Now, Dorothy, don't worry.
Please, Frank.
Can't something be done to save him?
I'm going right back after him, dear, as soon as I get fresh horses.
There, there.
- Miggles, be ready to leave in half an hour.
- Yes, sir.
We're going to the rock temple.
All right, sir.
The rock temple, I think he said.
This calls for another drink.
Walking idols and guns that turns into snakes?
This certainly calls for a drink.
Aren't you ashamed of yourself?
Who? Me?
What for?
- For seeing things again.
- Now, go on. Hop it.
Is that a nice way to behave?
I thought you was a gentleman.
And I thought you were a gentleman too.
We were both mistaken, weren't we?
Don't you talk back at me.
I'm not talking back at you.
You're talking to yourself.
Miggles, aren't you ashamed of ourselves?
Every time you drink that liquor, you're not yourself.
If you're not yourself, how am I to know who I am?
If you're not you and I'm not me, then who are we?
Neither of us. Miggles, behave.
All right. I give in.
I'll never touch another.
- Nadji, why this costume?
- I'm going with you.
- No.
- But I might help you.
No, darling.
That last trip was too dangerous.
I couldn't risk losing you again.
At least I can go as far as the oasis.
Please.
If anything happened to you, Nadji, dear... do you think I could ever forgive myself?
Do I really mean so much?
- More than so much.
- (COUGHING)
- The horses is here, sir.
- Nadji.
No, thank you. You'd better order a horse for me, Miggles.
- That's all right. You can have mine.
- Miggles!
What's the matter with you?
You seem nervous.
Well, it's...
It's all this excitement, sir.
Could you fix it up for me, so I could have a drink without seeing anything?
You haven't had one all day?
No, sir.
All right, Miggles. You may have one then.
- Here's to you.
- To you, Miggles.
As I said, sir, here's to you.
Oh, go and take a good swim!
Be careful. This is tear gas.
If you break it, it'll blind you.
CHANDU: Well, here we are.
- Dear, keep yourself hidden.
- Don't you worry about me.
You have more important things on your mind.
Never anything more important than you,
Nadji, dear.
Sometimes I wonder if you really know the meaning of danger.
I do, darling. I do when it concerns you.
You know, I'm not a bit afraid... when we are together, and you speak to me like that.
When you look at me like that, nothing else matters.
Be careful. If not for your own sake... then for mine?
A bargain.
And you, darling, be careful... for mine.
Take no chances.
Chandu!
Ride, Nadji! Ride away quick!
(GASPING) I'm helpless.
Roxor was right.
Your magic comes from your eyes.
- Chandu!
- Bring him to Roxor!
DEATH RAY WORKER: Only Regent can do it!
Well done, Abdullah.
Now I'll have my revenge on Chandu.
Yes, but that doesn't tell you how to operate your death ray.
No?
You followed Regent's plans in building this elaborate machine... but he still withholds the knowledge to release its power.
Regent was near to breaking when he saw his daughter on the slave block, wasn't he?
Yes.
If Roxor threatens his wife and children... what then, Abdullah?
In a few hours, his whole family will be here.
How?
In that cell, he's now writing a letter to them.
MAN: Effendi!
- Is the letter ready?
- Where's Roxor?
He's not here.
If you'll take it to my family, they will reward you.
It's only a letter of farewell.
- The letter will be delivered, effendi.
- Thank you.
Now look, Abdullah.
For the wife of Robert Regent.
ROXOR'S HENCHMAN:
For the wife of the effendi.
- Are you sure that's really from Father?
- Look, darling, it's his writing.
Oh, wouldn't it be wonderful if we really could save him?
We must save him. I'll get ready.
But, Mother...
There's no need for you to go.
This is a man's job.
- But there's no man here.
- Well, how about me? And Miggles?
- How's that, sir?
- I was just reminding Mother you're a man.
Does she have to be reminded?
If I could only get this bandage off my eyes.
- Oh, if I could only help you.
- Oh, Nadji.
Nadji, what a fool I was to let you come with me.
Don't say that, Chandu.
If these are to be the last hours of your life, I want them to be mine too.
If I could only get you out of here, see you safe once again.
It doesn't matter what happens to me.
I feel so much closer to you now than ever before.
Oh, Nadji, I can't think of losing you... now that I've found you again.
Tell me, if all this hadn't happened... would you have left Egypt, gone with me?
You had only to ask, and I'd have followed you anywhere.
If this is the end, Nadji... let me hear you say "I love you."
I love you.
And I love you.
Well, Chandu, we meet at last.
It isn't quite as you planned though, is it?
Remember this, Roxor.
That the best laid plans of men sometimes go astray.
What do you mean?
I mean that my will is stronger than yours... that it will conquer you.
- That's a lie!
- Is it?
Then why are you afraid to look me in the eyes?
I'm not afraid.
Your eyes would have no effect on me.
Then take off this bandage!
If I were alone, I would.
But these silly natives, they believe your tricks.
You're afraid, I tell you.
Take the bandage from his eyes.
Take it off.
Stop! Stop!
Don't let him fool you.
Get rid of him once and for all.
You're right. (SPEAKING FOREIGN LANGUAGE)
You can't do that!
- You can't bury him alive!
- (CHUCKLES)
Why not?
It was a favorite punishment among the priests of Isis who built this temple.
No!
You'd be far better off to kill him.
Why?
Yogis have been known to remain buried for days.
ROXOR: Yes.
But not underwater.
No!
- (SPEAKING FOREIGN LANGUAGE)
- No!
No!
- Roxor. Roxor!
- Why are you calling him?
I'll tell him how to work the machine.
Robert, you mustn't!
You said it would mean death to millions.
I'm going to, I tell you, if he'll let you and the children go.
We won't go!
We won't save our lives at such a cost.
Hmm. Why, it's a family reunion.
Let them go, Roxor.
I beg of you, let them go.
There is a way out of this cell, and I'll show it to them.
But not while you are in there.
Just let me stay here.
I don't care what you do with me.
Now, look.
Mother!
ROXOR:
I told you there was a way out, Regent.
That is a river down there... where your friend Chandu has gone.
Have mercy, Roxor!
Stop!
Close it! Close it!
- Will you tell me now?
- Stop!
Mother!
Mother! (WHIMPERING)
- (SCREAMS)
- Stop!
Stop!
- Stop! Stop!
- You'll show me how to work the death ray?
Yes. Yes.
How far will the beam carry?
- Halfway around the world.
- Ah!
Hurry, hurry!
Is it ready?
- (WHISTLE)
- Yes.
Back to his cell.
At last.
I'm king of all.
That lever is my scepter.
London, New York, Imperial Rome...
I can blast them all into a heap of smoking ruins.
Cities of the world shall perish.
All that lives... shall know me as master and tremble at my word.
Paris.
City of fools.
Proud of their Napoleon.
What will they think...
- when they feel the power of Roxor?
- (BOOM)
And England... with its sacred traditions...
Its king. Its triumph... its... its navy...
- will be helpless.
- (BOOM)
They shall bow before me in worship.
Me... Roxor.
- (BOOM)
- I will destroy the dams of the Nile.
And its roaring floods shall sweep down upon... hundreds of thousands... drowning them like rats!
Roxor, the god... whose hand deals death!
Stop! I command you!
Take your hand from that control.
No, you don't frighten me.
You can't move that lever.
I'll move it now!
And you're standing right in the front of the ray.
Your hand is powerless to move, Roxor.
It's a lie.
And you shall be the first man for the ray to kill.
I have come out of a coffin from the depths of the Nile.
My will brought me here... and that will is stronger than yours.
You are helpless.
- No!
- Drop your hands.
Now, stand there.
- Don't move.
- ROBERT: Chandu!
Dorothy! Robert! Are you safe?
Are you all right?
ROBERT: There... It's over... there.
I've doubled the speed of the generator.
The voltage is mounting.
The ambient's at white heat.
The machine will explode in a moment.
- Get out of here, quick!
- Not that way, Frank!
I'm all right. Hurry!
For years I've wanted you, and now I've got you.
- You beast!
- There's no use fighting.
Nadji!
Nadji! Nadji!
Nadji!
Chandu! Look out!
Nadji! Na...
- Captain!
- (BUZZING)
Chandu! Chandu!
- Where are they?
- Let's go.
- Are you all right, Nadji, dear?
- Uncle Frank! Uncle Frank!
Children! Dorothy!
- Thank heaven you're safe, Frank.
- That was brave of you, Robert.
You set the machine to destroy even your whole family... rather than give it to Roxor.
Aaah!
Help!
LITTLE MIGGLES: Where can we get a drink?
You oughta be ashamed of yourself.
Come on.
I hope I'm not very late.
They're upstairs.
His heart is perfect.
Hear that, Betty? I'm in perfect shape.
How did the new valves work on the heart?
Beautifully.
They'll give any pressure you want.
Then we'll get the apparatus ready at once.
Yes, Doctor.
Are you quite sure you want to go through with this?
Yes, Doctor.
You realize, of course, that the possibilities may be unpleasant?
I studied those possibilities all the time you were developing the mechanical heart.
It's worked on every other kind of animal.
Why should man be an exception?
He shouldn't, but we can't be sure until we try.
Well, can't you try on a body that's already dead?
Unfortunately, no.
But if we can revive a man who's been scientifically put to death, then we have the perfect anesthetic.
And in that moment the art of surgery will have advanced a thousand years.
It's the most tremendous thing we've ever worked on.
But what good will that do you if this fails?
I'd rather take a chance on something this great than to live to be 90, marking time.
- Then you're still determined?
- Yes, Doctor.
Oh, Bob, you can't do it. I won't let you.
Now take it easy.
There's nothing to be panicky about.
But don't you realize he's going to kill you?
You're going to die.
That sounds a lot tougher than it is.
I'll be under anesthetic. That's all.
There's nothing to it.
- Well, what if he can't bring you back?
- He won't miss.
Why, inside of two hours, we'll be eating chop suey and fighting about where we're going to go on our honeymoon.
Now don't worry.
Nothing's going to happen to anybody.
Oh, please don't, Bob.
All ready.
Now, don't forget we got a date for chop suey in two hours.
All set.
No, please. You stay here.
And we're not to be interrupted on any account.
Pulse, 47.
Forty.
Respiration, 15. Dropping fast.
He's dead.
Now to draw out the vital heat.
It'll take at least 30 minutes for the body to chill.
I'll test the heart.
How frail a thing to solve the riddle of death.
We're really very stupid, Lang.
We lived surrounded by working models of this machine, and only now it occurs to us to duplicate them in machinery.
The heart is nothing but a pump like this.
Veins and arteries are only tubes like these.
So what could be simpler than to use the glass pump to force the real pump into action after it has stopped?
Maybe we should have made this of steel.
No, then we couldn't watch the course of the blood from the machine into the body.
- We must see in order to learn.
- But if it should break?
If anything fails us now, our lives, as well as his, are lost.
- I don't understand.
- We've taken a human life.
If we don't restore that life, the law will call it murder.
Now look, Lieutenant, all I want is a little statement for the morning edition.
Is the Mayor guilty of that bribery charge or isn't he?
Listen, if I told you newspaper guys what I really thought, they'd snatch my badge right off me.
Officer, Dr. Savaard's going to kill someone.
You've got to stop him.
- How do you know?
- I'm his nurse. I work there.
He's going to kill a young medical student.
- Where's all this happening?
- At Dr. Savaard's house. Hurry!
- What's the address?
- 8700, Post Road. I'll show you the way.
Shane talking. Get hold of Dr. Stoddard and have him meet me at the Savaard home as soon as he can.
The address is 8700, Post Road.
- Does Dr. Savaard live here?
- I don't know if Dad's in, but I'll see.
This house is so rambling, we have a regular phone system.
He's not in the library. I'll try the laboratory.
Hello, Dad.
There's a gentleman here to see you.
No, no, Janet, I must not be disturbed.
I'm in the midst of a crucial experiment.
Send him away and don't let anybody else in.
Careful.
What's causing those gas locks?
They'll wreck the whole thing.
There's the trouble. Those tubes.
Why, they should curve down, not up.
Betty, what's the matter?
In there.
Open up. It's the police.
- The police? How did they get in?
- I don't know.
Hand me the shears.
Take this and hide.
- I'll face this with you.
- No, I'll need you later.
Hide somewhere.
I'll be able to get in touch with you.
What'll I say if I'm caught?
Say I sent you away before the operation started so you wouldn't see how the machine works.
Where will I go?
In the cellar for now.
But hide, and stay hidden.
Open up, I say!
Break it in.
Betty, what's the matter? What's happening?
He's killing Bob.
- All right.
- Over here.
He's dead.
- Dad, what happened?
- That's what I'd like to know.
It's very simple.
I've created a technique for restoring the dead to life, and that young man volunteered to be my first subject.
Now, if you gentlemen will be so kind as to leave my house,
I'll go on with my work.
- Did you kill him?
- I told you, he volunteered.
How did you kill him?
I made use of certain gases that end life without poisoning the tissues.
That's just what I wanted to know.
Unlock my hands!
I've got to restore that boy to life.
- Hello, Lieutenant, what's the trouble?
- Take a look in that box over there.
Look, give me one hour, just one hour to work on that boy.
Why don't you give him a break?
What have you got to lose?
Nothing but my badge.
Well, he's good and dead, all right.
This man says he can bring that body back to life.
- What about it?
- Fantastic.
Inside of an hour,
I can have that boy walking and talking, and explaining it all to you himself.
From what I've seen so far,
I'd say Dr. Savaard has developed a homicidal mania.
Idiots.
Watch out he doesn't hurt himself.
Now, gentlemen, you can think what you like, but give me one hour, just one hour to work on that boy.
I'll get an autopsy order right away.
If you touch a knife to that boy, it'll cost him his life!
Oh, please let him try anything to bring Bob back.
We'll do everything possible, but I tell you now, it's hopeless.
- I'll call the ambulance.
- Doctor!
Now look, that boy trusted me.
He put his life into my hands.
I've got to have one hour to work on him.
Just one hour. You must!
Not a chance, Doc.
Please, it's Doctor Savaard who's asking you this.
A man whose opinion is honored throughout the world.
He'd never have attempted this unless he could see his way through to the end.
You've got to give him a chance.
Oh, come along.
Dr. Stoddard, how long have you been a police surgeon?
About 14 years.
Calling your attention to the night of May 2nd, were you called by Lieutenant Shane to investigate an occurrence at the clinic of Dr. Savaard?
I was.
Would you tell the court what you saw, please?
I found the body of young Roberts in a sort of casket.
He was dead and cold.
I reported his death to Lieutenant Shane officially, then had the body removed to the morgue for autopsy.
In your opinion, could any power on Earth have restored young Roberts to life?
- No.
- Thank you.
Your witness.
Dr. Stoddard, is it not a fact that Dr. Savaard begged you for a chance to restore young Roberts to life,
- and that you refused?
- It is.
- Why?
- Because the idea was fantastic.
Have you never heard of dead persons being revived by drugs?
- Certainly.
- That's all.
Dr. Savaard, will you tell the court very simply just what you hoped to accomplish by placing a man in a so-called state of death?
Today, the surgeon is forced to work against time, because the patient still lives and breathes, and the bloodstream is still flowing.
But think what it would mean to the surgeon if there were no loss of blood, no race against time, no nerve shock, and no fear of death on the table.
It would mean more time for work, work that's undreamed of today, on the heart, on the brain, on the...
Perhaps the jury may find it a bit difficult to follow that explanation, Doctor.
Could you make it even simpler?
To operate on a living body is like trying to repair a motor when it's still running.
But with a motor you can turn the power off.
You can take it apart, find out what's wrong, replace the worn and broken parts, it can be put together and made to run just as good as new.
And you hoped to be able to do that with the human body?
But for the treachery of a stupid woman, my discovery would be part of the knowledge of the world today.
And you really believe that such a thing would be of great and lasting benefit to humanity?
I can think of nothing nearly so great.
This body, this mechanism means nothing.
The mind is all that counts.
But when the body dies, the mind dies with it.
But this we can prevent.
So our first great objective is the replacement of vital organs that have worn out.
And with the body scientifically dead, the surgery of such operations is simple.
But the real secret lies in the pumping of an artificial bloodstream through the body by means of a mechanical heart until the life functions pick up their own rhythm, the heart begins to beat, and life is restored.
Oh, believe me, all this and as much more as the mind of man can encompass is ours for the asking when once we've found the way to make death our servant, and not our master.
Think of it.
The Edison or the Pasteur of tomorrow need not die merely because his heart is worn out.
We'll give him a new heart, taken, perhaps, from the body of a young man who's been killed in an automobile accident.
And our great genius is awakened to another 60 years of useful life.
You ask me if that's of benefit to mankind?
I answer, it's the gift of eternal life.
But whether man is wise enough or old enough to receive such a gift,
I don't know.
I don't know.
That is all.
Your witness.
I've enjoyed the lecture very much,
Dr. Savaard, but if you don't mind, let's return to the object of this trial.
Did you or did you not personally, deliberately and with planned purpose, put young Roberts to death?
I've explained all that.
Answer my question.
Well, I... That is, I...
Did you kill him?
Yes, I did.
That's all.
The counsel for the defense is asking you to free Dr. Savaard because he killed in the name of science, for a high and noble purpose, for humanity.
In Dr. Savaard's own statement, stripped of its fine phrases and reduced to its actual meaning, it means we're to butcher our young athletes so their hearts can be used to prolong the life of some doddering old man, preferably a scientist.
I assure you, ladies and gentlemen of the jury,
Dr. Savaard's fine ideal would never be permitted in any civilized country.
And yet he wants you to set him free so he can continue that kind of experimentation.
He wants you to license him to kill young men and women.
He wants you to suspend the law and give him the right to go on committing murder without fear of punishment.
I have no quarrel with the great army of honest doctors and legitimate scientists who are trying to make life in this world better.
I ask only that you stop this one killer in his tracks, and you must do more than merely find him guilty.
You must make very sure that no way is left for him to squirm his way out of the hangman's noose.
You must deliver this killer not to a court of appeal, but to the hangman's noose.
You must serve notice to the whole world that the law is still supreme, that human life is still a sacred thing, and that murder, even in the name of science, carries the punishment of death.
He killed the boy. He admitted it.
What more do you want?
It's not as though he'd shot him with a gun.
What do we care how he killed him?
The boy agreed to the experiment.
It wasn't murder.
How do we know he did?
Ladies, gentlemen, we're not getting anywhere at this rate.
Let's get your opinions one at a time, and no interruptions.
- Mr. Sutton?
- As a 100% law-abiding citizen,
I say let the law take its course and hang him.
Men like you have blocked progress for hundreds of years.
Mr. Richards?
I don't think Dr. Savaard is guilty of what we ordinarily consider murder.
What do you call it, then?
- Mr. Watkins?
- I say hang him.
I say hang him, too.
- Mrs. Valentine?
- Couldn't we give him life imprisonment?
And have his lawyers turn him loose in a few years?
- Not while I'm on the jury.
- Yeah.
Dr. Avery?
There's absolutely no reason why life functions can't be restored to a body that's not fatally injured or diseased, providing circulation can be restored.
We're not here to discuss theories, Doctor, but to agree on a verdict of guilty.
Or not guilty!
- All in favor of hanging, stand up.
- Right.
- I'm standing.
- Here I stand.
I suppose you'd pin a medal on Savaard for killing that boy, huh?
Hanging's too good for him, anybody with an ounce of brains knows that.
How can you even turn a man like that loose?
It's open and shut.
Ladies and gentlemen of the jury, have you reached a verdict?
We have, Your Honor.
We the jury find the defendant guilty of murder in the first degree, without recommendation for clemency.
Your Honor.
- Your Honor!
- Order!
Before you condemn me to death,
I would like the privilege of addressing this court for two minutes.
Request granted.
I thank you.
You who have condemned me,
I know your kind.
Your forbears poisoned Socrates, burned Joan of Arc, hanged, tortured all those whose only offense was to bring light into darkness.
For you to condemn me in my work is a crime so shameful that the judgment of history will be against you for all the years to come.
You, Mr. Prosecutor, are guilty of murdering not only me, but countless thousands who might have lived, had you not destroyed the only man who could save their lives.
When your last moment comes, always remember that you killed the one man who could have made your life secure.
Although the stupid, unthinking world may approve what you have done, in your heart you know that but for your treachery, the boy you loved would be alive today.
If anyone is responsible for his death, you killed him.
And for that murder you will live and die in the contempt and loathing of your own heart.
When those you love best lie dying, think back to this moment, when you held their salvation in your hands, and threw it away.
Always remember that I offered you life and you gave me death.
That'll be all, Dr. Savaard.
And you who are about to sentence me, after my death you will be overtaken by a punishment far more terrible than anything that you can do to me.
Sentence will be passed on you at 10:00 a.m. next Tuesday, the 15th.
Take him away.
The jury is dismissed. Court adjourned.
Come on, give her a break, will you, boys?
Let her alone.
Tell me more about it.
Here, now.
- It's all so unfair.
- Yeah, it's a rotten shame.
Here's a man who's spent his whole life trying to do nothing but good, and he gets the works because what he did happens to fit the legal definition of a murder.
Do you suppose if I went to the Governor, there'd be a chance for a pardon?
Look, Janet, nobody can do anything today.
So why not shut off the worries?
Sure, I know it's tough, but you've gotta get ahold of yourself, or you'll crack up.
Now, isn't there a nice quiet place you could go where there'd be someone to look out for you? Relatives, maybe?
- My Aunt Lucy lives in Baycrest.
- Why, that's swell.
It'll be close enough to run into town if you're needed, and far enough out to lose the snoopers and curiosity-seekers.
Hey, buddy, drive us to Baycrest.
On the flat rate.
- But my things...
- Send for them.
Right now, you're gonna hide and stay hidden until this thing quiets down.
You've been very nice to me.
Oh, forget it. I charge all this to expenses.
I don't mean the money.
You've been my only real friend through all this trouble.
How do you know it wasn't just a gag to get exclusive stories?
I know better than that now.
Oh, Dad!
Janet, my dear.
You shouldn't have come here.
Now, you mustn't grieve or be unhappy.
Why, you mustn't even think of me as being dead.
I want you to remember me always as being alive and well and happy, just like someone who's gone away on a pleasant journey.
I've given my body to science, dear.
There'll be no funeral, no grave, and no reminder of my passing.
Now, dear, please.
Well, I guess they're about ready to start.
I've seen eight of these hangings, and each one of them gets worse.
We get many requests for bodies from you doctors, but naturally, we can't do anything without consulting the man himself.
This is by his request.
Dr. Savaard, this man says you instructed him to take your body.
- Is that right?
- Of course.
I'm so glad to see you, Dr. Bruchner.
Sorry, gentlemen.
You'll have to keep apart. Prison rules.
Sorry, I did not understand.
Will you sign this release, Dr. Savaard?
I have some very special equipment ready and waiting to perform an interesting experiment,
Doctor.
One that I am sure you would approve of completely.
I approve of anything that is in the interests of science.
Goodbye, Dr. Savaard, and thank you.
And good luck, Dr. Bruchner.
Good evening.
It seems strange to see you in such good spirits, Doctor.
Strange that I should have no fear of dying?
Well, I have lived so long questioning the unknown that this plunge into its depths is only the last and perhaps the greatest of my experiments.
Have you no faith?
As a scientist,
I'm afraid I'm a professional skeptic who doubts everything, even the certainties.
But do you not recognize certain great truths that all men accept?
I've never found one that would bear analysis.
Can't you conceive of a truth too great for the human mind to analyze?
Tonight, no.
But tomorrow
I may know better.
Okay for you boys to go in now.
- Aren't you coming?
- No, thanks.
I can see everything I don't wanna see from here.
It's time to go.
And Dr. Savaard was hanged
at State's Prison
for the scientific murder
of one of his students.
The man of science mounted the scaffold
with a firm step,
betraying no nervousness.
And giving his last message to the world
with a clear voice, said,
"Though my life be taken,
my work will not be left undone."
This is thought to refer to his theories
in the hands of his students,
and not to the so-called death threat
he uttered at the time of his conviction
to the nine men and three women
who condemned him to die.
Sign right here.
Thank you.
Don't try to speak. Don't try to speak.
No pain.
Can't move.
Paralyzed.
No, you're not. You're strapped to the table.
- Where is instrument?
- Broken. It burst under the pressure.
The next one must be much stronger to force open the capillaries closed by rigor mortis.
Is the break in my neck very bad?
Not now. But it took desperate surgery to make the repair.
It would have been impossible, had you not been dead.
Good work, Lang. Congratulations.
I only followed your teachings.
When you stand once more on the platform, the living proof of your own triumph, the whole world will pay you homage.
Never.
When they see, they will have to believe.
They won't come to learn, only to stare.
I'll be a freak in a sideshow.
Lazarus II.
- Fifty cents to look, a dollar to touch.
- Please, Doctor, you must rest.
Yes, I must rest.
Gain strength and power for what I have to do.
Boss, take a look at that.
Yes, it's all been attended to.
"The body of Harley Ross, 40, well-known local businessman,
"was found late last night by police officers.
"No reason was ascribed for the suicide.
"Mr. Ross chose death by hanging himself."
- Well, what about it?
- Well, does it mean anything to you?
- No.
- Well, look at this one.
Two weeks ago, Ramsay Leith, salesman.
Another suicide, also by hanging.
I still don't get the point.
What are you driving at?
Here's another one about Graham Duff.
Hanged himself over a month ago.
Ahead of him was Percy Shore, and here's two more.
Six of them, all by hanging.
So, over a period of time six guys hanged themselves.
- What about it?
- Nothing, boss, nothing.
Except all six of them were on the Savaard jury.
All six were on the...
What?
Somebody's paying off for what happened to Savaard.
And six of the jurors are gone already.
Scoop, drop everything and go to work.
Get hold of all the remaining Savaard jurors.
Get statements, work up the biggest story you can get.
"Is the Savaard curse working?"
Get the DA, the judge, and everybody else he threatened.
- Statements, pictures, the whole works.
- Okay.
And make it weird, make it dramatic.
And make it snappy.
Right.
Hello. Hello.
Funny, none of these people answer.
They can't all be hiding under their beds.
You know, there've been a lot of cases where a curse actually did work out.
Hello, I'd like to speak to Mr. Kearney, please.
He went where? Are you sure?
Thanks.
Kearney's wife said he got a summons from Judge Bowman who tried Savaard, to meet him at Savaard's house.
Maybe that's why none of the others are home.
The Judge probably called them all.
Here, call the rest of these, will you, and see what you can find out.
Long distance, Baycrest, 732.
Yeah, it's official business.
I wanna talk to Janet Savaard.
I can't imagine why
Judge Bowman should call anyone there.
The house is locked up and I've got the keys.
Hold on a minute, will you?
Get ahold of Lieutenant Shane at Headquarters.
Listen, Janet,
I haven't much time to explain, but there's something funny going on out at the house.
No, don't go out there. Stay out of it.
I'll investigate and call you back later.
Goodbye.
Okay. Lieutenant Shane's gone out to Dr. Savaard's house.
That's where I'm going.
If I'm not back for the deadline, call out the Marine.
I'm Mr. Foley.
I'd like to see Judge Bowman, please.
- Have you an invitation, sir?
- No, but I've got a message from his office.
A matter of utmost importance that I must deliver to him immediately in person.
The Judge hasn't arrived yet, sir.
I have strict orders to admit no one without an invitation. Sorry, sir.
Good evening, Your Honor. Remember me?
I'm Scoop Foley of the Tribune.
- Oh, yes, of course.
- What's the meeting for, Judge?
Meeting?
Yes, you called all these people here tonight, didn't you?
Why, no. As a matter of fact,
I received a telegram signed by Janet Savaard, asking me to meet her here on a matter of life and death.
Well, that's funny.
I talked to her just a little while ago, and she didn't know anything about the meeting.
Well, we'll soon find out what this is about.
If this is someone's idea of a practical joke, we'll soon correct their viewpoint.
- I'm Judge Bowman.
- May I see your invitation, please?
You may come in, sir.
I'm sorry, sir. I can't let you in.
Those are my orders.
- I'll give the orders. Let him in.
- Very good, sir.
In there, please.
Good evening, Your Honor.
What's the idea, Judge?
Are we reopening the Savaard case?
- What brought you here?
- A telegram signed by you.
I sent no telegram, issued no orders.
- Good evening, Judge.
- Why, hello, Judge.
Good evening, Judge Bowman.
I presume you've all been called here by messages supposedly sent by me?
- Yes.
- Yeah. I was served with a court order.
- Well, so was I.
- Mine was a wire.
- Mine also.
- I got a wire, too.
Let me see them.
All fakes.
- This is insane.
- Extraordinary.
Get the butler.
No, you don't. You stick around, too.
Evidently, we're the objects of someone's practical joke.
I'll guarantee them very little laughter when we find out who's responsible.
- Well, I hope so.
- Me, too.
Yes, sir?
- Who is your employer?
- I don't know, sir.
Are you trying to tell us you don't know who hired you?
That's right, sir.
We were engaged through the employment agency and given orders to come here with food and service for nine persons.
But who let you in?
A key was sent with our instructions, sir.
We let ourselves in.
- Who else is in this house?
- Nobody, sir.
That is, nobody that we know of.
What were your instructions?
"You will arrive not later than 5:00 p.m.
"Prepare a cold buffet for the following persons,
"who will bear the following identifications."
Everyone named on this list is here.
- That will be all.
- Thank you, sir.
I was supposed to go to a business meeting.
What time did you receive your telegram?
- Oh, about 3:30 or 4:00.
- That's about the time I received mine.
Hello?
I understand. Yes, sir.
Well, if you're smart, you'll scram out of this place faster than you came in.
Six of the Savaard jurors have been killed already, and you're here to get the rub-out as sure as you're alive.
You're crazy.
Okay, wise guy, but I still say scatter, and scatter fast.
- Maybe he's right. Come on.
- No, he's just dreaming up headlines...
Surely you wouldn't leave without speaking to your host?
Judge Bowman,
I can't tell you how glad I am to see you again.
I trust you'll forgive the unauthorized use of your name to effect this little gathering?
You can understand it would have been indiscreet to use my own.
Shane.
And Kearney.
Good evening, Mr. Drake.
Still skeptical, my police surgeon friend?
You can't be Dr. Savaard. He's dead.
As you perhaps know, hanging breaks the neck.
Would you be professionally interested in seeing how it is repaired?
- How did you do it?
- Too long a story to tell you now.
Perhaps, if you're still interested, at dinner with...
You'll join me in a cocktail, won't you?
Dr. Savaard! Alive!
My only regret is that your fiancé is not here as a living proof of his faith in me.
- Well, what do you think now?
- He wouldn't invite us here to kill us.
That'd be sticking his neck out too far.
Yeah?
Well, I've got an uncomfortable hunch that we're the ones behind the eight ball, not Dr. Savaard.
Allow me.
- No.
- Oh, come.
You're not working for me now.
I happen to know you like sherry.
No.
I want to try something.
- Dr. Savaard, my name is Foley.
- I know. Scoop Foley.
The young man who gets into places without an invitation.
Well, that's my job.
Now look, haven't you forgotten some of the jurors?
There was Dr. Avery and...
And Mr. Richards and Miss Forsythe, who fought for over 60 hours in my defense.
I've no need of them here tonight.
- I see. Thanks.
- Not at all.
Won't you join me in a cocktail?
Thanks, no. I never drink.
Well, what'd I tell you?
What can he do?
We outnumber him eight to one.
Well, won't anybody drink with me?
I assure you they're not poisoned.
I'm sorry, Doctor, but my time is limited.
If you have anything to say,
I'll hear you now.
As a matter of fact, Dr. Savaard, we have more business with you than you have with us.
About those six jurors who mysteriously died.
My dear Mr. District Attorney, your law is shockingly bad.
I have the perfect alibi. I am legally dead.
Your business is with the living.
- lf you have nothing to say, I'll be going.
- One moment, please.
I asked you all here because there's a plot afoot against your lives.
That same fiend who killed the six unfortunate jurors plans to take your lives tonight.
Why should you want to protect me?
I'll explain all that at dinner. Shall we go in?
I'm afraid all this is rather informal.
I hope you found your places.
Miss Crawford, you are here on my right.
Allow me.
I thought it best to dispense with the servants, so I dismissed them.
Oh, do sit down, please, all of you.
May I offer you some pheasant, Mr. Shane?
No, thank you.
How were you brought back to life?
I thought I described the method very thoroughly in your courtroom.
Won't you try some pheasant,
Judge Bowman?
Mr. Drake?
Did you know all along you'd be able to do this?
I gambled that my assistant, Lang, could bring me back.
And here I am, not only alive, but beyond the reach of any law.
Six jurors have been killed.
But what public officer would dare suggest that Henryk Savaard was guilty of the crimes when all the world knows that Henryk Savaard is dead?
Did you kill them?
My dear Shane, and if I did, and if I decided to kill all of you tonight, who would believe that I had done it?
Oh, by the way, your place cards are rather amusing.
If you care to glance at them, you'll find something to your disadvantage.
In this corner is a figure which gives you the order in which you are to die tonight.
And in this corner, the exact time.
You will be the first, Judge Bowman, at exactly 7:00.
In fact, you have a trifle less than two minutes to live.
The man's insane!
- Put him under arrest and lock him up.
- Come on.
Judge Bowman, if you attempt to leave this house, it will be the last act of your life.
Judge Bowman, do not leave this house.
Come on.
- He's dead.
- Well, what killed him?
No marks of any kind. Might be heart failure.
The grille's charged with electricity!
You're telling me.
7:00. Right on the dot.
He knew the surest way to drive Bowman into that grille was to forbid him to leave.
Hey, where is Savaard?
Cover the back door, through the kitchen.
Yell if you see anything.
Boilerplate, eh? I ran into the same thing.
The window.
More boilerplate.
Don't look now, but I think we're trapped.
May I have your attention, please?
All the doors and windows
that you can reach have been sealed,
and there is no way
for you to leave this house.
You will now be punished for your disbelief
in the order and the time stated
on your place cards.
Judge Bowman was taken first
out of deference
to the exalted office he adorned.
The foreman of the jury, Clifford Kearney,
who worked so hard to convict me,
will be taken next,
in recognition of his untiring efforts
to secure my death.
It'll do you no good to search for me.
You can never reach me where I am,
but I can and will reach you,
once every 15 minutes.
At 7:15, Mr. Kearney, you will die.
Until then, goodbye, Mr. Kearney.
He can't do this! You gotta protect me!
You've worked in this house, miss.
Where could he get to from here?
Almost anywhere.
Well, he couldn't have gotten through any of the doors.
Isn't there any way to the balcony except the stairway?
Yes, it connects with the back of the house.
Oh, that's blocked. The grille cuts us off.
- I tell you, you gotta get me out of here!
- Take it easy.
Getting panicky is not going to help us any.
If we could get through that grille and reach the front door, one of us could get to a phone and...
Wait a minute.
Look, there's an extension wire.
It runs down on the baseboard and right in here, see?
And across there.
Dead.
I hope you don't think me stupid enough
to leave you any means of calling help.
Can you hear me?
Please don't shout, Mr. Drake.
I can hear and see you perfectly.
- And what is it?
- We'll be missed.
People know where we've gone.
They'll find us.
They'll find you, too, no matter where you go or try to hide.
Aren't you being a little ridiculous,
Mr. District Attorney?
What sane police officer
would dare even whisper
that what they'll find here tonight
might be the work of a dead man?
Oh, no, Mr. Drake, my alibi is perfect.
Have you forgotten?
I was hanged three months ago.
And now, Mr. Kearney, time is flying.
May I draw your attention to the clock?
What time is it? What's the time?
7:10 by my watch.
Only five minutes left.
We've wasted it all by talking.
- Get me out of here! Get me out of here!
- Take it easy.
We gotta protect him somehow.
Now look,
Bowman was tricked into killing himself.
It's a cinch
Savaard isn't coming down here alone to face all eight of us.
Let's get in the middle of the room away from the balcony, away from everything, and form a circle around him.
Now you're talking.
And if he so much as shows his face out of anywhere, I won't miss.
You'd better get inside, too, miss.
No, I'll take my chances out here where I have room.
Well, all right. Join hands, everybody.
Face out and watch your side of the room.
What time is it now?
Can anyone see the clock?
He may turn out the lights.
Don't let go of your neighbor's hand no matter what happens.
Quiet everyone. Don't move, so we can hear if anyone's coming.
I thought you said the phone was dead.
Sometimes you can call in when you can't call out.
- That may be a chance to get help.
- Don't break the circle. It may be a trick.
If it's an outside call, we're throwing our lives right down the sink by not answering it.
Let me loose. I'll answer it, and the rest of you keep the circle.
All right.
Hello?
Who? Mr. Kearney? Yes.
Who's calling, please?
Mr. Cantrell?
Cantrell's my business partner.
He was expecting me at the meeting tonight.
Stay where you are!
Tell him to call the police.
Mr. Cantrell, listen closely.
Call the police and tell them
Dr. Savaard is alive in his house.
He's already killed Judge Bowman, and he's gonna kill the rest of us.
It's on the level, I tell you.
Here, you talk to him and make him believe it.
Mr. Kearney, don't touch that phone.
Don't let him bluff you, Kearney.
Hello, Frank. Listen. Listen to me.
Frank, can you hear me?
What's that? Well, speak louder.
I can't hear you...
- Look at that!
- What is it, a needle?
Must have worked on a spring inside the receiver.
However it worked, it pierced right into his brain through the ear.
Don't touch that point unless you're eager
to leave before your time.
The poison is very active.
You can put the phone back into the drawer.
I'll not need it again this evening.
Miss Elizabeth Crawford.
For your distinguished treachery
that caused two deaths,
you will be the next to die.
Over my dead body.
That is easily arranged, Mr. Shane.
He must be up there somewhere.
You're quite right, Mr. Shane.
But you'll never reach me.
Come on, fellows, give me a hand with that table. Over under the balcony.
Move him out of the way.
Stop where you are.
If you think we're just gonna sit here and take it, you're crazy.
Come on, fellows.
Give me that chair.
Stop! I warn you, don't jump for that railing.
Let me up there. I'm not on his list.
You are now, Mr. Reporter.
I can't leave anyone alive
to tell what happened here tonight.
It's your move, gentlemen.
Stand back, everybody.
Just as I thought.
The railing's loaded with high voltage, too.
Well, that's that.
You're quite correct.
It makes no difference what you do.
You're completely at my mercy.
In 13 minutes Miss Crawford will die.
Goodbye, Miss Crawford.
- What's that?
- Somebody's at the front door.
- It's a trick.
- Suppose it isn't?
Yeah, that's what you said about the phone.
Janet, don't touch that grille.
It's charged with high voltage.
Beat it for the nearest phone and call the police.
Hurry, before it's too late.
Hurry. He's already killed Judge Bowman.
- Killed Judge Bowman?
- Yes, Dr. Savaard. He's alive.
My father? But it can't be.
- We've seen him and talked to him.
- He's trying to kill us one at a time.
- Where is he now?
- Upstairs somewhere.
We can't get at him.
Janet, don't!
Janet, keep away from him.
Dad.
What brought you here?
You are alive.
What brought you here?
Dad, Dad.
Oh, Janet, my darling.
What are you going to do with that gun?
- You must leave here at once.
- Did you kill Judge Bowman?
- He killed himself.
- Dad, why did you do it?
Are you gonna throw this miracle away only for a cheap revenge?
Not revenge, retribution.
But why anything?
Isn't your mere presence alive rebuke enough?
You only have to show yourself and the world will beg your forgiveness.
Not this world of savage cruelty.
We gave them wings to fly, and they rained death on us.
We gave them a voice to be heard around the world, and they preach hatred to poison the minds of nations.
Even the medicine we gave them to ease their pain is turned into a vice to enslave half mankind for the profit of a few.
Oh, Janet dear, don't you see?
Every gift that science has given them has been twisted into a thing of hate and greed.
But not this one.
That instrument is perfect, the secret of eternity.
But it dies with me after I've made them pay for all they made me suffer.
The shame, the months in prison, the hopelessness, the hideous waiting, knowing the exact hour and moment of the end.
Dad, you're not the man that said goodbye to me.
They killed the man I was.
All that's left is the will to hate and to destroy.
Now go.
All right.
Don't try to send for the police to help these people.
It's useless.
Now, those switches control the lower floor, the grille, the railing, the telephone, everything.
And if there's any interference,
I have only to throw that switch to destroy them all instantly.
But after this is over they'll hunt you down, no matter where you hide.
Oh, no, they won't.
All the clues I'm leaving point to Lang.
They'll hunt for him, but they won't find him.
Lang is dead.
You... You killed Lang?
He threatened to expose my plan to destroy these people.
I had to.
- And you'd kill me too if I tried to interfere.
- Oh, Janet.
You're the only thing in my life that's never hurt me.
You've never brought me anything but happiness.
I don't want anything to hurt you, ever.
- So go away from here, away from me.
- No, I'm not going.
Janet, I have no time.
You must go now, or stay here till the end.
I'm not going.
Then stay out of my way until this is over.
Dad, you don't know what you're doing.
- Janet, you must. You must.
- Dad, wait, wait!
Let me out! Let me out! Let me out!
So, you thought you could escape me by turning out the lights, huh?
So, there you are.
You make a beautiful target, Miss Crawford.
What have you done with Janet?
She's perfectly safe. I only kill my enemies.
In just a few seconds,
the clock will begin to strike.
No!
Let me out! Let me out!
Dad, come and let me out!
Let me out!
Dad, let me out!
Please come and let me out!
Please let me out! Dad, let me out!
Let me out!
Oh, I can't stand it!
- Are you all right?
- I'm all right.
Nice going, kid.
I wanted to spare you all this, Janet.
- You'll go now?
- Yes.
It's better that way. Goodbye.
Go, dear.
You will please not endanger my daughter's safety by making any foolish appeals.
I am sending her away to spare her
any unnecessary shock or pain.
- Are you all right?
- She's quite unharmed.
Miss Savaard, when you get out, call my office, tell them what's happening.
My daughter may call anyone,
because her discovery
of what is happening here
has made it necessary for me
to change my plans.
I can no longer wait
and to kill you one by one.
As soon as she is out of this house
and her car has left the driveway,
I'll end this matter for all of you at once.
Janet, get away before he changes his mind.
- We'll get out of here somehow.
- We'll be all right.
Your pity is wasted, Janet.
Nothing can save them.
- Dad, can you see me?
- I can see every move you make.
- Dad, can you see my hand?
- Yes.
I'm going to open this grille.
Janet, don't touch that grille!
You only have to throw a switch to save my life.
- I'm going to open this grille.
- Don't! Don't!
What happens now is for you to decide.
The juice is off. Break through the grille.
- How does it open? Get a light, somebody.
- I got a flashlight.
Hold it so I can see.
This time I'm not gonna let go for anybody.
- Save Janet.
- She's beyond saving, thanks to you.
Get her upstairs. The laboratory.
The heart will save her.
- Do as he says.
- Yeah, let's go.
The heart's picking up.
It's getting stronger.
Turn off the machine.
Disconnect.
Sterilize.
Bandage her arm.
- Is she all right?
- Yes. It's a miracle.
Believe now, Doctor?
- Dad.
- It's all right, Janet.
You're through the faint of the excitement.
Take her away. She must rest.
We better call an ambulance. He'll need it.
I'll do it. You stick here.
Drake.
- Get Dr. Stoddard.
- Sure.
Dr. Savaard! Don't!
Why did you destroy it?
[Ship Horn Blowing]
Mr. Hogan. Mr. Hogan!
Derelict afloat with a man on board.
- [Hogan] Whereabouts?
- Off your port bow.
[Hogan]
Right.
- Get ahold of him, boys?
- Ah, we've got him. We've got him.
[Men Grunting]
- Want to salvage that boat?
- No.
Take him to my cabin.
Ruth! Ruth!
Ruth!
Easy, old man.
Easy, easy, easy.
[Exhales]
[Sighs]
What ship is this?
The Covena. Trading ship.
We picked you up adrift.
Oh, yeah. I remember.
- Where's she bound?
- Apia.
Apia?
[Chuckles]
I'm in luck.
Luck?
Yeah.
That's where - where I was bound when - when my ship went down.
- Yeah. The Lady Vain, wasn't it?
- Yeah.
Yeah, we picked up her S.O.S.
Then you - you got a wireless aboard?
Yeah.
Will you send a message for me?
Sure, sure.
But you'd better make it short.
You've got a lot of resting to do.
[Groans]
Thanks.
- I suppose it's to Ruth?
- How'd you know her name?
I've heard nothing else for the last two hours.
She's my fiancée.
We're going to be married in Apia.
- Miss Ruth, uh -
- Thomas. Continental Hotel.
What's the message?
Tell her I was picked up by this boat and when we expect to arrive.
Also that I'm all right - thanks to you, Doctor.
You are a doctor, aren't you?
Yes.
At least I was... once upon a time.
- [Dogs Barking]
- [Animals Growling]
[Crowd Chattering]
- What's up, old chap?
- Bulletin on the wreck - Lady Vain.
Oh. Oh, yes.
- [Man] Say, let's go see this.
- [Excited Chattering]
[Crowd Chattering In Foreign Language]
[Men Chattering In English]
Good afternoon.
Be very careful.
[Man]
I leave at dawn.
[Woman]
Miss Thomas! Miss Thomas!
Oh, right here.
- For me?
- Radiogram.
Thank you.
- How do you feel?
- How do I look?
- Better.
- That's the way I feel.
A little turn around the deck will do you good.
Not a bad idea.
[Animal Growling]
[Dog Barking]
[Growling]
[Screeching]
You know,
I thought I heard those things.
Say, what is this, a floating zoo?
[Doctor]
Well, yes, in a way.
[Barking]
Morning, Captain.
- I want to thank you, Captain, for -
- Who are you?
Uh, Mr. Parker, this is Captain Davies.
- How do you do -
- Parker? Parker?
Yeah, we picked him up day before yesterday.
- Why wasn't I told about it?
- Well, we tried to wake you.
- Well, why didn't you?
- You had a slight list to port.
- What do you mean?
- You were drunk.
Drunk, was I?
Well, why wouldn't I be, with a cargo like I got?
- Cargo is cargo.
- Yeah, I know.
But this boatload of filthy animals -
All the way from Mombasa to where?
To some island. Which island?
You answer me that, Mr. Montgomery.
- You're well paid for it.
- [Grunts] Yeah.
An island without a name.
An island not on the chart.
Hey, you think I don't know whose island that is, don't you?
- Well, I do, Mr. Sawbones Montgomery.
- Easy, Captain.
Well, it's Dr. Moreau's island.
Dr. Moreau's island, and it stinks all over the whole South Seas!
Superstitious South Seas gossip!
Dr. Moreau is a brilliant man and a great scientist.
Great scientist, huh?
Well, if you ask me, he's a black-handed, grave-robbin' ghoul.
That's what he is.
[Laughing]
Oh, what's the use?
You're drunk.
Yeah.
[Chuckles]
Hey, what'd you say?
- Nothing.
- Well, that's all right then.
[Dogs Whining]
[Whining, Whimpering]
Hey, what do you got there?
- Slop for dogs.
- Slop?
Ain't there enough slop on this deck already?
[Montgomery]
M'ling, get out.
Yeah, before I -
Go on.
[Dogs Barking]
So I'm drunk, am I?
Only a drunken man would do a thing like that.
That means trouble.
[Barking Continues]
There now. You're all right.
- [Growling]
- M'ling!
[Dogs Barking]
Go forward and stay forward.
Say, who is that fella?
My servant. That's all.
Hey, look here, Parker. You'd better get out of sight and stay out.
There'll be plenty of trouble when he comes to.
Easy, Captain.
- [Boat Motor Rumbling]
- [Dogs Barking]
[Man Shouting, Indistinct]
Get it off of there!
Overboard with the whole spittin' mess of 'em.
Lower away!
- [Barking Continues]
- [Captain] Here it is!
[Captain Shouts]
- Hey, is that Moreau over there?
- Yeah.
Say, what is all this mystery about, uh, Moreau and his island?
I don't know.
If I did know, maybe I'd want to forget.
Hogan!
Mr. Hogan!
- Are we all free and clear?
- All clear, sir.
- All right. Cast off!
- Cast off!
- [Sailor] All right! Cast off!
- Get up there and clear that line off.
There you are, Dr. Moreau.
That's the last of 'em... and this is the last time
I'll ever put in here... forevermore!
Amen!
[Barking Continues]
[Sailors Shouting]
Well, you're gettin' off here.
No, I'm getting off at Apia.
You're gettin' off here.
Cast off that line there.
Now hurry it up.
Now, what's happened?
What is it?
It's all right, old boy.
He fell overboard.
On deck!
On deck! Hey!
- You lost a man.
- Well, finders keepers.
[Laughing]
Full speed ahead, Hogan!
What's that fool talking about?
- Pull up that ladder, men!
- Aye, aye.
Drop that ladder!
I've got to get to Apia!
You can swim, can't ya?
Davies, take this man with you!
You can't do this, Captain.
There's marine law.
This man is shipwrecked.
You've got to pick him up.
Well, I picked him up and I dropped him in my first port of call.
That's all that's required of me!
I can't have this man!
I can't have him aboard.
Well, throw him overboard.
That's what I did.
[Laughing]
- Davies!
- Hey, Davies, drop that ladder!
[Ship Horn Blows]
This is most unfortunate.
It is indeed.
I simply must get to Apia.
I don't see how. We sight a ship about once in a 1 2-month.
Uh, Mr. Parker, Dr. Moreau.
- How do you do?
- How do you do?
Well, Mr. Parker, you may take
Montgomery and the schooner... and leave for Apia in the morning.
That's very nice. Thank you.
Not at all.
I'm happy to be of service.
Montgomery's a fair sort of sailor.
And I can give you enough of a crew.
Ouran! Gola!
Get away from those cages!
Come on now.
Let's unload this stuff.
The dogs first, then the monkeys and then the cages.
Hurry it up.
I'll stay with Parker tonight on the schooner.
No. I'm taking him up to the house.
Mr. Parker.
- [Parker] Yes.
- You can't do that.
I've got something in mind.
Mr. Parker?
- Would you come with me, please?
- Surely.
[Dogs Barking]
[Sailors Chattering]
You understand, Mr. Parker, you are an uninvited guest.
Certainly.
You may perhaps find our domain rather strange.
I shall have to rely upon your caution while you're here... and your silence when you're gone.
- You understand that?
- Of course, Doctor.
- [Whip Cracks]
- [Fearful Howl]
[Chuckles]
Limestone formation.
Curious, isn't it?
This was once the crater of a volcano.
Extraordinarily fertile this volcanic dust.
Seeds blown here by the wind and brought here by birds.
See the result.
[Whip Cracks]
[Grunts]
Don't be alarmed, Mr. Parker.
You're quite expert with that whip, aren't you, Doctor?
It's a hobby of mine. I learned how to handle one as a boy in Australia.
There's my house.
[Gate Slides Shut]
[Quiet Growling]
[Growls]
Strange-looking natives you have here.
You'll be wanting a cold shower,
I take it, before dinner.
[Growling Continues]
Oh, an excellent brandy, Montgomery.
I hope you brought plenty.
Then, of course, you did.
Montgomery is a man to trust,
Mr. Parker... especially in the selection and the ordering of your liquors.
M'ling, you may take everything.
[Humanlike Groaning]
- [Cup Rattles]
- [Groaning Continues]
Yes.
You are a man of discretion,
Mr. Parker.
I hope so.
And now, if you'll excuse us, there are cigarettes.
- M'ling, brandy for Mr. Parker.
- Nothing more, thank you.
That'll be all, M'ling.
You may go. l, uh, should much prefer,
Mr. Parker... that you don't leave this room.
Your wish, Doctor.
I had my reasons for keeping you sober.
Go to the laboratory.
You'll see what's to be done.
You're not going?
- I'm taking her to Parker.
- Lota to Parker?
Why do you suppose
I brought him to the house?
He's seen too much already.
But she's never seen anything like him.
- No?
- You and I don't count.
The only reactions we get from her are fear and terror.
Hmm. That's understandable.
But how will she respond to Parker where there's no cause for fear?
Will she be attracted?
Is she capable of being attracted?
Has she a woman's emotional impulses?
I'd scarcely hoped for a chance like this short of London.
## [Low Humming]
Lota. Lota.
Come here.
## [Humming]
Lota. I've taught you many things.
Yes?
- All that you know I've taught you.
- Yes.
Mm-hmm.
I'm going to let you learn something for yourself.
A man has come from the sea.
I will take you to him... let you talk with him.
- Yes?
- Mmm.
I'm going to leave you alone with him... and you may talk with him about anything you please... about the world he comes from.
But you must say nothing about me... nothing about the Law... nothing about the House of Pain.
- Do you understand me?
- Yes.
Then come along with me.
[Animal Growling]
[Lota Gasps]
Get out!
Get out, I said!
[Chuckling]
It's all right.
Go in, Lota.
- This is Mr. Parker, Lota.
- How do you do?
Don't be afraid.
How... do you do?
Mr. Parker has come to us from over the sea.
She's a pure Polynesian... the only woman on the entire island.
Well, I'll leave you two young people together.
I've got work to do.
Won't you sit down?
Cigarette?
No.
- I thank you.
- You're welcome.
You'll have to pardon me because... this is all very strange to me.
What island are you from? Tahiti?
Samoa?
I mean, where is your home?
Home?
This my home.
I know, but you're not a native of this island.
I know because I've seen some of them.
How does it happen that you're the only woman on this island?
Did, uh, Dr. Moreau bring you here?
Pardon me if I seem to be too inquisitive.
Moreau!
Quickly, please!
What now?
You come from the sea?
Well, rather.
Three days on an upturned lifeboat.
You go away?
Tomorrow morning.
I wish you would not go away.
Well, that's very nice of you, but...
I must.
You come back... again?
Well, I - I don't know.
[Screaming, Groaning]
[Groaning Continues]
- What's that?
- It's the House - the House of Pain!
[Loud Groaning]
No! No!
- It's nothing! It's nothing.
- [Groaning Continues]
Nothing?
Somebody's being tortured.
- [Groaning]
- Get out!
Get out!
They're vivisecting a human being.
They're cutting a living man to pieces.
Now I know about his natives.
They're his victims.
You and I may be next.
Come on. Let's get out of here.
Other gate!
We'll take Moreau's boat and get away from here tonight - now.
[Beast Man]
Sea! Sea!
- [Lota Gasps]
- [Growling]
Man from sea! Man from sea!
[All Growling, Groaning]
Lota!
[Beast Men Shouting]
[All Growling]
- [Hooting]
- Stop!
Stop!
- What? What?
- Man from sea.
- They are like us!
- They are like him.
One is not man.
[Others Growling, Muttering]
[Gong Clangs]
[Shrieking, Hooting]
[Beast Men Fall Silent]
[Whip Cracks]
What is the Law?
Not to run on all fours.
That is the Law.
Are we not men?
[Beast Men, Growling Voices]
Are we not men?
- [Whip Cracks]
- What is the Law?
Not to eat meat.
That is the Law.
Are we not men?
[Beast Men]
Are we not men?
[Whip Cracks]
What is the Law?
Not to spill blood.
That is the Law.
Are we not men?
[Beast Men]
Are we not men?
His is the hand that makes.
[Beast Men]
His is the hand that makes.
[Sayer Of The Law]
His is the hand that heals!
[Beast Men]
His is the hand that heals.
His is the House of Pain!
[Beast Men]
His is the House of Pain.
[Excited Shouting]
I didn't think, after my warning, you'd be idiotic enough to leave the house.
Now I can understand why you and your island... stink from one end of the South Seas to the other.
What makes your natives such monstrosities?
I saw you vivisecting a man.
My dear young fool, you're entirely mistaken.
Well, you can't get away with it in my case, Moreau.
Take it.
I'm now unarmed, and you're fully protected.
It's quite evident, isn't it, that I mean you no harm?
[Chuckles] Would you be good enough to come to the house?
Lota.
Lota, go to your room.
[Lock Turns]
I started with plant life in London 20 years ago.
I took an orchid, and upon it I performed a miracle.
I stripped a hundred thousand years of slow evolution from it... and I had no longer an orchid... but what orchids will be a hundred thousand years from now.
That's one there.
Yes, but how, Doctor?
[Laughs] By a slight change in the single unit of a germ plasm.
It was as simple as that.
That's a common lily.
That's a chrysanthemum.
That's unfortunately what happened to some asparagus.
[Laughing]
I went on with this research just as it led me.
I let my imagination run fantastically ahead.
Why not experiment with the more complex organisms?
- [Pounding Whip Handle]
- [Roaring]
[Laughs]
Man is the present climax of a long process of organic revolution.
All animal life is tending toward the human form.
[Laughs] I was still in London when l began this phase of my experiments.
One day a dog escaped from my laboratory... ran shrieking into the street.
And I left London, Mr. Parker... the newspapers at my heels, an aroused England crying for my blood.
I picked up Montgomery and brought him along.
He was a medical student facing a prison term for a professional indiscretion.
That was 1 1 long years ago.
Eleven long years
I've worked and I've worked.
[Gasps]
With plastic surgery, blood transfusions... gland extracts, with ray baths.
[Chuckles] With what
I have discovered in my own work... among the cellular organisms.
My work, my discoveries.
- Mine alone.
- [Beast Man Groaning]
With these I have wiped out hundreds of thousands of years of evolution.
From the lower animals,
I have made -
[Groaning Continues]
Well, see for yourself, Mr. Parker.
[Groaning]
[Groaning Louder]
You're convinced that this thing on the table isn't human.
Its cries are human.
- You know what it is that I began with?
- No.
- An animal.
- An animal?
- Mm-hmm.
- Like those in the cages outside?
Then those - those creatures out in the jungle?
Are my creations.
- They were made from animals?
- Yes.
Was this thing, this poor, tortured creature -
What does that matter?
Of all things vile!
Mr. Parker, spare me these youthful horrors, please.
And those - those poor things out there in the jungle - those animals -
They - They talk.
That was my first great achievement - articulate speech controlled by the brain.
That was an achievement.
Oh, it takes a long time and infinite patience... to make them talk.
[Chuckles] Someday,
I'll create a woman, and it'll be easier.
Those are some of my less successful experiments.
They supply the power to create others... more successful.
But with each experiment,
I improve upon the last.
I get nearer and nearer.
Mr. Parker.
Do you know what it means to feel like God?
[Chuckles]
I'm talking too much, aren't I?
- Good night, Mr. Parker.
- Good night.
- You know the way to your room?
- Yes, thanks.
I hope you sleep well.
Thanks.
Good night.
Did you see that, Montgomery?
She was tender, like a woman.
How that little scene spurs the scientific imagination onward.
I wonder how much of Lota's animal origin is still alive... how nearly a perfect woman she is.
It's possible I may find out... with the aid of Mr. Parker.
You won't have much time if he leaves for Apia in the morning.
Wouldn't it be a great loss to science if he left for Apia in the morning?
[Montgomery]
Four with a fair wind.
- I want to thank you, Doctor, for -
- Not at all.
I'm only too happy to have been of service to you.
Yes, but I do appreciate what you're doing for -
Oh! Oh, this is most distressing.
I - I don't know what to say about it.
I can't account for it.
Unless, of course, the natives.
They were a bit out of hand last night.
- [Man] ...good time!
- [Man #2] You said it, mate!
[Chattering, Laughing]
- [Man] Come on, you guys.
- [Man #2] Hello! Welcome home!
- Hello, darlin'! How you been?
- Hello, baby!
- Did you miss me?
- Did I miss ya?
Pardon me. Excuse me, please.
Didn't you have a Mr. Parker on board?
- Parker?
- Yes.
Oh. You better talk to the skipper.
Let's go.
Now, men, stay sober.
Any drinking to be done,
I'll do it myself.
- [Man] Okay, Captain!
- [Men Laughing]
And if you get in a fight, send for me.
[Men Chattering]
- Oh, Captain.
- Hello there, baby.
Captain, didn't you have a Mr. Parker on board?
- Parker?
- Yes.
No.
But won't I do?
Didn't you rescue him from the Lady Vain?
He sent me a wireless from your ship.
Oh, yes. He got off at my first port of call.
At what port?
That's my business.
Maybe the American consul will make it his business.
Well, give the consul my regards.
You knew this man wanted to come to Apia, didn't you?
Well, I rescued him at sea and dropped him off at my first port of call.
- That's all that's required of me, sir.
- What port?
- Well, it was an island, sir.
- What island?
Latitude 1 5 degrees south and longitude 1 70 west, sir.
1 -5 south, 1 -7-0 west.
It's very small, sir.
You won't find it on the charts.
Then it isn't a port.
Well, it's an island, sir.
I dropped some cargo there.
Oh, I see.
That'll be all for the present.
Yes, sir.
If I find any irregularity in this,
I'll have your license revoked.
Yes, sir.
You wouldn't like that, would you?
- No, sir.
- I didn't think you would.
Yes, sir.
[Door Closes]
- Yes, sir!
- [Consul] How are you, Captain?
Miss Thomas, this is Captain Donahue.
- How do you do?
- How do you do, miss?
- When will you be ready to sail?
- I'm ready now, sir.
You'll find Donahue's boat perfectly safe, but not very comfortable.
I've worked it all over.
Are you clear on the position?
Yes - 1 5 south and 1 70 west.
Okay.
- Well, good luck.
- Thank you.
- Thank you so much.
- Not at all.
Very glad to be of service to you.
Lota.
You startled me.
You're a strange child.
Talk to me.
Not now.
Talk to me.
Lota, do you know what this is?
- Book.
- Yes. Book.
From Dr. Moreau's library.
About electricity - wireless telegraphy, radio... how to build a shortwave transmitter.
Of course, you haven't the faintest idea what I'm talking about, have you?
Talk to me more.
All right.
I'll tell you something you will understand.
Lota, I must get away from this island.
Book... take you away?
Maybe book take me away.
[Parker]
Lota!
[Parker]
Why did you do that?
[Lota]
Book take you away.
Lota.
I'm in love with someone else.
I should've told you.
Love?
[Lota Gasps]
Lota.
- Moreau, you don't deserve to live!
- I beg your pardon?
Those creatures out there in the jungle were horrible enough.
But to have created a thing as tragic as that girl.
- [Tea Pouring]
- Lota?
Yes. Lota.
An animal with a woman's emotions - a woman's heartbreak, a woman's suffering.
Oh, it's criminal!
Hmm. You're an amazingly unscientific young man.
I could've overlooked those others.
I could've shown you that much consideration.
But not now.
Now I'll expose you to the world for what you really are, Moreau.
When are you leaving?
I think you'd better sit down and make yourself comfortable.
- Would you care for a cup of tea?
- No, thank you.
Well, we may as well discuss this frankly now that you know the facts.
Lota is my most nearly perfect creation.
I was thinking of taking her with me as Exhibit "A"... on a triumphal return to London.
I wanted to prove how completely she was a woman - whether she was capable of loving, mating and having children.
She was afraid of Montgomery and myself.
Then you came.
Well, she was very much attracted to you.
You can see, of course, the possibilities that presented themselves.
I'll tell you this, Moreau!
You'll make arrangements for me to leave this island somehow... and as quickly as possible.
Or this great scientific work you've been doing will stop.
How did he find out?
What did you say to him?
What did you do to let him know?
What is it, Moreau?
The stubborn beast flesh creeping back.
Well, it's no use, Montgomery.
I may as well quit.
Day by day, it creeps back.
It creeps back.
[Sobbing]
You see this?
[Lota Whimpering, Crying]
The first of them all to shed tears.
She is human!
I'm not beaten!
[Laughing]
Get everything ready.
For what?
This time, I'll burn out all the animal in her!
No!
[Whimpers]
[Moreau]
I'll make her completely human.
No, no.
- No. No!
- [Moreau Laughing]
I'll keep Parker here.
He's already attracted.
[Crying]
Time and monotony will do the rest.
- [Whimpering]
- [Moreau Laughing]
Gola! Gola!
- Huh?
- Boat come!
Man. One not man.
- One not man?
- One like Lota.
Hello in there!
I guess it's all right.
- You afraid?
- No. Of course not.
All right.
I just asked out of politeness.
Look!
You see some funny sights in these islands.
That jungle don't look any too inviting.
We must go on.
We've got to find him.
All right.
But I'd just as soon leave it for somebody else to do... if there was anybody else here to do it.
[Screeching]
[Screeching Continues]
You know, there's a bird in these jungles - kind of a parrot, laughs like a man.
They call 'im a Laughing Jackass.
[Laughs]
Funny name for a bird.
I don't know, when you figure out he laughs like a man... that's not such a funny name after all.
You're taking a very long time,
Montgomery.
There's a short circuit here somewhere.
M'ling!
- They come on boat!
- Who?
- People.
- People?
Two. One like Lota.
Dr. Moreau!
Dr. Moreau! Doctor!
Dr. Moreau!
- Boat come. People.
- People?
- Man and one like Lota.
- What?
Parker sent a wireless to Apia from Davies's ship.
Hello there.
[Screams]
Ouran.
We're looking for a man named Parker -
Edward Parker.
Oh, won't you come in?
Yeah. Thanks.
I'm Dr. Moreau.
This is my house. You're very welcome.
Oh, thank you, Doctor.
I'm Ruth Thomas.
- And this is Captain Donahue.
- How are ya, Doc?
- How do you do? Go right in.
- Thank you.
Nice little place you got here, Doc.
It serves its purpose.
Ruth!
Oh.
Ouran.
All right, Ouran.
[Lock Turns]
I may not need Parker.
This is Captain Donahue.
He was good enough to bring me here.
- How do you do, Captain?
- Fine, thanks. How are you?
[Moreau]
So you found him.
You know, I - I'd imagined Edward in some terrible place.
But this is charming.
I'll get my things, and we'll be on our way.
It's getting late.
- You'll pardon me, Doctor?
- [Moreau] Not at all.
- Won't you come in and wait?
- Thank you.
What kind of a place did you say this was, Doc?
- I didn't say.
- Oh.
It's an experimental station, of a sort, for bio-anthropological research.
Oh, I see.
[Montgomery]
Lota.
House of Pain.
No.
No House of Pain.
I promise that.
There's no twilight in the tropics.
Night falls like a curtain.
Thank you, M'ling.
- Would you care for a highball,
Miss Thomas?
- No, thank you.
- Captain Donahue, I suppose you'll -
- I'll take mine straight.
I thought so.
Whoa. That'll do. Thanks.
- Mr. Parker?
- No, thanks. We'll be going now.
Aren't you being a little rash,
Mr. Parker?
- Rash?
- Come on, Donahue.
You have a mile to go through my jungle.
- Yes, I realize that.
- [Donahue] We're not afraid.
I can see, Captain Donahue, that you would be afraid of nothing.
But Mr. Parker had one experience at night in my jungle.
I have no wish to frighten you,
Miss Thomas... but if Mr. Parker chooses to put you in what he knows to be real danger... it will be his responsibility.
Couldn't you send someone -
If you care to accept the hospitality of my house... you can leave in complete safety in the morning.
Well, perhaps that would be better.
Captain Donahue, you can share Mr. Parker's room.
Miss Thomas, you can have my room.
[Gong Chimes]
M'ling. Dinner will be for five.
[Moreau Murmurs]
[Moreau]
No wine, Montgomery?
No.
Extraordinary.
My regards, Captain Donahue.
Here's mud in your eye, Doc.
Doc, I see you're a vegetarian.
It's on account of the natives.
They've never tasted meat.
No long pig?
"Long pig"?
He means human flesh, Miss Thomas.
Oh.
[Beast Men Chanting, Indistinct]
What's that?
The natives.
They have a curious ceremony.
Mr. Parker's witnessed it.
Tell us about it, Edward.
Oh, it's - it's nothing.
They are restless tonight.
[Gasps]
What is it, dear?
Oh, uh, nothing.
[Chuckles Uneasily]
Don't pay any attention to me.
A little more claret, Captain Donahue?
Eh, don't mind if I do.
M'ling, fill up Captain Donahue's glass.
[Clears Throat]
Whoa, whoa. Whoa. That'll do.
- Well.
- Skoal!
- Good night, Doc. That sure was swell wine.
- Thank you.
- [Ruth] Good night, Dr. Moreau.
- Good night, Miss Thomas.
- [Parker] Good night.
- [Moreau] Good night.
Whoa!
[Donahue]
Say, it's a good thing I ain't a drinkin' man.
You did very well for yourself tonight.
Oh, you oughta see me when I'm real -
Yes, I - I have a rough idea.
I remember one night down in Mombasa -
Captain, uh, that's our room over there.
Oh, sure.
- Good night, Miss Thomas.
- Good night.
Don't be frightened, dear.
I'll be just across the hall.
Oh, I'm all right.
What's there to be afraid of?
- Good night.
- Good night.
- Better lock your door.
- Now don't you worry.
I'll be all right.
If you need me, call.
Good night.
[Bar Grating]
- [Bar Grating]
- [Gasps]
[Screaming]
[Screaming Continues]
[Whimpering, Screaming]
Ruth! What is it?
[Gunshot]
[Parker]
Quick!
You'd better get dressed, dear.
Ouran tried to break into her room -
Miss Thomas's room.
- But I suppose you know that.
- I heard a scream and some shots.
And that's all you know, is it?
You didn't want it to happen, of course.
That isn't what you meant when you said that you might not need Parker?
Will you mind your own business?
I know you too well and too long, Moreau.
I've stood for anything.
I have stood for plenty.
But not this.
You're insane to even think of it, and I'm through with you here and now.
Are you going back to England... to prison?
I'd prefer it.
Same one that peeked out through the bushes this afternoon?
Yes. It was horrible.
We're no safer here than in the jungle.
I'd advise the jungle.
I'm sure Miss Thomas would be safer there.
I'm going to the ship and get my crew.
We'll stop this.
- Come with me a minute.
- I don't like your taking this risk.
I've been in tighter places than this, and the old head is still on its hinges.
- Here. You may need this.
- No, no. I'm already heeled.
I'll take that lantern.
That might come in handy.
Here. Here's the key to the front gate.
Well, here goes nothin'.
[Footsteps]
Ouran.
I want you to follow him and put your hands around his throat until -
- [Ouran] The Law.
- It's all right tonight.
[Beast Men Growl]
[Donahue]
Get back there!
Get back!
Thanks, Montgomery.
You must have a pretty good reason for helping us.
I have.
I'm going with you.
[Beast Men Growling]
Get back! Get back!
[Screeching, Whimpering]
[Donahue Gasping, Choking]
[Beast Men Screeching]
Ouran kill!
Ouran spill the blood!
[Beast Men Clamoring]
[Sayer Of The Law]
What is the Law?
Not to spill blood!
Are we not men?
[Beast Men]
Are we not men?
You broke the Law.
[Ouran]
Law no more.
[Beast Men]
Law no more?
Law no more?
You spill blood.
He tell me spill blood.
What is the Law?
[Ouran]
Law no more!
[Beast Men Clamoring]
[Sayer Of The Law]
What is the Law?
[Beast Men]
Law no more!
- Moreau -
- [Beast Men Muttering]
- [Beast Men Muttering] Law no more!
- They're more than usually restless tonight.
[Muttering Continues]
Where's Captain Donahue?
[No Audible Dialogue]
[Beast Men Clamoring]
He is man like him?
Man like him.
Man dead.
Dead.
He can die?
He can die.
He can die!
[Beast Men]
He can die!
[Beast Men Clamoring, Shouting]
[Clamoring Continues]
They're quite out of hand tonight.
[Clamoring Continues]
He can die!
Dr. Moreau! Dr. Moreau!
They come! They come to kill!
- Where's Captain Donahue?
- Dead.
- Give me the whip.
- Don't be a fool, Moreau. Come on inside.
You afraid?
Lock the gates if you are.
I'm going to meet them.
M'ling. The faithful dog.
[Clamoring Continues]
[Clamoring]
He can die!
[Gong Clangs]
[Clamoring Subsides]
[Gong Clangs]
[Whip Cracks]
What is the Law?
Law... no more.
[Whip Cracks]
What is the Law?
Not to spill blood.
He tell me spill blood.
What is the Law?
[Sayer Of The Law]
Law no more!
[Beast Men]
Law no more!
[Beast Men Clamoring]
Law no more!
Law no more!
[Clamoring Continues]
Law no more!
Come on, Montgomery.
Leave it open in case he wants to run for it.
We'll try the back way.
Quick. They're coming.
Lota.
- Lota.
- We can't leave her.
Wait here.
[Clamoring]
Have you forgotten the House of Pain?
[Murmuring]
You! You made us in the House of Pain!
[Beast Men Groaning, Clamoring]
You made us... things!
[Beast Men]
Things!
Not men!
[Beast Men]
Things!
Not beasts!
[Beast Men]
Things!
Part man!
Part beast!
Things!
Things! Things!
- Part man!
- Part beast!
- Beasts!
- Part man!
Part man! Part beast!
- [Clamoring]
- Part man!
[Clamoring Continues]
[Clamoring]
[Clamoring Continues In Distance]
[Clamoring]
Stop, you - Fools!
This is the House of Pain!
[Beast Men Growling]
[Sayer Of The Law]
Stop! Stop!
The House of Pain!
[Clamoring]
Pain! Pain!
[Both Gasping, Choking]
[Choking]
[Lota Screams]
[Montgomery]
What was that?
Where's Lota?
[Clamoring In Distance]
You... go back... to sea.
She's done for.
- Come on.
- We'll take her to the sea.
It's better that we leave her here.
The fire will soon destroy all of Moreau's work.
[Clamoring]
Hah! Little knives!
Knives!
[Moreau Whimpering, Groaning]
[Moreau Screaming]
[Screaming Continues]
Don't look back.
Hold it!
Ten. 20.
Did you hear about
Mrs Mason's little Willy?
Sent him to school and found him buried ten foot deep in a snowdrift.
- How did they get him out?
- Brought the fire engine round.
Put the hose pipe in, pumped it backwards and sucked him out.
Perfect bull's-eye.
I want a room and a fire.
- Jenny?
- Hello?
There's a gent here what wants a room and a fire.
What, a room?
I said a room.
We ain't got none ready, not at this time of year.
We don't usually have folks stopping, except in the summer.
You can get one ready.
Certainly, sir. Millie!
Yes?
- I want a private sitting room, too.
- Certainly, sir.
Will you come through, sir? This way, sir.
It's the coldest winter we've had down here for years.
They put all the sheep and the cows in for a fortnight now.
Poor things. They can't get a blade of green grass.
You may be near-sighted, but you can't be deaf-and-dumb as well.
Could I take your coat and hat, sir, and give 'em a nice dry in the kitchen?
No.
- I prefer to keep them on.
- Very good, sir.
The room will be warm soon.
I've got some luggage at the station.
How can I have it sent?
I'll get it dropped over tomorrow.
Are you staying a bit?
Yes.
- Is there no way of getting it tonight?
- Not tonight, sir.
Very well.
Bring me some food.
Right away, sir.
If you ask me, he's a criminal flying from justice.
Go on. He's snow-blind, that's what he is.
Has to wear goggles to save his eyes.
Anyway, you be careful, and lock your money up.
A bottle of Bass, Herbert.
Here you are, dear.
I hope he'll be a bit more communicative this time.
Your supper's there.
Is there a key to that door?
A key, sir? Ooh, I haven't ever seen one.
I don't think there was one when we came here.
I want to be left alone, and undisturbed.
I'll see that no one disturbs you, sir.
The mustard, ma'am.
You'll be the death of me with your slowness.
You let me take his supper in and forget the mustard.
And him wanting to be left alone!
There she goes again.
I told you not to disturb me.
It's only the mustard, sir. I forgot it.
- I'm sorry.
- Thank you.
Have you been motoring on them slippery roads, sir?
You can take my overcoat and dry it.
Very good, sir.
- Leave the hat.
- Yes, sir.
Bandages, right up to the top of his head.
All round his ears.
- Any blood?
- No. No blood.
Looks like some kind of 'orrible accident.
Bumped his head on the prison wall gettin' over.
Father.
I wish you'd leave me alone,
Flora, when I'm working.
I can't bear it. We've got to do something.
- Do something? What about?
- About Jack.
He'll come back. Don't you worry.
Father, please put that horrid thing down and listen.
It's nearly a month now, without a word.
But the note he left was quite clear.
He said we might not hear for a while.
It's good to go away when you're finishing a difficult experiment.
- What kind of experiment is it, Father?
- Something of his own.
I had a terrible feeling last night.
I felt he was in desperate trouble.
Hello, Kemp. Flora's worried about Griffin.
I don't wonder. I should have thought at least he could drop a line.
It's a queer thing.
It certainly is, considering he was in your employ.
He had my permission to carry out his own experiments in his spare time.
And to clear off when he liked?
What does it matter, if he's in trouble?
I've got the car outside.
It'll give you a rest to come for a run.
Do you think there are any papers in his room?
Surely he must have arranged where he was going. There may be letters.
He left burnt papers in his fireplace, that's all.
He was so strange those last few days before he went. So excited and strung up.
Yet he wouldn't say a word to explain.
I've never seen him like it before.
He was always so keen to tell me about his experiments.
He meddled in things men should leave alone.
Your father's a scientist. He's discovered more about preserving food than anyone.
Jack and I were employed to help him.
That's a plain, straightforward job.
It's not romantic, but it saves hundreds of deaths and stomachaches.
What things should men leave alone?
He worked in secret. He kept a lot of stuff locked in a big cupboard in his laboratory.
He never opened it until he'd barred the door and drawn the blinds.
Straightforward scientists have no need for barred doors and drawn blinds.
He cares nothing for you, Flora.
He'll never care about anything but test tubes and chemicals.
How can he go away like this without a word?
Flora, dear. Please, darling, let me tell you how I feel.
- I can't work or sleep until I know.
- Leave me alone! How can you?
There's a way back, you fool.
There must be a way back.
- What is it?
- Your luncheon.
- Take it away.
- You don't want it cold, do you?
Do you suppose that I'm going to carry trays backwards and forwards all day?
Luncheon's at one, and it's one now!
Get out!
He's not gonna stay under this roof, not another hour!
Crashed the tray out of me hand, and swore at me.
Turns my best sitting room into a chemist's shop.
Spillages on the carpets!
And him a week behind with his money!
Go and tell him if he ain't packed up and gone in half an hour, we'll have the law in to turn him out.
And take him his bill.
Three pounds ten.
And see you get it before you come out.
Go on.
Let's leave him a bit, Jenny, till he cools off.
Go on, do it now. Him and his goggles and his chemist's shop!
If you don't kick him out, I'm clearing out myself, and I mean it this time!
And a whole day's work ruined by a foolish, ignorant woman!
There must be a way back.
God knows there's a way back.
If only they'd leave me alone.
Look 'ere, mister, we can't have this no more.
You broke the wife's best china, you're behind with the rent. Pack up and go.
I'm expecting some money, Mr Hall.
I'll pay you directly it comes.
You said that last week.
I came here for quiet and secrecy.
I'm carrying out a difficult experiment.
I must be left alone. It's vital. It's life and death that I should be left alone.
- You don't understand.
- I understand all right.
You don't pay. And what's more, you're driving folks away from our house.
Mr Hall, I've had a serious accident.
It's disfigured me, affected my eyes.
I mean the way you carry on, throwing things about on the carpets and swearing.
- It's no good, mister, you've got to go.
- I implore you to let me stay. I beg of you.
The wife says if you don't go, she is, so it's gotta be you.
Come on. I'll help you to get this stuff packed up.
Leave that alone and get out of here!
Look here! Is this my house or yours?
What are you doing?
Help! Help! Police!
He's a raving lunatic!
Go and get a policeman.
Please don't cry, now.
He's all right.
Oh, shut up!
- Come on, Jaffers!
- Here, what's all this?
It's the stranger with the goggles.
He's gone mad. He's assaulted Mrs Hall and nearly killed her husband.
Oh.
- Where is he?
- He's upstairs in the sitting room.
He's in there, in the sitting room.
He's homicidal.
Oh.
Let that there.
Here, keep back, you kids there.
- Here, what's all this?
- Keep back there.
Keep back, me?
Do you know who you're talking to?
I give you a last chance to leave me alone.
Give me a last chance? You've committed assault, that's what you've done, and you can come along to the station with me.
Come along, now. Come quietly, unless you want me to put the handcuffs on.
Stop where you are.
You don't know what you're doing.
I know what I'm doing all right. Come on.
- Get hold of him.
- Lock him up!
All right, you fools.
You've brought it on yourselves.
Everything would have come right if you'd only left me alone.
You've driven me near madness with your peering through the keyholes and gaping through the curtains.
And now you'll suffer for it!
You're crazy to know who I am, aren't you?
All right! I'll show you!
There's a souvenir for you.
And one for you.
I'll show you who I am and what I am.
Look. He's all eaten away.
How do you like that, eh?
- It was 'orrible.
- What's wrong?
- Jaffers, what do you think?
- He's invisible, that's what's the matter.
If he gets the rest of them clothes off, we'll never catch him in a thousand years.
Come on.
They've asked for it, the country bumpkins.
This'll give them a bit of a shock.
Something to write home about.
A nice bedtime story for the kids, too, if they want it.
- Put the handcuffs on.
- How can I handcuff a bloomin' shirt?
Quick! Get hold of him!
Ow!
Are you satisfied now, you fools?
It's easy, really, if you're clever.
A few chemicals mixed together, that's all, and flesh and blood and bone just fade away.
A little of this injected under the skin of the arm every day for a month.
An invisible man can rule the world.
Nobody will see him come, nobody will see him go.
He can hear every secret.
He can rob and kill!
Not if he can't get no further than this room, he won't.
Here, shut that door.
You'd better come along quietly.
Look out! Mind that window!
You think I'd escape like a common criminal?
You need a lesson.
I think I'll throttle you.
Let go of me!
Let go!
You must be made to understand what I can do.
Hey, look out!
Hey, whoa!
Hey, hey!
Look out! Get indoors!
Everybody get indoors!
I'm afraid I need this bicycle. Ha-ha!
He stole me bike!
Here's your blooming bicycle.
You can do what you like with it.
How's that for a hairbrush, George Henry?
Good morning, Grandfather.
How do you do?
We'll do our part.
Mama, give me the diamonds!
On the gospel, it's the truth.
He tried to strangle me, sir.
Where are you speaking from, Jaffers?
Lion's Head inn, eh?
Did you say an invisible man?
Well, look here, you put more water in it next time!
He won't believe me. You tell him.
Mr Hall speaking.
The constable's telling the truth all right.
Not the slightest clue.
I didn't expect there would be.
That's where the clues are.
He wasn't leaving anything to chance.
Griffin was never the man for secrets.
He came to me with everything.
He kept a lot of stuff locked in here.
I came in one evening when he wasn't expecting me.
He was by this cupboard.
It was full of instruments.
When he saw me, he slammed the door and turned the key.
You say he brought a packing case up here?
The night before he disappeared. I heard him hammering, packing everything up.
- Here's something, Kemp.
- What is it?
- Bad news?
- It's only a rough note.
A list of chemicals, and the last on the list is monocane.
Monocane? What is monocane?
- Monocane's a terrible drug.
- I never heard of it.
You wouldn't, Kemp. It's never used now.
I didn't know it was even made.
It's a drug that's made from a flower that's grown in India.
It draws colour from everything it touches.
Years ago they tried it for bleaching cloth.
They gave it up because it destroyed the material.
- That doesn't sound very terrible.
- I know, but it does something else.
It was tried out on some poor animal - a dog, I believe.
It was injected under the skin, and it turned the dog dead white, like a marble statue.
- Is that so?
- Yes, and it also sent it raving mad.
You surely don't think...?
I only pray to God that Griffin hasn't been meddling with this ghastly stuff.
- He'd never touch a thing with madness.
- He might not know.
I found that experiment in an old German book just by chance.
The English books only describe the bleaching power.
- What are we going to do?
- Tell the police that Griffin's disappeared.
But only that he's disappeared.
I put you on your honour, Kemp, not to breathe a word of this to anyone.
- Shall I go with you?
- It's all right, Kemp.
I'll go tonight, when Inspector Lane's on duty.
I'll run along back home, then.
- Good night.
- Good night, Kemp.
This is the national station broadcasting this evening's news.
Remarkable story from country village.
Police and doctors are investigating a story told this afternoon by the people of the village of Iping.
A mysterious disease has broken out infecting many of the inhabitants.
It takes the form of a delusion that an invisible man is living among them.
Several people have been seriously injured, probably through fiighting, in their belief that their opponent is an invisible man.
The whole village is in a state of panic and everyone...
Everyone deserves the fate that's coming to them.
Panic, death, things worse than death.
Don't be afraid, Kemp.
It's me - Griffin. Jack Griffin.
How are you, my friend?
Brrr! I'm frozen with cold.
Dead tired. Thank God for a fire.
Sit down, you fool.
Let's have a decent fire.
D'you hear me? Sit down, unless you want me to knock your brains out.
Sit down!
I want you to listen carefully, Kemp.
I've been through hell today.
I want food and sleep, but before we sleep, there's work to do.
May I have a cigarette?
You always were a dirty little coward, Kemp.
You're frightened out of your wits, aren't you?
Oh, it's no good talking like this.
Have you got a good long surgical bandage?
Good. And a pair of dark glasses?
Right. Go and get them, at once.
Let me have a dressing gown and pyjamas and a pair of gloves.
You'll feel better if you can see me, won't you?
Come on. You've no time to waste.
You'll find some pyjamas in that room.
Here are the gloves and bandages.
- I'll bring you the glasses.
- Thank you. Don't be long.
Put them on the table.
Now go down and draw the blinds in your sitting room.
- Are we alone in the house?
- Yes.
Good. All right, go now. If you raise a finger against me, you're a dead man.
I'm strong and I'll strangle you. understand? Wait for me downstairs.
The sitting room, I said, Kemp.
And if you try and escape by the window,
I shall follow you, and no one in the world can save you.
Here comes the inspector now.
Get up.
Nice fool you've made of me.
I've got reports for ten miles around.
Not a sign of anything.
I'll tell you what I think of your invisible man: it's a hoax.
Good business for the saloon bar, eh, Mr Hall?
Suppose I'd break my neck to sell a gallon of beer?
I'll have an inquiry right now.
Bring in everybody who thinks they saw or heard anything.
I'll get to the bottom of this.
Get those tables together.
Now, Kemp.
Now then, we can talk as man to man.
Sit down.
One day I'll tell you everything.
There's no time now.
I began five years ago in secret, working all night, every night, right into the dawn.
A thousand experiments, a thousand failures, and then at last the great, wonderful day.
- But, Griffin, it's ghastly!
- The great, wonderful day.
The last little mixture of drugs.
I couldn't stay here any longer, Kemp.
I couldn't let you see me slowly fading away.
So I packed up and went to a village for secrecy and quiet, to finish the experiment and complete the antidote, the way back to visible man again.
I meant to come back just as I was when you saw me last.
But the fools wouldn't let me work in peace. I had to teach them a lesson.
But why? Why do it, Griffin?
Just a scientific experiment at first.
That's all. To do something no other man in the world had done.
But there's more to it than that, Kemp.
I know now.
It came to me suddenly. The drugs I took seemed to light up my brain.
Suddenly I realised the power I held, the power to rule, to make the world grovel at my feet.
We'll soon put the world right now, Kemp.
You and I.
I? You mean...?
I must have a partner, Kemp, a visible partner, to help me in the little things.
You're my partner, Kemp.
We'll begin with a reign of terror.
A few murders here and there.
Murders of great men, murders of little men, just to show we make no distinction.
We might even wreck a train or two.
Just these fingers round a signalman's throat, that's all.
Griffin, for heaven's sake!
- Do you want me to take these off?
- No, no.
Very well, then.
We'll make our plans tomorrow.
Tonight we have a small job to do.
Go and get your car out, Kemp.
- Where are we going?
- To the village I left this morning.
I came away without my notebooks. They contain all the results of my experiments.
- But it's past eight o'clock.
- It's only 15 miles.
Go now. Quickly.
Take a bag with you for the books.
Put a warm rug in the car. It's cold outside when you have to go about naked.
- All ready?
- Yes.
Come on! Get in!
- Where's that rug?
- In the back.
I'm frozen. It's cold enough to freeze the icicles off an Eskimo.
We'll stop in a lane near the inn. I'll give you the books through the window.
- They'll have a guard.
- What can a guard do, you fool?
I must have those books, Kemp. I'll work in your laboratory till I find the antidote.
Sometimes I'll make you invisible, give me a rest.
I was walking home to me lunch, sir, when all of a sudden something takes hold of me hat and throws it in the pond.
- How many drinks did you have?
- Only a couple, sir, that's all.
A couple of drinks and a gust of wind.
So much for you.
Now then, about the bicycle.
Where's the owner of the bicycle?
Here, sir.
It was pulled clean out of me hands, sir.
Then it pedalled off down the street, all by itself.
Stop here.
Come on, get out.
Take your bag and walk down the street.
I'll guide you.
Wait outside the window till the books come out.
Put them in your bag and come back to the car. Then wait for me.
Don't stare at me, you fool.
Look in front of you.
Come on! Get a move on.
Here we are, Kemp, in here.
Here. Stroll up and down as though you were waiting for someone.
Watch for that window to open.
Griffin? Griffin? Are you there?
- Who's that, opened that door?
- It's them boys again, sir.
Here, you leave this door alone!
It's private, see!
- Aw, we never touched it.
- Yes, you did.
Go on, hop it. Go on!
There you are, Kemp.
Lies from beginning to end!
I've a good mind to prosecute all of you for conspiracy.
I shall announce this evening that the whole thing's a hoax, and you'll be the laughing stock of the entire country.
He's here! The invisible man!
Don't leave me! Wait for me!
A hoax, is it? All a hoax?
All a hoax?
There.
All right. Off you go.
Go for your life, too.
- Did you hear shouting and screaming?
- What was that screaming?
I had to take some exercise to keep warm.
I killed a stupid policeman.
Smashed his head in.
We start in earnest tomorrow morning, Kemp.
- Good evening, Doctor.
- Is Inspector Lane at the station?
- I want a word with him.
- Yes, sir.
Extra special!
Invisible man slays policeman!
- Nasty business, this.
- It's a conjuring trick, that's what it is.
I saw a fella make a peanut disappear once.
There are one or two things you must understand, Kemp.
I must always remain in hiding for an hour after meals.
The food is visible inside me until it is digested.
I can only work on fine, clear days.
If I work in the rain, the water can be seen on my head and shoulders.
In a fog you can see me, like a bubble.
In smoky cities the soot settles on me until you can see a dark outline.
You must always be near at hand to wipe off my feet.
Even dirt between my fingernails would give me away.
It is difficult at first to walk down stairs.
We are so accustomed to watching our feet.
But these are trivial difficulties. We shall find ways of defeating everything.
You will sleep in the room opposite.
And bring me some more food at eight o'clock.
Good night.
Now you will understand my plans.
You're in charge of all country to the east, Thompson,
- for 20 miles to the north of the road.
- Very good, sir.
Neville, you take the opposite section to the south.
Stoland, you take charge of the search in the hills.
And, Hogan, you take all the villages, out to the river.
Now, we shall comb the country for 20 miles round.
We've got a terrible responsibility.
He's mad and he's invisible.
He may be standing beside us now.
But he's human and we shall get him.
We shall have 1,000 men out tonight.
Tomorrow we shall have
10,000 volunteers to help them.
There's a broadcast warning going out at 10.30.
Now, at all costs, we must avoid a panic spreading.
Get word to your districts, and send me a note of your headquarters.
And remember, he'll leave tracks, even if he himself is invisible.
I must interrupt the music for a moment.
I have an urgent message from the police.
Earlier this evening we broadcast a report of an invisible man.
The report has now been confiirmed.
It appears that an unknown man by scientifiic means has made himself invisible.
He has attacked and killed a police inspector and is now at large.
The chief of police appeals to the public for help and assistance.
Those willing to cooperate are requested to report tomorrow to their local station.
The invisible man works without clothing.
He will have to seek shelter.
You're requested to lock every door and window, and every outbuilding he may use to hide in.
The police will be glad of any suggestions that will help in capturing the fugitive.
Remember, he's solid but cannot be seen.
A reward of £1,000 will be given to any person whose information leads to his capture.
The police appeal to the public to keep calm and to admit uniformed search parties to all property.
- I've got the doors padlocked.
- I'll keep him out!
Hello.
Hello. Get me Esher, 1021.
Hello?
Doctor, it's something ghastly.
It's Griffin. He's come back.
He's the invisible man.
He's asleep in my room.
He's mad, a raving lunatic.
He's killed a man tonight.
Listen to me, Kemp.
No one but you and I know that it's Griffin.
- I shall come in the morning.
- You must come now. I can't bear it!
If I come now, he'll be suspicious and escape.
You must keep him calm and quiet for tonight. I trust you, Kemp.
- Who was that, Father?
- It was Kemp.
It was about Jack. I know it.
What is it? Tell me.
- Leave me alone, Flora, please.
- I'm not afraid. Tell me.
Jack Griffin's come back.
He's at Dr Kemp's house now.
Jack Griffin's the invisible man.
Is that the police?
Was that £1,000 reward all right?
Well, listen, I've got a way to catch him.
The paper says he threw ink at the man he killed.
Get your own back and squirt ink about with a hose pipe till you hit him.
The ink'll stick on him.
Then you can shoot him.
Is that the police? I wanna tell you how to catch the invisible man.
The paper says it's going to be frosty in a day or two.
Well, you watch out when there's frost, see, then you can see his breath.
Police, quickly.
Is this the police? This is Dr Kemp.
The invisible man is in my house, asleep upstairs. Come at once. Hurry!
But, listen, Doctor,
I've only got five men here.
I'd want 100 to surround the house.
Yes, all right. I'll send them up as soon as possible.
Leave it to me and Kemp. We shall work day and night to undo this experiment.
- You must let me go to him.
- Only when he's well again.
No, now. I can do far more with Jack than you or Dr Kemp.
But, Flora, he's not normal.
His mind's unhinged. At present he's mad.
I can persuade him to help you.
You're powerless unless he does.
- I'll be ready in five minutes.
- Wait till the morning.
It's life or death, Father. You know that.
- I'll go alone, then.
- Flora.
Who's that? Who's that? unlock the door, Kemp.
Let me in.
- What are you doing here, Kemp?
- I couldn't sleep.
I had to get up and come down.
- Why did you lock the door?
- I... I was afraid.
Wouldn't you be afraid if I were invisible like you?
There's no need to be afraid, Kemp.
We're partners. Bosom friends.
We've a busy day ahead.
You must sleep.
I see. You told the police.
That was why you went downstairs.
No, I didn't. I swear I didn't.
Look, it's not the police.
It's Dr Cranley and Flora.
Flora.
- Why, yes, of course.
- I had to tell them you were back, Griffin.
- Flora was nearly mad with anxiety.
- How could I forget?
Shall I let them in?
Yes, of course you must let them in.
I shall go and prepare myself in my room.
I shall see Flora. Alone.
- He knows you're here.
- He was asleep.
He saw you from the window.
He wants to see Flora alone.
- No, Flora, don't.
- He's calm now, and quiet.
- Jack won't do me any harm.
- He's insane.
It's for us to cure him - Kemp and I.
Keep away, Flora.
I must go to him.
Doctor, he was a different man when he saw Flora leave the car.
He won't hurt her. We must play for time.
- Why for time?
- We... we must prepare things.
If we try and bind him now, he'll escape.
We must take him when he's asleep and chloroform him. Wait here.
- Flora, my darling.
- Thank God you're home, Jack.
I would have come to you at once,
Flora, but for this.
How wonderful it is to see you.
How beautiful you look.
That funny little hat. I always liked it.
- You've been crying.
- I want to help you. Why did you do this?
- For you, Flora.
- For me?
Yes, for you, my darling.
I wanted to do something tremendous, to achieve what men of science have dreamt of since the world began, to gain wealth and fame and honour, to write my name above the greatest scientists of all time.
I was so pitifully poor.
I had nothing to offer you, Flora.
I was just a poor, struggling chemist.
I shall come back to you,
Flora, very soon now.
The secret of invisibility lies there in my books.
I shall work in Kemp's laboratory till I find the way back.
There is a way back, Flora.
And then I shall come to you.
I shall offer my secret to the world, with all its terrible power!
The nations of the world will bid for it - thousands, millions.
The nation that wins my secret can sweep the world with invisible armies!
Jack, I want you to let my father help you.
You know how clever he is.
He'll work with you until you find that second secret that'll bring you back to us.
Then we'll have lovely, peaceful days again out under the trees, after your work in the evening.
Your father? Clever?
You think he can help me?
He's got the brain of a tapeworm, a maggot, beside mine.
Don't you see what it means? Power.
Power to rule, to make the world grovel at my feet.
Jack, listen to me. Listen!
My father found a note in your room.
He knows something about monocane you don't.
It alters you, changes you, makes you feel differently.
Father believes its power will go if you know what it is.
Come and stay with us.
Let's fight this thing out together.
Power, I said.
Power to walk into the gold vaults of the nations, into the secrets of kings, into the holy of holies.
Power to make multitudes run squealing in terror at the touch of my little invisible finger.
Even the moon's frightened of me, frightened to death.
The whole world's frightened to death.
So, I see. Kemp couldn't sleep.
He had to go downstairs.
He was frightened.
I put my trust in Kemp.
I told him my secret and he gave me his word of honour.
- You must go now, Flora.
- I want to help you.
There is nothing for you to do except to go.
I shall come back. I swear I shall come back, because I shall defeat them.
- Go now, my dear.
- No. I want to stay. You must hide.
Don't worry.
The whole world's my hiding place.
I can stand out there amongst them in the day or night and laugh at them.
Come along, my darling.
Oh, Father!
Link hands, all around the house.
- Link hands.
- Link hands.
- Link hands.
- Link hands.
Keep close together, or he'll slip under your arm.
Now, boys, forward.
Thank you, Kemp, for opening the window.
You're a true friend, Kemp. A man to trust.
I've no time now but, believe me, as surely as the moon will set and the sun will rise,
I shall kill you tomorrow night.
I shall kill you even if you hide in the deepest cave of the earth.
At ten o'clock tomorrow night
I shall kill you.
Help! Help!
He's here! He's here!
- Here he comes.
- Stand where you are.
- What is it?
- Something smacked my face.
Naughty boy.
Ow! Let go!
- What's the matter with you?
- He twisted my nose.
Now, steady, boys.
We've got him all right this time.
Good shot.
Get that hat.
Now then, boys, advance slowly.
It's all right. He's unarmed.
We've got him easy.
Help! Help! He's got me by the feet!
Here he is! Help!
It's the invisible man! He's got him by the feet! After him! Quick!
What do you know about that?
Help!
Murder! Murder!
' Here we go gathering nuts in May, nuts in May, nuts in May
' Here we go gathering nuts in May on a cold and frosty morning
Whoops!
He threatened to kill me at ten o'clock tonight. You must lock me up.
You're not the only one in danger, Dr Kemp.
I'll see that you have protection.
Now, Dr Cranley, you're concealing something from me.
One moment.
Why were you and your daughter in this house at two o'clock this morning?
Dr Kemp called me up.
He told me the man was here.
- He wanted my help.
- Why did he ring you before the police?
- Why did your daughter come too?
- She came to drive the car.
You know who the invisible man is, Doctor.
I understand you have another assistant besides Dr Kemp, a Dr Griffin.
- Where is Dr Griffin?
- He's gone away.
It is Griffin!
What's the good of concealing it?
It's Griffin, and he's threatened to murder me.
He may be here now, in the garden looking through the window, or in the corner of my bedroom waiting for me, waiting to kill me!
And you all sit there doing nothing! Nothing!
We've doubled the search party around Kemp's house.
Nothing to report, sir. The policeman's trousers were found a mile away.
- That's all.
- Well, it's beaten me.
I'll give £1,000 for a practical idea.
He's roaming the country at will, a madman.
Here I am.
Aren't you pleased you've found me?
Aagh!
Would you like to keep him company?
Stand away! Keep back!
Thank you.
- Give me £5 worth of silver, please.
- Yes, sir.
Thank you. Good day.
- Morning.
- Morning, sir.
There you are. A present from the invisible man.
Money! Money! Money! Money!
' up and down the City Road
' In and out the Eagle
' That's the way the money goes
' Pop goes the weasel!
Money! Money! Money! Money!
20 men of the search parties have been killed, and 100 in the train disaster.
The invisible man has been reported in a hundred different places.
Now I appeal to you to help us keep the public calm.
What plans have you got for capturing him?
100,000 men are searching and watching.
But have you any special secret means of getting him?
The police have offered £2,000 for the first effective means.
- Why not bloodhounds?
- The bloodhounds have lost the scent.
Why not put wet tar on all the roads, then chase the black soles of his feet?
Because he's not a fool.
Now, we've got one hope, gentlemen.
But I daren't say a word of it here.
He may be standing there beside you listening.
Try and sleep now, my dear.
There's nothing you can do.
We must just pray that the police can take him without harming him.
Stand back, close against the wall.
Now then.
Drag that net clear across the room.
Now everything depends on the way we carry out my plan.
I'll tell you it after we've made certain he's not in this room.
Good. Now we're safe here at last.
Constable, keep an eye on that window.
Now, come here. All of you, sit down.
Now listen carefully. We've got a chance tonight that will never come again.
He's threatened to murder
Dr Kemp at ten o'clock.
From what we know of him, he'll do his utmost to carry that out.
He's certain to be near this house, watching, for some time beforehand.
Now, at half past nine,
Dr Kemp, with a bodyguard of police, will leave this house and walk down to the police station.
It's a natural thing for Dr Kemp to seek protection.
The invisible man is certain to be near.
He's certain to see what's happening.
You mean you're going to use me as a bait? I can't!
- You must. You'll be perfectly safe.
- Safe? He's not human.
- He can go through prison walls.
- Don't be a fool.
I can't sit in that station waiting.
He'll kill you, kill you all, and then take the keys and come to me.
Very well. If you're afraid of waiting in the police station, you can leave it directly you're inside.
There's a secret way out through the inspector's house.
We'll disguise you as a policeman and you can walk out and drive away.
Even if he sees you, he won't recognise you.
He'll probably be waiting to break in at ten o'clock.
- What happens to me then?
- I'll have you driven quietly back here.
Then get into your car and drive away into the country, miles away, and stay there until we've got him.
Now, you needn't be afraid.
We'll get him all right this time.
I'll lay traps that even an invisible man can't pass.
You see? It covers a fairly wide range.
Now, I've got 20 of these guns and a good man to each.
One splash of this on his skin and we've got something to follow at last.
- Why not paint the top of the wall?
- Because he'd smell it.
I've got a better plan. I'm going to put a thin layer of loose earth on top of the wall.
The slightest touch will disturb it, and we've got him trapped.
Oh, I see. Pretty good.
Quick march!
They think they're very clever.
All right, take him straight inside.
20 minutes to ten.
Keep your eyes open now, boys.
Here, quick, sir.
I heard footsteps outside, soft footsteps, like naked feet.
Listen.
Come on.
- Where are you going to?
- The mountains, 100 miles away.
Drive away quickly.
It's ten minutes to ten.
He's bound to do something in a minute.
- Will he try and get into the station?
- Every door and window is barred.
No, he'll try the wall right enough.
There he goes!
- Go to your stations now. Watch the wall.
- He's over the wall!
I felt breathing down my neck.
He's in here.
Ten o'clock!
Ten o'clock he wanted to murder me.
I think this'll do nicely, Kemp.
We'll stop here.
It's ten o'clock.
I came with you to keep my promise.
No! It's all a mistake, Griffin.
I swear I never told the police. I want to help you. Let me be your partner.
I've had a cold and uncomfortable journey just to keep my promise at ten o'clock.
I went into the police station with you.
I stood by while you changed into that coat.
I rode on the running board of the car that took you home again.
There. You sit there.
I've got you where I want you.
I hope your car's insured. I'm afraid there's going to be a nasty accident.
A very nasty accident.
- I'll do anything. Everything you ask me.
- You will? That's fine.
Sit where you are. I'll get out and take the handbrake off and give you a little shove.
You'll run down and through the railings.
Then you'll have a big thrill for 100 yards till you hit a boulder.
Then you'll do a somersault and break your arms, then a grand finish-up with a broken neck.
Well, goodbye, Kemp. I always said you were a dirty little coward.
You're a dirty, sneaking little rat as well. Goodbye.
1,000 replies have come to my appeal for ways of catching the invisible man.
Some are clever, some stupid, but all are impossible.
He's got to sleep.
They might catch him asleep.
- He's got to eat and drink.
- A café was robbed last night in Manton.
There's no proof he did it.
There are robberies every night by ordinary burglars.
This feels good.
Look there. We wanted help - there it is.
It's now or never. The snow won't lie long at this time of year.
It may be gone in a few hours.
Norton, find out if the snow is yet all over the country.
Send out a broadcast message.
He can't stay out in this bitter cold.
He'll seek shelter.
Excuse me, sir.
There's breathing in my barn.
What do you mean, breathing in your barn?
The invisible man, sir.
Sure as I stand here.
The farmer may have imagined it, but we can't leave it to chance.
Surround the barn.
No use trying to take him on the inside.
Force him out into the snow. Take some wood and gasoline and set fire to it.
That's it, sir. He's in there under a pile of straw, sir.
Are there any windows he can watch from?
No, sir. Only the door, sir.
There's a reward of £1,000 waiting for you if we're successful.
We're lucky to have the open country.
Take your men and cover the country from the road to the hill.
Line the ridge through those trees.
There's no time to lose. We can't wait till he comes out to search for food.
We must fire the barn at once and drive him out into the snow.
Keep in single file. We don't want a lot of your footprints around the barn.
We want to keep the snow for his feet alone.
Get that searchlight on the door of that barn.
He's out! Look!
Shall I give the signal to advance?
I don't think your guard is needed any longer.
- How is he?
- He's very near the end.
- Are you Dr Cranley?
- Yes. I got word to come immediately.
Towards dawn this morning he grew quiet.
He called the name of a girl -
I understand, your daughter.
She's waiting below. Is there any chance?
The bullet passed through both lungs.
It's impossible to treat the wound.
Do you think your daughter could bear to go to him?
I'm afraid the end may be rather terrible.
The effect of the drugs will die with him.
His body will become visible as life goes.
I'll bring her now.
- Is Flora there?
- She's coming now.
I knew you would come to me, Flora.
I wanted to come back to you.
My darling.
I failed.
I meddled in things... that man must leave alone.
Father, come quickly.
May I go out now,
Miss Simpson?
Has it stopped snowing?
Not quite.
If it has stopped when your sister returns, perhaps she will take you out.
Oh, dear.
Here, kitty.
Suppose it never stops.
Suppose the man in charge of the snow has forgotten how to stop it.
Don't you think you had better work a while at your sampler?
No, thank you.
Oh, dear.
Hello, Sir Turtle.
You really must stop that,
Your Majesty. Stop it, I say!
Stop what?
The White Queen just knocked over the White King.
She never does look where she's going.
Alice, you know you are not supposed to play with your father's chessmen.
But I wasn't playing.
She deliberately bumped into His
Majesty and knocked him off his feet.
Alice, are you sure that that is true?
Well, I saw it.
Alice.
Yes, Miss Simpson.
At any rate, Your Majesty, stop bumping into your husband.
And you might tidy up a bit.
A white rabbit!
All dressed up in a muffler and overcoat and big woolly shoes.
There. It's gone into its nice warm rabbit hole.
It looked so funny all dressed up.
Alice, I am sure you know that there is no such thing as a rabbit dressed up in a muffler and an overcoat.
You must not say what is not true.
Well, it...
It wasn't untrue exactly.
I think you had better finish your tea.
There is another egg for you to eat.
I did eat both eggs, but I put one of them all back together again.
Alice!
Yes, Miss Simpson.
The looking-glass room.
You see, Dinah, as soon as I hold you up, the little girl in the looking-glass room holds up another cat just like you.
Oh, Dinah, wouldn't you like to see what the looking-glass house is like?
You know, Dinah, there is a looking-glass house.
First, there's the room you can see through the glass.
That's just the same as our sitting room, only the things go the other way.
You'd love living there.
But, of course, I don't know whether looking-glass milk is good to drink.
Well, anyway, then we would come to the hallway.
It is very like our own hallway as far as you can see, only it may be quite different beyond that.
Oh, Dinah,
wouldn't it be nice if we could get through to...
I can see all of the looking-glass room from here, all but a bit.
I would so like to see that little bit just behind the fireplace.
Do you think, Dinah, that if I pressed very, very hard and tried to look straight down, that I might...
Why, why...
Well, I knew this part of the room would be different.
But I do wish the looking-glass chair had moved when I moved ours.
There seems no other way.
If I could only fall like that all the time!
Can't be English.
Of course.
It's the looking-glass room.
Why, it's Uncle and Aunt!
I knew that if you could really get behind a picture,
you'd see the backs of people.
Poor Uncle Gilbert.
His trousers are all patched.
My dear niece, how would you like being framed in one pair of trousers for
20 years without being patched?
It must be very difficult.
It is.
But after all, it's only the front of a picture that counts, really.
Of course.
That is all.
What did you say?
But your hands say
20 minutes to 4:00.
I never let my left hand know what my right hand is doing.
This side of the looking glass has me all confused.
That's because everything is backward on your side.
Why, I...
I never...
Mama! Mama! Mama!
Mama! Mama!
What's that?
It's the voice of my child!
Your child!
Oh, my precious lily!
My imperial kitten!
I must be with my child.
Let me help you.
Mama! Mama!
Dear me.
There, there, my royal pawn.
Poor thing.
Watch out for the volcano.
It blew me up! Be sure you come up the regular way.
Don't get blown up.
You'll be hours and hours getting to the table at that rate.
I'd far better help you.
No, no!
The King's men! Somebody call out the King's men!
I assure you, my dear, I shall never, never forget the horror of this moment.
Well, you will forget, unless you make a memorandum of it.
I shall be very happy to remind you.
We will not be reminded by a volcano.
I'm not a volcano, and
I'm not a cyclone, either.
Then you're either a cyclano or a volcone.
And...
Well, what time was that?
I really haven't any idea, but it's very late.
I must hurry or I shall have to go back through the looking glass
before I've seen what the rest of the house is like.
My, what a strange way to walk about the garden.
The Duchess! The Duchess! Won't she be savage if I've kept her waiting!
Oh, dear! Oh, dear!
I shall be too late!
My ears and whiskers, how late it is getting!
Well, after such a fall as this,
I shall think nothing of tumbling downstairs.
I wish Dinah were here.
That's such pretty music.
Oh, dear.
Ouch.
Goodbye, dear feet.
Oh, will I ever get to the beautiful garden?
Oh!
Oh, Mouse!
Do you know the way out of this pool, oh, Mouse?
I'm very tired of swimming about here.
Perhaps you don't understand English.
I daresay you're a French mouse.
That's French for,
"Where is my cat?"
I beg your pardon. I quite forgot you didn't like cats.
Wait, oh, Mouse!
Oh, Mouse!
Not like cats?
Would you like cats if you were me?
Don't be angry. I wish I could show you our cat Dinah.
You'd take quite a fancy to her.
She's such a dear, quiet thing, and so good at catching mice.
Oh, I beg your pardon.
I hate you!
I hate cats!
My whole family hates cats.
Nasty, low, vulgar things!
Oh, dear!
Wait, oh, Mouse!
Cats! Cats!
Cats!
William the Conqueror, whose cause was favored by the pope, was soon submitted to by the
English, who wanted leaders, and had been of late much accustomed to usurpation and conquest.
Who are you, please?
I am a dodo.
How do you do?
My name is Alice.
And you are very wet.
I'm afraid I am, but there isn't much I can do about getting dry.
History is the driest thing I know.
Shall we dry you with history?
I'd be much obliged if you could.
Listen well.
Edwin and Morcar, the earls of
Mercia and Northumbria, found it advisable to go with Edgar Aetheling to meet William and offer him the crown.
William's conduct at first was moderate, but the insolence of his Normans...
How are you getting on, my dear?
Beautifully, thank you.
Shall I put you to sleep now?
No, thank you!
Then you'd best run along.
I'm about to recite some dates.
Yes, sir.
Thank you. Goodbye.
1585, Shakespeare was born,
1616, Shakespeare died...
Who are you?
I hardly know, sir, just at present.
At least, I know who I was when I got up this morning, but I must have changed several times since then.
What do you mean by that?
Explain yourself.
I can't explain myself, because I'm not myself, you see.
I don't see!
I can't put it more clearly,
for I can't understand it myself to begin with.
And being so many different sizes in one day is confusing.
It isn't.
Well, when some day you turn into a chrysalis, and after that into a butterfly,
you'll find it a bit queer, won't you?
Not a bit!
Well, maybe you wouldn't, but it would certainly feel very queer to me.
You? Who are you?
I think you ought to tell me who you are first.
Why?
Good day, sir.
Come back. I have something important to say.
Yes?
Keep your temper.
Is that all?
No.
So you think you've changed, do you?
I'm afraid I have, sir.
What size do you want to be?
I should like to be a little larger, sir, if you wouldn't mind.
Three inches is such a horrid height to be.
I am three inches high! It's a very good height to be!
I'm sure it must be, sir, but you see, I'm not used to it.
You'll get used to it in time.
One side will make you grow taller.
The other side will make you grow shorter.
One side of...
Of what?
The mushroom.
Which side will make me grow larger?
The large-making side, of course.
I'll take a little of both to make sure.
Oh, dear, now I'm too big again, oh, Caterpillar.
Mr. Caterpillar, sir, where are you?
Whoever lives here, it would never do to come upon them this size.
Why, I should frighten them out of their wits.
For the Duchess.
An invitation from the Queen to play croquet.
My compliments to the Queen.
My compliments to the Duchess.
There's no sort of use in your knocking.
Please, sir, how am I to get in?
I shall sit here till tomorrow.
I'm sorry you were hit, but how am I to get in?
I shall sit here for days and days.
But what am I to do?
Anything you like.
Please watch out for the baby!
She nearly killed the poor little thing.
If everybody minded their own business, the world would go round much faster than it does.
Speak roughly to your little boy And beat him when he sneezes
He only does it to annoy
Because he knows it teases
Wow! Wow! Wow!
Wow!
Wow!
Wow!
He only does it to annoy
Because he knows it teases
Here, you can nurse it a bit if you like.
Now, I must go and get ready to play croquet with the Queen.
Don't grunt. That's not at all a proper way of expressing yourself.
What am I going to do with this creature when I get it home?
If you're going to turn into a pig, my dear,
I'll have nothing more to do with you. Mind now!
There's no mistake about you now. You're a pig!
You would have grown up to be a dreadfully ugly child, but you do make a handsome pig, I think.
Why do you grin, oh, cat?
Because I'm a Cheshire Cat, that's why.
Well, then,
Cheshire puss, would you tell me, please, which way I ought to go from here?
That depends a good deal on where you want to get to.
I don't care much where.
Then it doesn't matter which way you go.
So long as
I get somewhere.
You're sure to do that, if you only walk long enough.
Do you play croquet with the Queen today?
I should like it very much, but I haven't been invited yet.
You'll see me there.
Must you go so soon?
By the by, what became of the baby?
I'd nearly forgotten to ask.
It turned into a pig.
I thought it would.
Did you say pig or fig?
I said pig
and I wish you wouldn't keep appearing and vanishing so suddenly.
You make one quite giddy.
All right.
Don't you wish you could do this?
Well, I've often seen a cat without a grin, but a grin without a cat?
No room! No room!
No room! No room!
There's plenty of room!
Have some wine?
I don't see any wine.
There isn't any.
It wasn't very civil of you to offer it.
Your hair needs cutting.
You should not make personal remarks. It's very rude.
Why is a raven like a writing desk?
I believe I can answer that.
Do you mean you can find the answer to it?
Exactly so.
You should say what you mean.
What day of the month is it?
Fourth.
Ah! Two days wrong.
I told you that butter wouldn't suit the works.
Oh!
Some crumbs must have got in it as well.
Hmm. I put it in with a bread knife.
It was the best butter, you know.
What a funny watch! It tells the days of the month,
but doesn't tell what "o'clock" it is.
Have you guessed the riddle yet?
Why... Why, no. I give it up.
What is the answer?
I haven't the slightest idea!
Nor I!
I think you might do something better with time than wasting it asking a lot of riddles that have no answers.
Don't you speak about Time. I daresay you've never even spoken to him.
Perhaps not.
Time and I quarreled last March, just before he went mad, you know.
It was at a great concert given by the Queen of Hearts,
and I had to sing, "Twinkle, twinkle, little bat How I wonder what you're at"
You know the song, perhaps?
I've heard something like it.
It goes on, you know, like this.
Twinkle, twinkle, little bat
How I wonder what you're at
Up above the world you fly
Like a tea tray in the sky
Up above the world you fly
Like a tea tray in the sky
Twinkle, twinkle, twinkle...
Twinkle, twinkle, little bat
How I wonder what you're at
Up above the world you fly
Like a tea tray in the sky
Up above the world you fly
Like a tea tray in the sky
Twinkle, twinkle, twinkle, twinkle
Twinkle, twinkle...
Well, I'd hardly finished the first verse when the Queen bawled,
"He's murdering the Time!
Off with his head!"
And ever since that, he won't do a thing I ask.
It's always 6:00 now.
Is that why all the tea things are out here?
Yes, that's it.
It's always teatime, and we have no time to wash the tea things in between.
Take some more tea.
I haven't had any yet, so I can't take more.
You mean you can't take less. It is very easy to take more than nothing.
I want a clean cup.
It's the stupidest tea party
I ever was at in all my life!
Very curious!
Would you please tell me why are you painting those roses?
I...
Well, as a matter of fact, Miss, this tree should have been a red rose tree and we put in a white one by mistake, and if the Queen should find out,
we'll all have our heads cut off.
So, you see, Miss, we're doing our best before she comes back to paint...
The Queen!
The Queen!
The Queen!
Come, come, get up!
Her Majesty, the Queen of Hearts.
Her Majesty, the Queen!
Off with his head!
Off with his head!
What is your name, child?
My name is Alice, so please Your Majesty.
Off with her head!
Off with her head!
Nonsense!
Off with her head!
Off with her head!
Consider, my dear.
She's only a child.
Off with her head!
Off with her head!
And besides, this is the executioners' day off.
It is, is it? Well, they shall lose their heads for this!
Can you play croquet?
Yes.
Then let the game begin at once.
Hurry! Hurry! Hurry! Hurry!
Must I behead you all?
Here, take it. Play.
Off with some heads.
You're pointing the wrong way for a mallet!
Pardon me. My back hurts.
Well!
Don't look at me.
I'm as mixed up as you are!
This game's slowing up.
Off with some heads!
Where are my victims?
Search the hedges.
Thrash the bushes.
Shake the trees!
How glad I am to see you again, you dear old thing.
How did you like your game?
Well, it was very exciting.
Of course it is.
And the moral of that is,
"Be what you would like to be."
Or, to put it more simply, "Never imagine yourself not to be otherwise
"than what it might appear to others that what you were or might have been
"wasn't otherwise than what you had been
"would have appeared to them to be otherwise."
I should understand that better if it were written down.
I can't quite follow it as you say it.
That's nothing to what
I could say, if I chose.
And the moral of that is...
It's a fine day,
Your Majesty.
I give you fair warning. Either you or your head must be off at once!
Please, Your Majesty, could you make it go away?
Queen! Queen!
Where are you, Queen?
What fun!
What is the fun?
The Queen.
They never really execute anybody she condemns, you know.
The King...
The King pardons everybody.
I'm very happy to know that, I'm sure.
Have you seen the Mock Turtle yet?
Why... Why, no. I don't even know what a Mock Turtle is.
It's what mock turtle soup's made from.
Come here, will you,
Mock Turtle, old thing?
What is his sorrow?
It's all his fancy.
He hasn't got no sorrow.
No sorrow, indeed.
Mine are the sorrows of a sorrowful sorrow.
Mine are the woes of a woeful woe.
Mine are the...
This here young lady, she wants for to know your history, she do.
I'll tell it her.
Sit down, both of you, and don't speak a word till I've finished.
Once I was a real turtle.
Oh, dear!
Oh, dear!
When we were little, we went to school in the sea.
The master was an old turtle.
We used to call him Tortoise.
Why did you call him
Tortoise if he wasn't one?
We called him Tortoise because he taught us.
You ought to be ashamed of yourself for asking such a simple question.
We went to school in the sea, though you mayn't believe it.
I never said I didn't. You did.
Hold your tongue!
We had the best of educations.
In fact, we went to school every day.
I've been to a day school, too.
We learned
French and music.
I only took the regular course.
What was that?
Reeling and writhing to begin with.
And then the different branches of arithmetic, ambition, distraction, uglification and derision.
And how many hours a day did you do lessons?
Ten hours the first day and nine the next and so on.
That's why they're called lessons, because they lessen from day to day.
Then the 11th day must have been a holiday.
Of course.
And how did you manage on the 12th day?
Well, that's enough about lessons.
Shall we play games, or shall the Mock Turtle sing?
Oh, a song, please, if the
Mock Turtle would be so kind.
No accounting for tastes.
Sing her Turtle Soup, will you, old fellow?
In a moment.
Beautiful soup
Who cares for fish
Game, or any other dish?
Who would not give all else for two
Pennyworth only of beautiful soup?
Pennyworth only of beautiful soup
Beautiful soup, beautiful soup
Soup of the evening
Beautiful soup, beautiful...
Faster! Faster!
Faster! Faster!
Faster! Much faster!
Are we nearly there?
Nearly there?
Why, we passed it
10 minutes ago. Faster!
It's all marked out like a chessboard.
Of course it's a chessboard,
and life is a chessboard, and you are a Queen's pawn.
You will go immediately to the fourth square, which you should reach in exactly no time.
Did you remark something?
I didn't know I had to make one just then.
You should have told me how kind it is of me to tell you all this.
No questions? Very well, then, no answers.
Open your mouth wide when you speak, and always speak in French
if you can't think of the English for something.
Turn out your toes as you walk
and always say "Your
Majesty," and so forth.
If you think we're waxworks, you ought to pay, you know.
Waxworks weren't made to be looked at for nothing, nohow.
Contrary-wise, if you think we're alive, you ought to speak.
I'm sure I'm very sorry.
I was wondering which is the best way out of this wood.
Would you tell me, please?
You've begun wrong.
The first thing in a visit is to say,
"How do you do?"
And shake hands.
I hope you're not much tired.
Why, nohow, but thank you very much for asking.
So much obliged.
You like poetry?
Yes, pretty well.
Some poetry.
But would you tell me first which road leads out of the woods?
What shall I repeat to her?
The Walrus and the
Carpenter is the longest.
"The sun was shining on the sea Shining with all his might
"He did his very best to make
The billows smooth and bright
"And this was odd because it was The middle of the night
"The Walrus and the Carpenter
Were walking close at hand
"They wept like anything to see Such quantities of sand
"'lf this were only cleared away'
They said, 'it would be grand'
"'lf seven maids with seven mops Swept it for half a year
"'Do you suppose,' the Walrus said
"'That they could get it clear?"'
"'I doubt it,' said the
Carpenter And shed a bitter tear"
"'Oh, oyster, come and walk with us, ' The Walrus did beseech
"'A pleasant walk, a pleasant talk Along the briny beach'
"They could not do with more than four To give a hand to each
"The eldest oyster looked at him But never a word he said
"The eldest oyster winked his eye And shook his heavy head
"Meaning to say he did not choose To leave the oyster bed
"But younger oysters hurried up All eager for the treat
"Their coats were brushed
Their faces washed
"Their shoes were clean and neat
"And this was odd because, you know They hadn't any feet
"'The time has come,' the Walrus said 'To talk of many things
"'Of shoes and ships and sealing wax Of cabbages and kings"
"'And why the sea is boiling hot And whether pigs have wings"'
"'A loaf of bread,' the Walrus said 'ls what we chiefly need
"'Pepper and vinegar besides
Are very good indeed
"'Now, if you're ready, oysters dear We can begin to feed'
"'But not on us, ' the oysters cried Turning a little blue
"'After such kindness that would be A dismal thing to do!'
"'The night is fine,' the Walrus said 'Do you admire the view?'
"'I weep for you,' the Walrus said 'I deeply sympathize'
"With sobs and tears he sorted out Those of the largest size
"Holding his pocket handkerchief
Before his streaming eyes
"'Oh, oyster,' said the Carpenter
'You've had a pleasant run
"'Shall we be trotting home again?' But answer came there none
"And this was scarcely odd because They'd eaten every one"
Well, they were both very unpleasant characters.
But at any rate, I'd better be leaving the wood
because it's really getting very dark. Well, goodbye.
Look!
Do you see that?
It's only a rattle.
Only an old rattle, quite old and broken.
I knew it was.
It's spoiled, of course.
My nice new rattle.
Of course, you agree to have a battle?
I suppose so.
Only she must help us to dress up, you know.
Of course!
"Tweedledee and Tweedledum
Agreed to have a battle
"For Tweedledee said Tweedledum
"Had spoiled his nice new rattle
"Just then down flew a monstrous crow As black as a tar barrel
"Which frightened both the heroes so
"They quite forgot their quarrel"
I hope you're good at pinning and tying string.
All this has got to go on somehow or other.
This is to keep my head from being cut off.
You know, one of the most serious things that can happen to one in a battle
is to get one's head cut off.
Do I look very pale?
Well, yes, a little.
I'm very brave generally, only today I happen to have a headache.
Well, I've got a toothache.
I'm far worse than you.
Then you'd both better not fight today.
We must have a bit of a fight.
Let's fight till 6:00 and then have dinner.
There's only one sword, but you can have the umbrella. It's sharper.
Only we must begin quick.
It's getting very, very dark.
And darker and darker.
What a thick black cloud that is, and how fast it comes!
Why, I do believe it's got wings.
It's the crow!
The crow!
May I put your shawl straight for you?
I don't know what's the matter with it.
It's out of temper, I think.
I've pinned it here and I've pinned it there, but there's no pleasing it.
It can't go on straight, you know, if you put all the pins on one side.
And dear me, what a state your hair is in!
Oh, the brush has got entangled in it.
And I lost the comb yesterday.
There, now you look better.
My finger's bleeding.
What's the matter?
Have you pricked your finger?
I haven't pricked it yet, but I soon shall.
When do you expect to do it?
When I fasten my shawl again, the broach will come undone.
Watch out, you're holding it all wrong.
Now you understand the way things happen here.
But why don't you scream now?
Why, I've done all the screaming already.
Now, what would be the good of doing it all over again?
I suppose so.
Well, it's a bit lighter now.
I'm glad that crow is gone.
I hope your finger's better now.
Much better. Better, better, better.
What is it you want to buy?
I should like to buy an egg, please.
I never put things into people's hands.
That would never do.
You must get it for yourself.
What a strange egg!
It keeps growing much faster than it should! Curiouser and curiouser!
It's bigger than a chicken!
Why, it's...
It's Humpty-Dumpty!
Don't stand there staring at me as if I were an egg.
Tell me your name and your business.
My name is Alice.
It's a stupid enough name.
What does it mean?
Must a name mean something?
Of course it must.
My name means the shape I am, and a right handsome shape it is.
With your name, you might be any shape.
Why do you sit out here all alone?
Because there's nobody with me.
Did you think
I couldn't answer that?
Ask another.
Don't you think you'd be safer on the ground?
That wall is so very narrow.
Of course I don't think so.
Why, if I ever did fall off,
which there's no chance of, but if I did...
If I did fall, the King has promised me...
To send all his horses and all his men.
Ah, so, you know. All his horses and all his men.
They'd pick me up again in a minute, they would.
However, this conversation is going on a little too fast.
Let's go back to the last remark but one.
I'm afraid I can't quite remember it.
In that case, we start afresh,
and it's my turn to choose a subject.
How old did you say you were?
Twelve years and four months.
Wrong. You never said a word like it.
I thought you meant,
"How old are you?"
If I'd meant that,
I'd have said that.
Twelve years and four months.
An uncomfortable sort of age.
Now, my advice would have been to leave off at 12, but it's too late now.
What a beautiful belt!
Or is it a beautiful collar?
It is a most provoking thing when a person doesn't know a collar from a belt.
I know it's very ignorant of me.
It's a collar, child, and a beautiful one, as you say.
It's a present from the White King and Queen.
Is it really?
They gave it to me for an un-birthday present.
I beg your pardon?
I am not offended, and it isn't respectable to beg.
I mean, what is an un-birthday present?
A present given when it isn't your birthday, of course.
I like birthday presents best.
You don't know what you're talking about.
How many days are there in a year?
Three hundred and sixty-five.
And how many birthdays have you?
One.
And if you take that from 365, what remains?
Three hundred and sixty-four, of course.
Well then, there are 364 days when you might get un-birthday presents.
Certainly.
And only one for birthday presents.
That's glory for you!
I don't know what you mean by glory.
Of course you don't, till I tell you.
I meant there's a nice knock-down argument for you.
But glory doesn't mean that.
When I use a word, it means what I choose it to mean, neither more or less.
The question is whether you can make words mean different things.
The question is, which is to be the master, you or the word? That's all.
However, I can manage the whole lot.
Impenetrability, that's what I say.
Would you tell me, please, what that means?
I meant by impenetrability that we've had enough of the subject, and it would be just as well if you would mention what you mean to do next,
as I suppose you don't mean to stop here all the rest of your life.
Fancy it meaning all that.
You seem very clever at explaining words, sir.
Would you kindly tell me the meaning of a poem called Jabberwocky?
I read it a long time ago.
I can, but I won't.
That's all. Goodbye.
Goodbye, till we meet again.
I shouldn't know you if we did meet.
You're so exactly like other people.
The face is what one generally goes by.
That's just it. Your face is the same as everybody's.
The two eyes, so.
Nose in the middle, mouth under.
Now, if your two eyes were on the same side of your nose, or your mouth on the top, that would be some help.
It wouldn't look nice.
Wait till you've tried.
Watch out!
Help! Help! I'm falling!
Tell the King!
Tell him to bring his horses and his men!
Help!
What happened?
We ran into each other,
Your Majesty.
Good. I rather fancied something like that had happened.
Oh, Your Majesty,
Humpty-Dumpty fell off the wall!
I know, I know.
Four-thousand, two-hundred and seven of my soldiers are on the way.
Two without horses.
If all this King's horses and men
can't put him back together again, nobody can.
I'm glad Humpty will be all right. I was worried.
Well, don't be.
Look along the road and tell me if you can see either of my three messengers.
I see nobody on the road.
Oh, I only wish
I had such eyes!
To be able to see nobody, and at that distance!
Oh!
It's too, too bad!
Can I help you, sir?
On or off?
You are on.
In a short time
I shall be off again.
I'm so sorry. Are you the King's messenger?
I am the White Knight.
I see you're admiring my little box.
It's my own invention, to keep clothes and sandwiches in.
You see, I carry it upside down so the rain can't come in.
But the things can get out.
Do you know the lid is open?
Then if all the things have fallen out, the box is no use without them.
Can you guess why I did that?
I can't imagine.
In hopes some bees may make a nest in it. Then I should get the honey.
But you've got a beehive, or something like one, fastened to the saddle.
It's a very good beehive, too.
One of the best kind, but not a single bee has come near it yet.
That other thing's a mousetrap.
I suppose the mice keep the bees out
or the bees keep the mice out. I don't know which.
It isn't very likely there would be any mice on a horse's back.
Not very likely, perhaps,
but I don't choose to have them running all about.
You see, I'm well provided for everything.
That's the reason the horse has those anklets around his feet.
What are they for?
To guard against the bites of sharks. It's my own invention.
But let's go on. I'll go with you to the edge of the wood.
I hope you've got your hair well-fastened on.
Only the usual way.
That's hardly enough. You see, the wind is so strong here.
It's strong as soup.
Have you invented a plan for keeping the hair from being blown off?
Not yet, but I have a plan for keeping the hair from falling off.
I should like to hear it very much.
First, you take an upright stick, then you make your hair creep up it like a vine.
Now, the reason hair falls off is because it hangs down.
Things never fall upward, you know. It's my own invention.
You may try it if you like.
I'm a great hand at inventing things.
Now, I daresay you noticed the last time you picked me up,
I was looking rather thoughtful.
You were a little grave.
Well, just then I was inventing a new way of getting over a gate.
Would you like to hear it?
Very much, indeed.
Well, I'll tell you how I came to think of it. I said to myself,
"The only difficulty is with the feet.
"The head's high enough already."
Now, first I put my head on top of the gate, then my head's high enough, then I stand on my head, then my feet are high enough.
Then I'm over.
Sir Knight!
If there were only a gate down here,
I'd be in excellent position to cross it.
How can you go on talking so quietly with your head in a ditch?
What does it matter where my body happens to be?
My mind goes on working all the same.
In fact, I once invented a new pudding during the meat course.
In time to have it cooked for the next course? Hmm.
That was quick work.
Well, not the next course.
In fact, I don't believe that pudding ever was cooked.
What did you mean it to be made of?
Well, it began with blotting paper.
That wouldn't be very nice, I'm afraid.
Not very nice alone, but imagine how good it would be mixed with other things, such as gunpowder and sealing wax.
And here I must leave you.
This is the end of the wood.
You've only a few yards to go.
Down the hill, across that little brook, and then you'll be a queen.
At last!
But you'll stay and see me off first?
I shan't be long.
You'll wait?
Of course I'll wait.
I think it'll encourage me.
Thank you very much for coming so far out of your way.
For that, I shall expect you to cry a good deal as I go.
The poor, dear Knight.
He's the nicest person yet.
Well, here I am.
What's this?
A crown! A golden crown!
I'm a queen!
I'm a queen!
How dare you say that you're a queen.
What right have you to call yourself so?
You can't be a queen, you know,
till you've passed the proper examination, and the sooner we begin it, the better. Be seated.
Yes, Your Majesty.
I'm ready, Your Majesties.
Can you do addition?
Now what's one and one and one and one and one and one, one and one?
I don't know.
I lost count.
She can't do addition.
Can you answer any useful questions? How is bread made?
I know that.
You take some flour...
Where do you pick the flower, in a garden or in the hedges?
It isn't picked at all, it's ground.
But how many acres of ground?
I wish you wouldn't leave out so many things!
Oh, dear.
You know any languages?
What's the French for "fiddle-de-dee"?
Fiddle-de-dee's not English.
Whoever said it was?
Well, if you'll tell me what language fiddle-de-dee is,
I'll tell you the French for it.
Queens never make bargains!
I'm so sleepy.
She's tired, poor thing.
So, smooth her hair, lend her your nightcap and sing her a soothing lullaby.
I haven't any nightcap, and I don't know any soothing lullabies.
I'll have to do it myself.
Hush-a-bye lady in Alice's lap
When the feast's ready we've time for a nap
When the feast's over we'll go to the ball
Red Queen and White Queen and Alice and all
Now that you know the words, sing it through to me. I'm sleepy, too.
Now what am I to do?
Do wake up.
To the looking-glass world
It was Alice that said
"I've a scepter in hand
"I've a crown on my head"
No admittance until week after next.
Why... Why, how dare you!
Fill up the glasses as quick as you can
And sprinkle the table
With buttons and bran
Put cats in the coffee and mice in the tea
And welcome Queen Alice with 30 times three
Put cats in the coffee and mice in the tea
And welcome Queen Alice
With 30 times three
Then put in the glasses, molasses and ink
And anything else that is pleasant to drink
Mix sand with the cider
And wool with the wine
And welcome Queen Alice
With 90 times nine
Mix sand with the cider
And wool with the wine
And welcome Queen Alice
With 90 times 90 times
90 times nine
You've missed the soup and fish! Serve the roast!
You seem a little shy. Let me introduce you to that leg of mutton.
Alice, Leg of Mutton.
Leg of Mutton, Alice.
How do you do?
May I give you a slice?
Certainly not!
It isn't etiquette to cut somebody you've been introduced to.
Remove the roast!
Will you, won't you, will you, won't you...
Please don't introduce the Pudding, or we shall get no dinner at all.
May I give you some?
Pudding, Alice.
Alice, Pudding.
What impertinence!
How would you like it if I were to cut a slice out of you, you creature?
Make a remark.
It's ridiculous to leave all the conversation to the Pudding.
Well...
You'd better prepare.
We're about to drink to your health. Queen Alice's health!
Queen Alice's health!
Queen Alice!
Queen Alice!
She ought to make a speech. A speech!
So she ought!
A speech! A speech!
A speech!
A speech!
Speech!
Speech!
I rise to return thanks.
Take care! Something's going to happen! Something's going to happen!
Here I am!
There was a looking-glass room, and you were the Red Queen.
There was a whole looking-glass country.
Carl Denham.
Mrs. Hudson! Mrs. Hudson!
Get out! I'll have you arrested.
That's my business...
Pretending to be the gas man.
- I'm supposed to...
- The very idea.
All right, Mr. Denham. It's only me.
I am sorry, Mr. Denham. He said he was the gas man. Had a card and everything.
Listen, Mrs. Hudson, as long as I am rooming in your house... if your own father comes to the door, don't you believe a word he says.
It's a pity the people in New York don't try and catch a few gunmen... instead of hunting a nice gentleman like you.
Is Mrs. Hudson there?
Oh, ho. That's the lady in the front room.
- Oh.
- Coming.
I'm from the news.
Is that so? Well, I've got news for you:
You're going to get out of this room so fast...
- No, I'm not.
- Ladies, no riots, please.
If people don't stop getting into my house under false pretenses...
I just want a story.
If I go back without it, I'll lose my job.
- Don't bother to pull that old line.
- You're big news, you know.
What, after a whole month?
That's time enough for New York to forget the World War.
The War was a long way off, but King Kong, the giant ape...
- ...was right here on the spot.
- So I've heard.
And you're the man that brought him here.
Kong is dead. But everybody's interested in you, too, Mr. Denham.
All those people that Kong killed and injured... all the property owners who are suing you for damages, and...
And the theater owners, and the men who put money in advanced publicity, and...
Say, are you telling me?
Why don't you let him alone? He hasn't dared leave the house for a week.
That's what I want, the personal reaction story.
You want to know what the captor of the late Kong...
- ...thinks about, eh?
- Yes.
I thought I had him safe.
Don't you suppose I'm sorry for the harm he did?
I wish I'd left him on his island.
Old Kong, I'm sure paying for what I did to you.
Mrs. Hudson, suppose we look out and count the gentlemen in disguise... who are waiting for me?
If I don't get out of this house pretty soon, I'll choke.
Hey!
Aren't you going to give me a story?
All right, tell my public that Carl Denham, the bright boy... who was going to make a million dollars out of King Kong, is flat broke.
Everybody in New York is suing me for something.
The only place I haven't heard from is the Bide-A-Wee home.
But, Mr. Denham, my readers want to know...
There's a newsboy and a peddler and a taxi driver out there.
I'll bet you a nickel they're all process servers.
- There's a man coming up the steps.
- Huh?
Why, it's Charlie. Let him in.
- Hello, Charlie, what do you want?
- Captain Englehorn send you this.
- Where'd you come from?
- All time, stay on ship.
- Cook for Skipper. Easy job.
- Mm.
Tell the Skipper I'll be over at the ship as soon as I can get out of here.
- What's matter? You scared to come out now?
- You said it. Much obliged, Charlie.
- Maybe you can get out through the basement.
- Come on. Let's try it.
Rags.
Bottles, rags.
You've got a nerve.
I got everything, lady.
And I buy everything.
Rags, bones.
Say, you fresh guy!
Mrs. Hudson.
Mr. Carl Denham.
Well, I'll be. Hello, Mickey.
- Hello.
- Have a heart, will you?
That's 15 of those things you've slipped me.
- I'm the best in the business, Mr. Denham.
- Well, what is it this time?
Steiner and Wayne.
Destruction of property by Kong on 39th street.
Shock, mental anguish, and sprained ankle to owner of said property.
If I don't get out of this house,
I'll bite somebody.
Listen, Mickey, I've got a date.
You've done your job.
How about helping me out-smart those other guys?
Mr. Denham, I'll give you a ride on my junk wagon.
You... Ha, ha. You mean to say you've got a wagon to go with that makeup?
Mr. Denham, I'm an artist.
Hey.
How did you get in there?
You can go from the roof to chimney.
Anthony St. Nick and Santa Claus.
Ooh. Commence.
Rags.
Bottles. Bones.
Rags. Hey, you can take off the tin hat.
You're safe now.
Where are you going, Mr. Denham?
Drop me at the nearest subway station, James.
You know, it's funny how anybody's troubles are somebody's gain.
I've been working steady since you got in this jam.
You've no idea how that cheers me up.
The boy who was going to make a million dollars.
Rags!
So that's the mess I'm in, Skipper.
Kong sure was a hoodoo for me.
I guess next time you leave big monkey alone, huh?
Next time? Ha, ha.
Charlie must think Kongs are plentiful.
Well, Denham, now I'll tell you why I wanted to see you.
- I've got a plan for both of us-
- What is it?
Going to get a couple of megaphones and run sightseeing trips around the harbor?
- Ha-ha-ha.
- Mr. Denham, I...
Mickey.
- One more summons and I'll brain you.
- No, wait, Mr. Denham.
I ain't got no summons. Honest. I ain't.
I come to tip you off.
- Did you follow me over here?
- No, I live over here.
My father-in-law said he saw you come in by the gates.
I feel very friendly to you, Mr. Denham.
You've kept me working pretty steady lately.
Yeah, sure, I know, I've been a big help.
Now, what's on your mind?
I heard this afternoon you're going to be indicted.
- What?
- Indicted.
- The grand jury's going to indict you.
- Let me out of this. I'm going crazy.
You take my tip and get out.
Summons is one thing and grand jury is something else already.
- They are going to put you on the stand.
- Stop it! All right, Mickey, much obliged.
- Now beat it, will you?
- All right. Such a fine customer.
Oh, Denham?
- Denham, I...
- What good is the grand jury?
What can they find out?
I brought Kong back here, he got loose, did a lot of damage... got killed, and that's that.
- What can I do about it?
- We can go to jail for 10 years.
- What do you mean, "we"?
- I'm in it, too, up to my neck.
Now, see here. This ship's still mine.
There are no attachments on her yet.
- They just haven't got around to you.
- That's a good reason for hurrying.
In three hours, I can get together a skeleton crew, enough to handle her.
Yeah, and we'll go yachting.
We can make some sort of a living carrying freight.
Take the East Indies.
There are hundreds of little ports there that no sizable ship ever goes to.
- I know that part of the world.
- What'll we use for money?
Well, I... I've saved up a little.
Enough to get us started.
- Yes, but...
- Come on, Denham.
You know, Skipper... you're pretty swell to be willing to take me with you.
- Is it a go, then?
- What?
To be off on this old ship again, out of all this?
Say, you bet it's a go.
Well, this looks like a hustling community, Skipper.
Suppose we can get any business here?
Better get some soon, or we won't be able to pay the crew.
Say, uh, how far is it to Kong's island?
1,753 miles.
Well, you're pretty glib with that.
You must have been checking up.
Huh? Oh.
I just happened to come across our old chart last night... and I was curious.
Yeah, sure.
- Bosun.
- Yes, sir.
Get that number two hatch off and break out the cargo.
That won't take very long.
If we weren't so short-handed,
I'd get rid of that man.
He's a troublemaker.
Of course, Wong Ho would have to ship his copra last week.
Well, let's see.
There's a couple of half-caste traders here.
We might see them tomorrow...
- ...and get a bit of a cargo.
- Look, Skipper. There's a show in town.
- I'll bet it's terrible.
- Don't be a crab, Skipper. It's a show.
We ought to see it.
- I want a drink and some dinner.
- There's plenty of time for that.
You don't mean to say you're going to miss the sagacious seals?
Don't you want to laugh and thrill with La Belle Helene?
Thank you, ladies and gentlemen.
Thank you.
Come, Bobby. Come, George.
Come, Fattima. In with you.
And now, La Belle Helene!
Sweet songstress who has appeared before all the crowned heads of Europe... will conclude the performance... with one of her most popular songs.
La Belle Helene!
Oh, I've got the runaway blues
I want to wander away
Oh, I've got the runaway blues today
Don't want to stay
I know that trains are going somewhere
And steamers are sailing the blue
They go, but baby, what do I care?
'Cause none of them's going to you
Poor kid.
- You know, she's got something.
- It certainly isn't the voice.
Voice, who cares? She's got personality.
Somebody'd show her what to do with it.
I hear the steamer whistle crying
Whoo, whoo
It's just an echo when I'm sighing
Whoo, whoo
You ran away and never told me
What for, what for
And now your arms will never hold me
No more, no more
I don't want the train on the track
Don't want the ship on the sea
Why? 'Cause they ain't bringing you back to me
Poor me
Thank you for your kind reception of our efforts.
And remember, another big show here tomorrow night.
Well, if that's your idea of a pleasant evening, I...
It's interesting, Skipper.
I'll bet you could take a kid like that... and put her over to the producer of a musical comedy.
- But not to the captain of a freighter.
- Ha, ha.
Father, is that man coming again tonight?
Yes, he is. Any objection?
Can't I have a friend drop in?
- He isn't a friend.
- Well, he's a white man...
- ...somebody to talk to.
- Somebody to drink with.
That's enough. Shut up now and go to bed.
You can't get away from here. No money.
How you think you can get away from here? Huh?
Your Dutchman will be here in a couple of days, won't he?
Dutch magistrate? Ha!
What do you think he'll do for you?
He don't care what happens to you and your rotten little show.
Not a rotten show.
I was ringmaster in the biggest circus.
Used to play Colombo, Singapore.
Sure, and you was rotten.
Who're you calling... Who are you?
- Rotten captain!
- You lay off me.
Rotten captain, lost ship.
Lost it on purpose, eh?
Tried to get the insurance...
- ...didn't you?
- Shut up.
Poor captain.
Lost ship, lost job.
Lost certificate.
Ah, dry up, you old tramp.
You're a tramp.
No certificate, no job.
You're no better than me.
And you just lay off my liquor, will you?
Give it back.
Father! Father!
Father!
Father, Father, tell me what happened.
Who did it?
Tony.
Tony, come down.
Tony.
Tony, please, come down.
Tony.
Tony.
- Tony.
- You'll never catch a monkey that way.
- Did you ever catch a monkey?
- Did I ever...? Ha, ha.
Lady, you'd be surprised.
They won't come back.
Oh, well, why should they?
Oh, uh...
I saw your show last night.
How'd the monkeys get away?
I had to let them out.
The tent burned.
Where's the man who owns the show?
He's my father.
He was hurt.
He's dead.
Well, what a tough break.
I'm sorry, kid.
My father used to be with World Wide.
- That's the biggest circus in the East.
- Yes, I know. What did you do?
I was in the ballet.
I wasn't very good.
What happened to World Wide?
Well, my father... Well, he sort of drank.
You know.
And...
They didn't want him anymore.
- So he started his own show.
- Yes.
Well, we just had a few monkeys.
It wasn't very good.
Say, that's no way to talk.
"I wasn't very good, the show wasn't very good."
Cut it out! You want to tell everybody how good you are.
Throw out your chest. Brag about yourself.
Oh.
So you're in the show business too.
No, I'm in the shipping business.
- I just put in with the cargo.
- Oh.
I thought maybe you had a show, and I could...
No, I'm sorry.
Well, I've got a date.
Are you going to be all right?
I mean, have you got any money?
Yes.
Well, keep your chin up.
I'll be seeing you.
Miss, I heard about your father.
- If I could do anything...
- You've done enough.
You killed my father.
Killed? Why, what...?
The tent caught fire.
My father was beaten over the head.
He wasn't burned.
What do you think the magistrate will say to that when he gets here?
You can't accuse me.
- You wasn't there.
- How do you know I wasn't?
Unless you were.
How do you know what my father said to me before he...?
Before he died?
He... What did he say?
The magistrate will be here in a few days.
I'll tell him.
You better be careful.
What are you going to tell the magistrate?
You can just wonder about that till he gets here.
- There isn't a pound of cargo for us here.
- What'll we do now?
Might pick up some business in the Banda group.
It's a dull life, Skipper.
We need excitement.
Carl Denham.
Don't you remember me?
- Nils Helstrom.
- Well, for the love of Mike. Helstrom.
Sure, I remember you.
This is Captain Englehorn.
Captain Helstrom. Sit down.
Say, do you know who this is?
The man who gave me the map of Kong's island.
And he wants to know if I remember him. Ha-ha-ha!
Have a drink.
So, that was your ship came in last night?
Mine and Denham's.
I heard about you in Singapore.
How you'd captured the biggest animal on earth and taken him back to New York.
Agh.
I'm down, Denham.
- Don't you think you owe me something?
- Ha, ha.
Well, sir, you certainly came to the right man.
- How about a 50-50 split?
- You mean that?
Sure, I mean it. I'll give you half of everything I made out of King Kong.
- How much would that come to?
- Well, let's see, 10... no, 11 lawsuits and the privilege of being indicted by the grand jury too.
- Ah. Then you're broke too?
- Broke? I'm shattered.
Well, then how about giving me passage on your ship?
- I want to get away from here.
- Where's your own ship?
I lost her on the Banka reefs.
- Tough luck. No job since?
- Everyone is down on me.
It wasn't my fault.
You know what those waters are like.
Will you take me to some port that isn't Dutch?
- What's the matter with the Dutch?
- I tell you, they're down on me.
I want to make a fresh start.
You realize how far we'd have to go to land you out of Dutch, uh... jurisdiction?
We can't run all over the Indian Ocean carrying one passenger.
Sorry, old man. Have another drink.
But, Denham, when you got Kong off that island... didn't you get the treasure?
- What?
- Didn't you find the treasure?
Find it?
Why, I never even heard of it.
- Say, are you kidding me?
- Why should I?
To tell the truth, I had an idea
I'd go and look for it myself someday.
You held out on me, eh?
How much do you know about this treasure?
Well, not a lot.
Dying native I picked up at sea...
You drew the map from his description, and he told you about the great wall.
Yeah, he talked about the treasure of the island.
Who put it there?
Why, the people who built the wall.
Yes, that might be.
Skipper, do you remember I said there wasn't a reason... on Earth for going back?
Look. The answer to a prayer.
We're off again.
Hello. I heard you were stopping here.
Felt a little worried about you.
Thought I'd better see you before I go.
- Are you going?
- Yes. Off tonight in a big rush.
- On your ship?
- Yeah, sure.
There isn't any other way to get out of this place, is there?
Oh, uh, here, you take this.
- Can't I go too?
- What?
- Let me go on your ship.
- Nix, kid, nix.
We're going on a long voyage.
We won't be putting in at any port where we could leave you.
Don't leave me. Please, take me with you.
I won't be any trouble.
I'll just sit on the ship.
I won't talk or anything.
Listen, kid, I can't. Honest.
Now, you take this money and buy yourself a passage on the next ship... that's going where you want to go.
- Go on, take it.
- Let me go with you.
Please. Please.
No, no, no, nothing doing.
Now, you take it. Sorry it isn't more, but that's the best I can do.
There'll be a schooner or something along pretty soon.
I can't take you, kid. You'll be okay.
You just make a plan and stick to it.
- All right.
- That's a good girl.
It's a pretty tough life, isn't it?
Well...
Good luck.
- Weather's made-to-order, Skipper.
- I hope it holds.
The next land we sight will be Kong's island.
Yeah.
That fellow Helstrom is getting too chummy with the crew.
- I don't like it.
- Why don't you call him down for it?
What's your opinion of Helstrom?
Well, he got in some trouble over losing his ship, I guess.
That's pretty plain.
He certainly was anxious to leave Dakang.
And he isn't at all anxious to get to Kong's island.
Have you noticed him when we talked about the time we were there?
- Think he's scared?
- Scared green.
Green now and yellow later on, eh?
- Does he expect us to go ashore?
- Why, sure.
He's got to have a bodyguard, hasn't he?
Say... do you know there was a dozen sailors killed on the last voyage he made here?
- Killed? By them animals?
- Yeah.
But, you see, Denham and the skipper came out all right.
But you don't have to worry.
There's plenty of rifles aboard.
If I was captain, I certainly wouldn't take my crew into danger.
- Hey!
- What?
Wha...?
Hey, Bill.
Where?
Hey, Connelly.
If you want me to, I'll give Helstrom a tip that he's too thick with the crew.
Go ahead. Bad for discipline.
We must be in Russia. Here comes the Committee of the Workers.
- Captain Englehorn.
- Well?
- Captain, I went down in forward hold.
- Well, what of it?
- Captain, I found something.
- What's the matter? Found what?
Holy mackerel.
- I just didn't have anywhere to go.
- All right, go back to your work.
This young lady a friend of yours,
Mr. Denham?
No. Well... yes. I met her, that is,
I talked with her in Dakang.
Look here, this isn't my fault.
I told her she couldn't come.
Well...
We can't take her back. Mr. Helstrom.
You ought to be beaten to a pulp.
You called me?
Yes, we have a passenger, and she...
You. How did you get here?
This is our partner.
I know him.
You do?
Yes, of course, you couldn't help seeing each other in Dakang, could you?
Well, here we are.
Just one big, happy family.
You take the words right out of my mouth.
You keep your mouth shut.
You promise me to keep quiet.
I won't promise.
You crazy brat. Denham's sore at you anyway for being here.
You try to make trouble between us, and he'll be off you for life.
Skipper's looking for you.
Say, I don't know what's the matter with you and Helstrom... but we're all cooped up together on this ship.
I didn't ask you to come.
You're here on your own hook.
No matter who you like or dislike... you've got to behave and be pleasant.
Understand?
Are you mad at me?
Not very.
It's, uh... This is nice, isn't it?
It's all right.
Mr. Denham.
- Mr. Denham.
- Yeah?
Skipper says get dressed and come on deck.
Okay. What is it?
Have we sighted the island?
Yes, sir, about two miles off.
- Say, it's a thrill coming back here.
- Yes, sir.
You had a pretty bad time when you were here before, didn't you?
Yeah, it's a pretty tough spot.
The natives will be glad to see us.
We did them a good turn once, and I...
What the...?
I'm warning you all.
You're crazy to do a thing like this.
We're not crazy enough to go to that island.
- What is it, Skipper? Is this on the level?
- It's real enough.
- Where's Helstrom? They get him too?
- All right.
Over that side to the lifeboat.
All of you.
So this is why you've been spending so much time in the foxhole.
- What do you think you're doing?
- We know what we're doing.
Come on, get over the side.
You can row yourselves to your blasted island and stay there.
Yes, and if those animals kill anybody, it won't be us.
Yes. Get going.
Because you pay us your dirty money, you think you own us.
You sweat and drive us, but you don't give us a living wage for our blood and sweat.
- When did you do all this sweating?
- You think you own us, body and soul.
- Oh, listen to reason.
- We've listened enough.
We've got the ship and we're going to keep it.
- Over the side.
- You're not going to shove this kid off too.
She followed you aboard the ship, she can follow you off.
Do you think I want to stay? I know.
Here's your chance to get rid of me.
- He killed my father.
- What?
He was a drunken old tramp.
I didn't kill him.
I know you did.
He said you'd be angry if I tried to make trouble.
Well, what a fine partner you've turned out to be.
Aw, pipe down. Get going.
Of course, you know what this will mean when you get caught.
Listen, I'll call the whole thing off now.
We'll turn back.
Sure, and be arrested for mutiny as soon as we reach port.
I'll give you my word I won't report you.
It's too late for that kind of talk.
We'll stick by what we've done.
Over the side and see how you like it.
I'll be seeing you again, I hope.
What do you think the chances are?
- Charlie, they throw you off too?
- No throw off. Get off.
Me no like them men.
- Cast off.
- Wait.
Aren't you going to give us any guns?
We've given you food and water.
You're lucky to get that.
A smart man like you don't need a gun.
Good boy, Charlie.
You cook now, you die pretty soon.
Row, you blasted bourgeois.
You got a nice day for it.
Now, then, go to your places.
Stokers below.
Bosun.
- Get that ladder up.
- What was that?
I said, get the ladder up.
Oh! And I promote you.
- You'll be mate now.
- That's fine. Who's gonna be captain?
I'm taking command, of course.
Clear the decks. Get back to work.
Do you think that we got rid of a good captain... so we could have a bad one?
We're through with captains on this ship.
He wants to be boss.
Let him go with the rest of the bosses.
Yo-ho!
Ha!
That's where all captains belong, over the side.
Bon voygee, Captain Helstrom.
Something tells me we've got a passenger.
Well...
How nice to see you again, under the circumstances.
Skipper, have we got to save him?
Hey, Skipper, when the natives see us,
I bet they'll throw a party.
Well, maybe not a party.
It's the chief.
Hey, did you throw that, you rat?
He says yes, he did, because his village is destroyed... and his people are killed, and it's all our fault for leading Kong inside the wall.
Well, tell him not to attack us.
Tell him we overcame Kong... and we're still big mates.
Come on, Charlie, shove off.
We've got to find another place to land.
What's the good of this?
There's no way out.
Well, it's the only place we've seen where we could get a foot ashore.
Maybe we can climb up someplace.
You stick with me, kid.
A fly couldn't climb out of here.
Yeah, here's a way out.
Wait till I take a look.
- Uh, captain, I...
- Huh?
- About that mutiny, I...
- The less said, the better, Helstrom.
We're all in a tight place together, and I don't think you'll let us down.
No, no, of course not.
Of course not.
- I didn't know that you came.
- You said stick to you.
Do you obey orders?
Why doesn't Denham come back?
We'd better go look for him.
A smart man like you don't need a gun.
Ha!
Look!
Well, if it isn't the little Kong.
He's stuck in the quicksand.
He can't get out.
I never knew that old Kong had a son.
Don't you think we ought to help him?
Well, how?
If we could get logs and things to him, maybe he could get out.
- Aren't you afraid of him?
- Yes, sort of.
Well...
It sounds kind of silly, but I'm sorry for him.
So am I. But I've got a reason.
Animals always know when you're trying to help them.
I don't believe he'd hurt us if he got out.
I suppose we're both crazy, but let's try.
Look out, Skipper, that's quicksand.
Skipper, there's a...
Skipper, believe it or not, there's a little Kong.
What? A little...
- How little?
- Well, just a little one.
- About 12 feet high.
- Good...
Well, what happened? What did you do?
I know it sounds funny, but instead of shooting him, I helped him out of a jam.
I felt...
Well...
I felt I owed his family something.
You really feel conscience-stricken about King Kong, don't you?
Whatever you do, don't mention Little Kong to Helstrom.
- He'd have a nervous breakdown.
- I'd like to break his neck.
We ought to go hunting and save our rations for emergencies.
This is cut right into the side of Skull Mountain.
My guess, that temple.
- Maybe big devil live in there.
- A temple?
Helstrom, suppose the treasure should be hidden here.
That certainly would be wonderful.
- You'd better come along with me, Helstrom.
- We'll meet here at sundown.
My go with Skipper.
Unh!
I'd forgotten you.
You'd better wait right here.
We'll all be back soon.
Do you think I'm going to stay here alone?
Well, all right, then, come on with me.
But be quiet.
And don't talk.
I thought tropical jungles were full of fruit.
That's what everybody thinks who's never been...
Look.
Well, we won't starve, anyway.
Good boy, Little Kong.
Say, can he scrap, just like his old man.
- Look, he's hurt.
- Huh?
Poor Little Kong.
Do you suppose he knew he was helping us?
Of course not.
You want me to believe he was grateful?
Well, he did save us, didn't he?
And how do we know what animals think?
Let's go and help him.
Are you game?
Yes, if you are.
Wait.
If you talk, very calmly... sometimes that keeps animals quiet.
- You frightened him.
- Yeah, that's too bad.
Was I too rough with him?
Poor old boy.
Baby Kong.
Yeah, some baby.
You're not a patch on your old man.
I must be completely cuckoo to be doing this.
Giving you a ﬁrst-aid treatment instead of running like blazes.
Guess it must be remorse or something.
You see...
I'm the guy that knocked out your pop with a gas bomb and then... carried him off to New York in chains.
I've been sorry for it ever since.
Yeah, you see, the poor old geezer got shot at the finish.
I guess if I'd left him alone... we'd all have been better off.
This is sort of an apology.
There you are, boy.
Two good deeds in one day for something that size... we ought to be caught up on our good deeds for a year.
I wish I had one of those coconuts.
I'll see what I can do about it.
Hey, look what you're doing, you big dummy.
I wish you'd be a little more careful of what you wish for.
Hey.
You better lie down and do your sleeping.
I'm sorry. I didn't mean to go to sleep.
I was helping you keep watch.
I have to keep watch of you.
That's the third time I've caught you.
Aren't you going to signal the others again?
Well, there's no use wasting any more ammunition.
They'd have answered those shots
I ﬁred if they'd heard them.
You better lie down.
Here.
Take my coat for a pillow.
- You'll need it.
- No, I won't. I'll keep the fire going.
There you are.
You're a grand little scout.
I'm sorry I got you into all this mess, kid.
You didn't.
I came.
Well, then I'm glad they wouldn't let you stay on the ship.
But I'm just another trouble.
You told me not to come on the boat.
- Good night, kid.
- Good night.
It's gone.
What fashion animal you call that, huh? I no like.
Here's your gun.
Well, that leaves only one shotgun among us.
It's light enough now.
We better go and look for Denham and the girl.
Mm. Heh.
- Well.
- Good morning.
Good morning.
- No sign of the Skipper?
- No.
I'll fire one more shot.
Our guardian angel.
Hey, look.
I'm going to try and get into this place.
If you have no objections.
You're sure you don't mind?
Well, that's fine.
Listen, you attend to your business and I'll attend to mine.
Look! The treasure!
The treasure of the island!
I was expecting you.
Come on, baby.
We've found it!
Please, Little Kong, help us.
Hand it down.
Attaboy, Kong.
Stick to me, kid, and you'll wear diamonds.
Look at them.
Just look at them. We're rich.
We're all rich.
Well, what are you going to do with them?
Huh?
Yeah, I guess maybe a sailboat would be more useful.
Hey, put that down.
Hey, look out!
You'll shoot yourself, you half-wit.
Hey!
Hey, look out! You want to kill somebody?
Sure, you've fixed everything now.
You big rummy.
Do you think he's dead?
Denham.
That's the Skipper.
- What's happened? Where's your gun?
- It's broken, Skipper, but listen...
What? Both guns gone? We can't stay here. Let's go back to the boat.
Helstrom, the treasure, I...
You fool, there never was any treasure.
Let's go, let's get out of here.
Then that was just a yarn you were giving me.
Of course. I had to tell you that to get away from Dakang.
Then there isn't any treasure at all?
Helstrom. Helstrom.
- He's going to the boat.
- Why, that crazy fool may take it.
Let's go after him.
I'm going back for the rest of the treasure.
Make sure of the boat.
I'll catch up with you. Hurry!
Earthquake!
My poor kid.
It doesn't seem to matter very much.
Stick to me and you'll wear diamonds.
Look.
Look.
Ship.
Ship.
Hello, kid.
What are you thinking about?
Poor Little Kong.
Do you suppose he knew he was saving my life?
Well, I'm sure he did.
Pretty soon, when we get back... you'll be saying goodbye to me, won't you?
Yeah.
What?
Where are you going?
I don't know.
Well, you'll have plenty of money, kid.
We'll split the treasure four ways.
Couldn't you just split it... three ways?
How do you mean?
Well... one-third to the Skipper, one-third to Charlie... and one-third... to us.
Well, you said stick to you.
This is nice, isn't it?
It's all right.
I received your letter and got here as quickly as I could.
Now I am going to tell you why I sent for you.
20 years ago my brother and I quarreled over a woman he married her. They relocated near
Kennegamy house, northern Canada.
A child was born, a girl.
Wife died
I heard that my brother had strangely disappeared.
Lately I have had a desire to see that niece of mine.
And find out just what happened to my brother.
That's why I sent for you.
I am afraid I couldn't stand a drift.
I will be glad to do everything I can.
You know, I haven't forgotten that you were dad's best friend.
You see my brother's name was John Ball... wife's name was, Marie.
More likely, that will be the girls name too.
Its my hope that she will spend the remaining years of my life, here with me.
You know son?
Some day she is going to inherit this here, the ranch of the pines.
I understand and I will do my best to find her.
Couldn't ask no more than that.
- When can you leave?
- On the morning train..
Good!
Rod Drew!
What are you doing here?
Well hello Bobby?
Where are you heading for?
I am going home.
I just graduated.
That's nice!
Say, how is the old Alma Mater?
Oh, kind a quiet now... they haven't found any cows or goats in the dormitory since you left.
Don't tell me the place has deteriorated into a school of learning.
Sit down.
Oh, I cant now!
My mind is in the middle of a poker game.
But I have a lot to tell you,
I will be back later.
Okay.
- Don't loose your shirt!
- No!
I saw from where that one came from.
What are you doing, getting sore when you start to loose?
You tin horn...
I didn't do it, Rod.
They framed me.
I caught him cheating and he pulled a gun on me.
Its murder.
Come on.
Nice way to have a bath.
You shouldn't have done that Rod.
Now you are in it, as much as I am.
Don't worry about that, Bobby.
The main thing is to get out of here before they pick us up.
We are about a mile from Fort Minnetaki.
We should be able to buy a change of clothes there.
Lets get started.
Here you are, Mister.
Come on, Bobby.
Telegram for you Martial.
It must be that fellow who drifted down in this morning.
Well, there they are now.
We are going to have a talk with them.
Hey you fellas, wait a minute.
Wait a minute there.
Come on, Bobby.
That's them alright!
Come on lets run them down.
We got to jump for it.
It's our only chance.
They got away.
Notify the Mountain police.
From Minetaki they have headed north.
One of them is half-breed, but we do not have any description of the other.
- You better start at Fort Minnetaki.
- Yes Sir!
We can take a shortcut through Wabinosh
House, its on the bend of the river.
Once we make there, we will be safe for a while.
The cabin looks deserted.
We can camp there for the night.
Gold!
It's a map.
They must have fought for it.
Shows the location of their mine.
We, John Ball and Peter Plante... having discovered gold at this point do hereby agree to joint partnership in it and do pledge ourselves... to forgot our past differences and work in mutual goodwill and honesty
'so help us God' signed John Ball and Peter Plante.
So this is what happened to John Ball.
John Ball?
Why are you interested in him?
He is one of the reasons I am up here.
And the other?
His daughter.
Bobby, when we get to Wabinosh House... we will make a search for this mine.
Well, Bobby!
- Bobby!
- Felice!
Gee .. I am glad to see you.
I am glad to see you, Bobby.
Felice, this is Rod Drew.
My best friend in college.
Miss Newsome.
How do you do Miss Newsome?
How do you do Mister Drew.
Well how are you Bobby?
Glad to see you back.
I am glad to be back Mister Newsome.
Mister Newsome, this is Rod Drew.
How do you do Mister Newsome!
Howdy!
Are you going to be with us for some time?
No, I am afraid not. We are only going to stay long enough to get supplies.
Oh!
Where are you going?
Well! You see ..
We were thinking of hunting wolves.. and we want to get our trap plans plotted early.
Oh!
In the mean time I have some things here I would like to leave with you for safekeeping.
- Would you please keep this safe?
- Well, certainly!
- Benoit! Place this in the safe.
- Oui, monsieur.
Felice will get you what supplies you need.
We can put you up right here at the post.
Thanks Mister Newsome, that will be fine.
You boys come along with me now and I will show you to your room.
- Bonjour LaRocque.
- Bonjour. Eh! What have you got?
You wait I show you.
- More bullets, eh?
- Oui!
When the winter catches in we will attack Wabinosh House... and bring them to knees with their our own ammunition, eh?
Oui, and she is coming in pretty quick now.
And the ammunition is very low.
But Newsome, he don't know that.
I emptied his box and put them back on the shelves.
Good.
And now, I have the grand news for you.
Two strangers have arrived at the post with a map full of gold.
- A map of gold?
- Oui.
- Where is it?
- Je ne sais pas.
I have only seen the word 'Gold' marked on the map.
Newsome had me put it into the safe.
- You can open that safe?
- Do not know if I can do that.
- You try?
- Oui.
I will give you two men.
You will go there tonight.
Oui.
It is of no use,
I cannot get it.
But she can.
She knows the combination.
Ah!
- Benoit!
- Get her.
Ah, ah!
Felice, Felice!
She is gone!
Eh!
Who is this?
Its Abonga.
What are you doing here?
We found him wounded in Felice's room.
And she is gone.
Felice gone?
Ah!
LaRocque, eh?
I have seen him before must have taken her to his place.
Who is LaRocque?
Renegade trader stationed up in the river here been giving us plenty of trouble, what were they after?
There is nothing up here of value.
Not even in the safe.
- Maybe its the map.
- We got to find Felice!
- We better head for LaRocque.
- We can go by canoe.
No, you cannot go that way.
There's not enough water.
We might make it.
One thing for certain.
It sure would give them surprise if you did get through.
Come on, lets try it.
I couldn't open the safe, but Felice she knows the combination.
Get her and bring her here.
Jules LaRocque!
So you are behind all this?
You will tell us the combination of that safe and we will set you free.
I will tell you nothing.
Lets see maybe you will.
Take one of their guns and start something.
Meet me at the back door.
Bobby!
Get him!
My gosh, she is getting away.
Eh, Bobby!
I have been thinking, maybe Felice can help me with my quest.
So you are up here on a quest?
I didn't come here, just to hunt wolves.
I will be very careful, if I were you.
Man-hunters are not exactly welcomed by most people around here.
Its not a man I am looking for, its a woman.
A young woman.
She is just about your age.
That sounds interesting, tell me about it.
Don't you think we better inform your father that you are safe?
Perhaps you are right, Bobby.
You make big mistake when you bring that girl here.
I had too!
She has seen me.
And now I cannot go back.
We will send Marie!
She is not known there.
Oui, that's a good idea.
She can tell them she escaped from
Kennegamy House.
He will need someone for my place.
That stranger have a map of gold that you must get.
But you must not tell him anything.
- Leave it to me. I will get it.
- I know.
Excuse me, monsieur.
Are you Mr. Newsome?
Yes.
I am Marie LaFleur from Kennegamy House.
I was a clerk there, and also took care of the accounts.
I am looking for work.
- Can you keep books?
- Oui monsieur.
Well you have got a job right now as far as I am concerned.
If you can help me out of this mess.
That will be simple, monsieur.
I will go and have a room prepare for you right away.
Thank you.
Did you say your name was Marie?
Oui monsieur.
I heard you say that you are from
Kennegamy House.
Have you lived along there long?
You are very inquisitive, monsieur.
I don't mean to be, but I am very interested.
I would like to have a talk with you.
If you wish.
What's the matter Felice?
I don't see why he should be so interested in that girl.
What do you care?
Are you beginning to like him?
Why no.
Things haven't been the same between you and me Felice.
Not since you met him,
I owe him my life.
But I am not going to let him come between us.
Why Bobby!
I never realized that you felt that way about me.
Do you have your map, young man?
Better not take any chances.
That LaRocque crowd is not giving up that easily.
We will be watching for them.
I am keeping my eye on them too.
Getting too many of them to be comfortable.
I have to keep watch on them..
Good-bye Mr. Newsome.
Take care of yourself. Well good luck!
Thank you.
Bobby, its not same without you.
Good-bye.
Goodbye, Felice.
Goodbye, Rod.
Goodbye Bobby.
Goodbye, Felice.
Well, what you find out?
Oh, he don't answer any questions.
I cant find out nothing from him about the map.
And this morning they start down the river.
It is too late.
No, I do not think it is yet too late.
I have another idea.
Well?
They leave this morning.
Yeah, I know. But what you found out at the mountain police post?
I found out plenty.
They are wanted men.
A mountain patrol left fort Minekati this morning to find them.
That is bad. If the police get them, we loose the map.
We must beat the police.
A mounty!
Get away from that gun.
You are under arrest.
Hit the trail, you two.
We are heading for Kennegamy House.
Not that way, this way.
I thought the Kennegamy House was south west of here.
I said we are heading this way.
So it is your little game, is it?
Pretty clever, eh!
Almost as clever, the way you got Felice.
I should kill you for that.
Get the map!
Tie them up, put them in there.
Line up against that wall.
So you are the real Mounty!
I thought that other guy was a fake.
See we go up the Way Sugar to the Big Mackey.
Come... we go!
We got to get out of here.
LaRouque must be way ahead of us.
- Yeah! With our map.
- That's where you are wrong.
I left the real one on my boot.
You are not turning him loose, are you?
He is the law!
I am not going to live him here to die.
You can do what you want. But if you turn me loose I will make arrest.
Don't be crazy Rod.
You turn him loose and we don't have a chance.
He will have every man on the fort trailing us.
Listen, we may be your prisoners, but you are coming along with us.
Till we find out what this map leads us into.
That's white peak al right, and according to the map, it is right below us.
Here it is.
There must be a small fortune in there.
What's this?
By Jove it looks like Felice!
Why Bobby, is Felice John Bali's daughter?
You knew it all the time, why didn't you tell me?
I knew, if you find out, you will take here with you and I loose her.
I know now, that she doesn't care for me.
Well, we better get started.
LaRocque will know by now that he has been send into a wild goose chase.
And nothing will stop him.
It is not here.
We have been tricked.
We go back to the cabin.
Hey look!
Maybe we will find them in the creek.
Look, there they go.
Keep rowing, Bobby!
Oh, look!
We got to stop it, the fall is just below there.
Not good Bobby.
We have got to get him back to Wabinosh House.
Three time they fooled us.
But no more.
You will bring all the men here.
This time we will fool them.
We will attack Wabinosh House for the gold and the furs.
And they will find the ammunitions all gone.
Ah, Mecogui!
What did you find out?
20, 30 men hold big pow wow with LaRocque.
Him come here quick.
They probably intend to attack.
Thanks Mecogui,
I will get guns and ammunition ready.
Come on Bobby!
Wait!
There is a mounted police force at fort Mippigon... and I am deputizing you to and get there.
I will get them Ryan.
Mr. Newsome, these are empty!
Empty?
Benoit, to blame for this.
We cannot hold them forever.
Bryan intended that we get help from Fort Mippigon.
Going after them.
Hold up them as long as you can.
LaRocque gang is attacking Wabinosh House.
I have only three men here, but we are deputizing every men in the settlement.
Call assembly.
Everyone is ready?
We go!
Someone must have tipped them off.
No matter, but they cannot hold for long.
You lead them to attack while I go for Marie.
Oui, beau.
- Good! Everything there!
- Yes, most of it.
Wait I will get the rest.
Not so fast, Marie!
Here they come!
Take cover, quick!
Well, Ryan, we are ready to go back anytime you are.
That wont be necessary.
The sergeant told me, the guy that Bobby had the fight, didn't die after all.
When he recovered consciousness he exonerated Bobby from shooting.
And you boys are free.
THE FIRST SOVIET SCI-FI MOVIE.
YEAR 1935
SPACE VOYAGE
A Science Fiction Story
Dedicated to the renowned scientist and film consultant K. E. Tsiolkovsky
Screenplay: A. Filimonov
Director: Vasiliy Zhuravlev
Music: Val. Kruchinina
Cameraman: A. Galperin
2-th Camera: I. Shkarenkov
Sound Producer: A. Zapadenski
Scene-Painter: A. Utkin,
M. Tiunov, Y. Shvets
In the Leading Roles:
Academician Sedikh - S.P. Komarov
Professor Karin - V. I. Kovrigin
Victor Orlov - N. Feoktistov
Andryusha Orlov - V. Gaponenko
Marina - K. Moskalenko
Producer:
MOSFILM 1935
It happened in Moscow in the summer of 1946 when the famous astro-physicist
Academician Sedych decided to fly to the Moon.
The USSR 
All-Union Institute of Interplanetary Communication
A.U.I.I.C.
"K. E. Tsiolkovsky"
Victor Orlov- a post-graduate student at the Institute
ANDRYUSHA, his brother
EXPRESS TELEGRAM
STUNNED BY SEDYCH'S
DECISION TO FLY TO THE MOON stop
STOP THE INSANE stop
HAVE PROOF stop
KARIN
MARINA,
Professor Karin's assistant
Let's go to the hangar, we'll analyze it over there
You'd be better off going to school
Faster!
The Constructor of the First Rocketplane 
Academician P. I. Sedych
How many times have I to tell you - no filming until I'm back from the Moon
It's bad to be so bothersome
I sympathize with you- popularity is awfully tiring!
I'm an inventor too!
My invention - the catapult with telescopic aim - former slingshot
That's amazing! Let's go,
I'll show you my invention
JOSEPH STALIN.
USSR 1
KLIM VOROSHILOV.
USSR 2
Yeah! This is stunning!
The passengers' cabin - Command Center of the Rocketplane
What a lucky man you are!
You'll be the first man on the Moon
The oxygen apparatus is ready for the flight
Director of the Institute's Experimental 
Department- Professor Karin
EXPRESS TELEGRAM
STUNNED BY SEDYCH'S DECISION TO FLY TO THE MOON stop
STOP THE INSANE stop HAVE PROOF stop
KARIN
So where is your proof?
Here's the brilliant proof: At 100.000 kilometers from the Earth ...and heart rupture
But, my friend, I'm not a rabbit
You're an old man though...
Until my experimental rockets give a signal from the Moon, 
I shan't allow you to risk your life
We can't risk the life of a man like this...
We can't risk the life of a man like this...
That evening the prof. Karin's rocket 
# 128 was setting off to the Moon
...with a new test object aboard - a pussycat
These experiments can last forever
Victor! Let's fly ourselves and open the way into Space!
It began the night of the space voyage and the last preparations were under way
At the Sedych's house everyone was preparing for the voyage
Why are you packing so many things, darling?
Listen to me!
I can't keep quiet anymore!
There's a whole conspiracy against you
Karin has been plotting with Victor to stop you flying to the Moon!
Victor too?
Mother always called
Victor a cry-baby
But I'm here, ready to go with you anywhere you want!
Comrade on Duty! Let these young astronomer through to the hangar.
Prof. Sedykh.
But where are you going?
To the Moon
They won't even let you through to the starting area!
Don't harass mom, I'll bring you a present from the Moon
That night Prof. Karin was waiting for the landing flash of the Rocket # 128
Get ready - just a few minutes to go!
Comrade on Duty! Let these young astronomer through to the hangar.
Prof. Sedykh.
JOSEPH STALIN
The Lift-off Brigade
- take your places!
The rocket # 128 has disappeared!
Pavel Ivanovitch! We won't let you fly away...!
Crew! Get ready!
Marina! I suggest you to fly with me to the Moon
To the Moon?!
I'M READY!!
Pasha...  you're insane ...
STOP!
Andriusha! I'll fly!
My old man is going to fly to the Moon. The temperature there is -270 degrees, but he's forgotten his warm felt boots!
Forward - INTO SPACE!
And May Live the Youth !!!
Do what you want with me but I'm not leaving.
Before the start the Crew immersed themselves in special baths to avoid the fatal jolts from the blast-off
At the 5th minute of the flight, at 80 km from Earth,
Academician Sedych switched off the rocket engines and at that very moment the austronauts became weightless
Be careful!
Mind you're weightless!
Velocity.
Kilometers.
Bravely!
What a wonderful feeling it is!
I want to fly to you but fly back...
What a world without weight!
Let's open the portholes and start observing
Aim more accurately!!
There it is
- Our Moon!
The Lunar landing time was approaching.
Astronomers on Earth were waiting for a flash from the rocketplane as agreed
The Moon was approaching
Get into the baths!
Quick to the porthole!
The Moon!!
On 9th August, dressed in impenetrable costumes, supplied with oxygen apparatus, the Austronauts went out onto the airless Moon surface.
Radio equipment gave the voyagers the possibility to communicate with each other
Where's the Earth?
We landed on that side of the Moon which can never be seen from the Earth
What's there to think about?
Let's start the rocket and fly over to the opposite side
But the oxygen supply is only enough for the way back.
I won't risk it
Make all the preparations for the signal flash and I'll go to explore
You know - I haven't slept for 48 hours
Then eat something and go to bed quickly
It's hard - going out there...
But then
I've seen the Earth!
Pavel Ivanovitch! It seems the oxygen tank is damaged
An unexpected accident - our return is under threat
We have to tell Earth that we have reached the Moon
Let's send the signal straight away!
Let the kid sleep - this journey is beyond his strenght
Marinochka, I haven't slept so well in ages!
An unexpected accident - our return is under threat
Comrades!
We've had an accident on board but you conceal it from me!?
You're sending the signal but didn't took me!!
What? Am I a small boy?!
The Earth!!
But where is Pavel Ivanovitch?
Pavel Ivanovitch! !
Pavel Ivanovitch! !
Cheer up, Marinka!
The expedition must go on!
Quick to the telescopes...
The Moon!!
USSR
Let's search - quickly!
Pavel lvanovitch!!
Pavel lvanovitch!!
What are the flashes over there?
Pavel lvanovitch!
The rocket # 128 is signaling.
It means the pussycat is alive!
Pavel lvanovitch!
Radio
Marinka! His radio!
He is near
Look - these are my sling shott's balls
We've signaled to the Earth!
And we've got an answer!!
What is this white stuff?
Is it snow?!
No - these are frozen remains of the Moon's atmosphere!...
They'll replace our lost oxygen!!
You collect the atmosphere and I'll recover the pussycat
Many days have passed since the signal from the Moon.
The  rocketplane hasn't returned.
The decision has been made to send a second interplanetary giant on a voyage...
The first austronauts have paved the way into Space...
They reached the Moon but some obstacle don't allow them to come back home
We'll reach the Moon and all return together!
Give these flowers to Andriusha!
Look, a rocket is landing with parachutes! It's them!!!
Greetings to the fearless Andryushka
And where is the 4th passenger?
The pussycat!... Alive!!
So professor Karin, as you see the Moon has been reached and our hearts still intact
Comrades!
The Experimental Space
Voyage is complete!
The way into Space is naw OPENED!
THE END
Timing and text corrections:
Asen Zlatarev and John Atanasov
Hippolyta.
I wooed you with my sword and won your love doing you injuries.
But I will wed you in another key.
With pomp, with triumph and with reveling.
[BOLD FANFARE PLAYING]
CROWD [SINGING]:
Theseus be blessed
For making up this peace
When earthly things made
Even atone together
Then there is mirth
In heavens
Theseus be blessed
For making up this peace
When earthly things made
Even atone together
Then there is mirth
In heaven
Theseus be blessed
For making up this peace
When earthly things made
Even atone together
Then there is mirth in heaven
In heaven
Trumpets and fifes
Trumpets and fifes
Make dance the sun
Make dance the sun
Trumpets and fifes
Trumpets and fifes
Make dance the sun
Make dance the sun
Trumpets and fifes
Trumpets and fifes
Make dance the sun
Make dance the sun
Trumpets and fifes
Trumpets and fifes
Make dance the sun
Make dance the sun
Theseus be blessed, be blessed
Theseus be blessed
Welcome, welcome, Theseus
Welcome, Theseus
Hail
Theseus, hail
Go, Philostrate.
Stir up the Athenian youth to merriments.
Awake the pert and nimble spirit of mirth.
Turn melancholy forth to funerals.
The pale companion is not for our pomp.
Stand forth, Lysander.
With cunning did you steal my daughter's heart.
Turned her obedience, which is due to me, to stubborn harshness.
I am, my lord, beloved of beauteous Hermia.
But she is mine. I may dispose of her.
Which shall be either to Demetrius, or to her death.
According to our law, immediately provided in that case.
So will I die, my father.
Before I yield my maiden virtue up unto his lordship, whose unwished yoke my soul consents not to give sovereignty.
Relent, sweet Hermia.
[CHUCKLES]
Lysander, yield your crazed title to my certain right.
You have her father's love, Demetrius.
Let me have Hermia's.
- You marry him.
- Scornful Lysander.
True, he has my love.
And what is mine, my love shall give to him.
And she is mine, and all my right of her,
I hereby grant unto Demetrius.
My fortune is, my lord, as fairly ranked, if not with vantage, as Demetrius'.
[SOBBING]
Here is the scroll of every man's name which is thought fit through all Athens.
To play...
In our interlude...
[MAN LAUGHS]
- Shhh.
[MAN 2 GIGGLES]
...before the duke and the duchess on his wedding day at night.
[MAN LAUGHS]
Now, fair Hippolyta, our nuptial hour draws on apace.
Four happy days bring in another moon:
But, oh, methinks how slow this old moon wanes.
She lingers my desires.
Four days will quickly steep themselves in night.
Four nights will quickly dream away the time.
And then, the moon, like to a silver bow, new-bent in heaven, shall behold the night of our solemnities.
[FANFARE PLAYING]
EGEUS:
Happy be Theseus, our renowned duke.
Thanks, good Egeus.
What's the news with you?
Full of vexation am I and complain against my child, my daughter, Hermia.
Stand forth, Demetrius.
My noble lord, this man has my consent to marry her.
Stand forth, Lysander.
And, my gracious duke, this man has bewitch'd the bosom of my child.
You, you, Lysander, you have by moonlight at her window, sung with feigning voice, verses of feigning love.
Be it so.
She will not here before your grace, consent to marry with Demetrius.
I beg the ancient privilege of Athens, as she is mine, I may dispose of her.
For disobedience to her father's will, either to die the death or to give up forever the society of men.
What say you, Hermia?
Be advised, fair maid.
Demetrius is a worthy gentleman.
So is Lysander.
[THESEUS LAUGHS]
In himself, he is.
But in this case, lacking your father's voice, the other must be held the worthier.
I am, my lord, as nobly born as he, as well possess'd.
My love is more than his. Demetrius...
I'll declare it to his face.
Made love to Nedar's daughter, Helena, and won her soul.
And she, sweet lady, dotes, devoutly dotes, dotes in idolatry upon this fickle and inconstant man.
But I beseech your grace that I may know that the worst that may befall me in this case if I refuse to wed Demetrius.
Either to fit your fancies to your father's will, or else the law of Athens yields you up, and mark, by no means may we alter it.
To death, or to avow a single life.
So will l...
[SOBBING]
Hermia.
The course of true love never did run smooth.
Oh, spite.
To choose love by another's eyes.
Hear me, Hermia.
And if you love me, then steal forth your father's house tomorrow night.
[GASPS]
To the wood, a league without the town, will I go with you.
I have a widow aunt, a dowager from Athens is her house removed seven leagues.
There, gentle Hermia, may I marry you.
And to that place, the sharp Athenian law cannot pursue us.
Keep word, Lysander.
We must starve our sight from lovers' food till morrow deep midnight.
Oh, my good Lysander.
[HERMIA GASPS,
EGEUS STAMPS ROD]
[SINGING PLAYFULLY]
Larry, our play
is "the most lamentable comedy
"and most cruel death
of Pyramus and Thisbe."
[MAN LAUGHS]
First, good Peter Quince, say what the play treats on.
Then read the names of the actors and so grow on to a point.
- Answer as I call you.
- Masters, spread yourselves.
Answer as I call you.
-"Nick Bottom, the Weaver."
- Ready. 
Name what part I am for and proceed.
Nick Bottom, you are set down for... Pyramus.
[LAUGHING]
I play Pyramus. I play Pyramus.
I play Pyramus.
What is Pyramus?
[ALL LAUGHING]
A lover or a tyrant?
A lover... that kills himself most gallantly for love.
[MAN GIGGLING]
A lover.
A lover.
BOTTOM: If I do it, let the audience look to their eyes.
I will move storms:
[IMITATES WIND HOWLING]
[RATTLING SAW]
Yet my chief humor is for a tyrant.
I could play Ercles rarely, or a part to tear a cat in, to make all split.
"Francis Flute."
The raging rocks and shivering shocks shall break the locks of prison gates.
And Phibbus' car shall shine from far and make and mar the foolish fates.
[MAN GIGGLES]
Francis Flute.
This is Ercles' vein, a tyrant's vein.
A lover is more, uh, mm... condoling.
[GIBBERING SILLILY]
Francis Flute, the Bellows-mender!
FLUTE:
Nay.
Here, Peter Quince.
Flute...
Flute, you must take... Thisbe on you.
Thisbe?
What is Thisbe? A wandering knight?
A wandering knight.
It is the lady that Pyramus must love.
[MAN GIGGLES]
A lady.
Nay, faith, let not me play a woman.
- Flute.
- Nay, I have a beard coming.
That's all one. You shall play it in a mask, and you may speak as small as you will.
[HIGH VOICE]
Pyramus, Pyra...
[GIGGLING]
As small as you will.
If I may hide my face, let me play Thisbe too.
- No.
- I will speak in a monstrous little voice.
- No.
- Listen, listen.
[HIGH VOICE] Oh, Pyramus, my lover dear.
- No.
Thy Thisbe dear, and lady dear.
No, no!
No.
You must play Pyramus.
And, Flute, you Thisbe.
Well... proceed.
-"Robin Starveling, the Tailor."
- Here, Peter Quince, here, Peter Quince. 
You must play...
Thisbe's mother.
[CHUCKLING]
"Tom Snout, the Tinker."
Here, Peter Quince.
[GIGGLES]
You, Pyramus' father.
[GIGGLING]
Myself, Thisbe's father.
[GIGGLING]
Snug, the joiner.
You, the lion's part.
And I hope here is a play fitted.
Have you the lion's part written?
Pray you, if it be, give it me, for I am slow of study.
You may do it extempore, for it is nothing but roaring.
[RO ARING]
Let me play the lion too.
I will roar you, that I will do any man's heart good to hear me:
[RO ARS]
I will roar, that I will make the duke say, "Let him roar again!"
[RO ARS]
"Let him roar again."
[BOTTOM & SNUG RO ARING]
If you should do it too terribly, you would fright the duchess and the ladies, that they would shriek, and that were enough to hang us.
But I will aggravate my voice so that I will roar you as gently as any sucking dove.
[RO ARING GENTLY]
I will roar you an't were any nightingale.
[CAWING]
You can play no part but Pyramus.
Oh, Pyramus.
For Pyramus is a sweet-faced man.
A proper man, as one shall see in a summer's day.
A most lovely gentleman-like man.
Therefore, you must needs play Pyramus.
Well...
I will undertake it.
QUINCE:
But, masters, here are your parts.
STARVELING: Thisbe's mother,
Thisbe's mother, Thisbe's mother.
BOTTOM: Pyramus. Pyramus.
- Thisbe's mother, Thisbe's mother.
- And I am to entreat you,
- Oh, Thisbe's mother. request you and desire you, to con them by tomorrow night.
And let us by moonlight to the palace wood a mile without the town.
There will we rehearse for if we meet in the city, we shall be dogged with company and our devices known.
We will meet.
And there we may rehearse most obscenely and courageously.
Take pains, be perfect.
MEN:
Adieu. 
[HOOTING]
[CRO AKING]
[SQUEALING]
[ALL SINGING GENTLY]
[TRILLING]
How, now, Spirit!
[SPIRIT GIGGLES]
Whither wander you?
[SINGING]
Over hill, over dale
Through bush, through brier
Over park, over pale
Through flood, through fire
I do wander everywhere
Swifter than the moon's sphere
And I serve the Queen of Fairies
[TRILLING]
Are not you he that frights the maidens of the village?
[LAUGHS]
Thou speakest aright.
I am that merry wanderer of the night.
I jest to Oberon and make him smile when I a fat and bean-fed horse beguile...
[NEIGHING]
...neighing in a likeness of a filly foal.
[NEIGHING]
[LAUGHING]
The king doth keep his revels here tonight.
Take heed the queen, come not within his sight.
For Oberon is passing fell and wrath because that she as her attendant hath a lovely boy stolen from an Indian king.
[BOTH LAUGHING]
She never had so sweet a changeling.
But jealous Oberon would have the child knight of his train to trace the forest wild.
But she, perforce, withholds the loved boy crowns him with flowers and makes him all her joy.
[BOTH LAUGHING]
[ALL GIGGLING]
[LAUGHING]
[GRUMBLING]
How, now, here comes Oberon!
[ALL SHRIEKING]
Ill met by moonlight, proud Titania.
What, jealous Oberon.
Fairies, skip hence.
I have forsworn his bed and company.
[FAIRIES TRILLING]
Tarry, rash wanton.
Do you amend it then?
It lies in you.
Why should Titania cross her Oberon?
I do but beg a little changeling boy to be my henchman.
[FAIRIES SHRIEKING]
Set your heart at rest.
The fairy land buys not the child of me.
[FAIRIES SIGH]
His mother was a votaress of my order.
And for her sake, do I rear up her boy, and for her sake, I will not part with him.
[FAIRIES GIGGLING]
How long within this wood intend you stay?
Perchance till after
Theseus' wedding day.
[FAIRIES GIGGLING]
If you will patiently dance in our round and see our moonlight revels, go with us.
If not, shun me, and I will spare your haunts.
Give me that boy, and I will go with thee.
Not for thy fairy kingdom.
Fairies, away.
[PUCK LAUGHING]
My gentle Puck, come hither.
[PUCK LAUGHING]
Fetch me that flower, the herb I shew'd thee once.
Before milk white, now purple with love's wound, and maidens call it love in idleness.
The juice of it on sleeping eyelids laid will make or man or woman madly dote upon the next live creature that it sees.
Fetch me this herb.
And be thou here again ere the leviathan can swim a league.
[PUCK LAUGHING]
I'll put a girdle round about the Earth in 40 minutes!
Fair love, you faint with wandering in the wood.
And... to speak truth...
[CHUCKLES]
I have forgot our way.
[BOTH LAUGHING]
[SINGING]
I mean, that my heart unto yours is knit
So that but one heart
We can make of it
Two bosoms
Interchained with an oath
So then two bosoms
And a single troth
You told me they were stolen into this wood.
And here am l, like wood within this wood, because I cannot meet my Hermia.
[SIGHS]
I will overhear their conference.
I love you not, therefore pursue me not.
Where are Lysander and fair Hermia?
The one I'll slay, the other slayeth me.
You draw me, you hard-hearted adamant.
Give up your power to draw, and I shall have no power to follow you.
Do I entice you? Do I speak you fair?
Or, rather, do I not in plainest truth tell you I do not, nor I cannot love you?
And even for that do I love you the more.
[HUFFS]
I'll run from you and hide me in the brakes.
And leave you to the mercy of wild beasts.
The wildest has not such a heart as you.
If you follow me, you may be sure that I shall do you mischief in the wood.
Ay, in the temple, in the town, in the field, you do me mischief.
We cannot fight for love, as men may do.
We should be wooed and were not made to woo.
- You're...
[GROWLS]
I'll follow you... and make a heaven of hell.
To die upon the hand I love so well.
Fare thee well, nymph.
Before he leaves this grove, thou shalt fly him, and he shall seek thy love.
[ALL SINGING CHEERFULLY]
Oh, Peter Quince.
- Peter Quince.
- What say you, bully Bottom?
There are things in this, uh, comedy of Pyramus and Thisbe
- That will never please.
[GRO ANS]
First, Pyramus must draw a sword to kill himself.
- And?
- And which the ladies cannot abide.
[MAN CHUCKLES]
How answer you that?
[CHUCKLES]
By heavens, a grave mistake.
I believe we must leave the killing out, when all is done.
Not a whit.
I have a device to make all well.
[LAUGHS]
Write me a prologue.
And let the prologue seem to say, we will do no harm with our swords, and that Pyramus is not killed indeed.
[CHUCKLES]
And then, for the more better assurance, tell them that l, Pyramus, am not Pyramus.
MEN:
Huh?
But Bottom the weaver.
This will put them out of fear.
Well, we will have such a prologue.
Then, there's another thing.
- We must have a wall in the great chamber.
- A wall?
For Pyramus and Thisbe, says the story, did talk through the chink of a wall.
But you can never bring in a wall.
What say you, Bottom?
Some man or other must present wall.
Let him have some plaster or some loam, or rough-cast about him to signify wall.
And let him hold his fingers thus.
And through this cranny shall Pyramus and Thisbe whisper.
If that may be, then all is well.
Welcome, wanderer.
Hast thou the flower there?
- Here it is!
- I pray thee, give it me.
I know a bank
Where the wild thyme blows
Where oxlips
And the nodding violet grows
Quite over-canopied
With luscious woodbine
With sweet musk-roses
And with eglantine
There sleeps Titania
Sometime of the night
Lull'd in these flowers
With dances and delight
And with the juice of this
I'll streak her eyes
And make her full of hateful fantasies
[CHUCKLES]
The next thing then
She waking looks upon
She shall pursue it
With the soul of love
And before I take this charm off
From her sight
I'll make her render up this boy to me
Take thou some of it and seek through this grove.
A sweet Athenian lady is in love with a disdainful youth.
Anoint his eyes.
But do it when the next thing he espies may be the lady.
Thou shalt know him by the Athenian garments he hath on.
Effect it with some care so he may prove more fond of her than she is of her love.
Look thou we meet before the first cock crows.
Fear not, my lord, your servant shall do so.
Sing me now asleep.
Then to your duties go, and let me rest.
[SINGING]
Philomel, with melody
Sing in our sweet lullaby
Good night, with lullaby
FAIRIES:
Never harm, nor spell, nor charm
Come our lovely lady nigh
Good night, with lullaby
ALL:
Weaving spiders, come not here
Hence, you long-legg'd spinners, hence
Beetles black, approach not near
Worm do no offense
Philomel, with melody
Sing in our sweet lullaby
Good night, with lullaby
What thou seest when thou dost wake
Do it for thy truelove take
Be it leopard, cat, or bear
Wolf or boar with bristled hair
In thine eye that shall appear
[CHUCKLES]
When thou wakest, it is thy dear
[OBERON LAUGHS]
[SINGING]
Through the forest have I gone
Have I gone, have I gone
But Athenian found I none
Found l, found I none
On whose eyes I am to prove
Am to prove, am to prove
This flower's force in stirring love
Stirring
Stirring
[CHUCKLES]
Love
[LAUGHS]
We'll rest us, Hermia.
If you think it good.
And bathe here for the comfort of the day.
Be it so, Lysander.
Find you out a bed.
For l, upon this bank, will rest my head.
One turf shall serve as pillow for us both.
One heart, one bed, two bosoms and one troth.
Nay, good Lysander.
For my sake, my dear, lie further off yet.
Do not lie so near.
Oh, take the sense, sweet, of my innocence!
Then by your side no bedroom me deny.
For lying so, Hermia, I do not lie.
[BOTH LAUGH]
Lysander riddles very prettily.
But, gentle friend... for love and courtesy, lie further off.
In human modesty, such separation, as may well be said, becomes a virtuous bachelor and a maid.
[HERMIA LAUGHING]
So far be distant.
And good night, sweet friend.
Your love ne'er alter till your sweet life end.
Amen, amen, to that fair prayer, say I.
And then end life when I end Ioyalty.
Here is my bed.
Sleep give you all his rest.
With half that wish, the wisher's eyes be pressed.
[LYSANDER GRUNTS]
[SINGING]
Through the forest have I gone
Have I gone, have I gone
But... 
[GIGGLING]
Night and silence. Who is here?
[LAUGHING]
Dress of Athens he doth wear.
This is he, my master said.
Despised of the Athenian maid.
[LAUGHING]
And here's the maiden, sleeping sound.
On the damp and dirty ground.
Pretty soul.
She dares not lie near this lack-Iove.
Fool.
[LYSANDER GRO ANS]
Fool, upon thy eyes I throw
All the power this charm doth hold
When thou wak'st, let love forbid
Sleep his seat on thy eyelid
So awake when I am gone
For I must go to Oberon
Ho, there!
Hast thou charmed the Athenians eyes with the love juice, as I did bid thee do?
I took him sleeping. That is finished too.
And the Athenian woman by his side.
So when he wakes, by him she must be eyed.
What has't thou done?
Thou has't mistaken quite.
And laid the love juice on some true love's sight.
Believe me, King of Shadows, I mistook.
Did not you tell me I should know the man by the Athenian garments he had on?
[PUCK LAUGHS]
And so far am I glad this so did sort.
For this, their jangling, I esteem a sport.
[WHOOPING]
[BEAR GROWLS]
[HELENA SHRIEKS]
[TEARFULLY] When beasts that meet me run away for fear.
It is no wonder that Demetrius, should like a monster, fly my presence thus.
But who is here?
Lysander!
On the ground. Dead or asleep?
I see no blood, no wound.
Lysander, if you live, good sir, awake!
[LYSANDER GRO ANS]
Lysander, there's...
There was a...
And run through fire
I will for your sweet sake.
Transparent Helena!
Nature shows art, that through your bosom makes me see your heart.
Do not say so, Lysander, say not so.
- Yet Hermia...
- Not Hermia, but Helena I love.
Who will not change a raven for a dove?
The will of man is by his reason swayed.
And reason says you are the worthier maid.
Things growing are not ripe until their season.
So l, being young, till now ripe not to reason.
Good troth, you do me wrong.
Good sooth, you do so in such disdainful manner me to woo.
- But, fare you well.
- Helena!
I must confess,
I thought you lord of true gentleness.
- Helena.
- Oh, that a lady by one man refused
[TEARFULLY] should by another therefore be abused.
Her...
[WHISPERING]
Hermia, sleep you there.
And never may you come Lysander near.
Now, all my powers address your love and might.
To honor Helena, and to be her knight!
[LAUGHS]
Help me, Lysander!
[SOBBING]
Do your best to pluck this crawling serpent from my breast.
[SIGHING]
Ay, me, for pity.
What a dream was here.
Lysander, look how I do shake with fear.
I thought a serpent ate my heart away.
And you sat smiling at my agony.
Lysander...
What?
Not here?
Lysander!
Lysander!
Oh, dear heart, speak!
Oh, dear heart, speak!
I swoon almost with fear.
No!
No!
Lord, then I will perceive that you are gone.
Either death or you I'll find immediately!
Lysander!
Lysander!
Lysander!
Hermia!
Demetrius!
Demetrius!
[SOBBING]
Helena! Helena!
Helena!
Lysander!
- Hermia, Hermia!
- Hermia!
Demetrius!
Helena! Helena!
Lord...
[LAUGHING]
...what fools these mortals be!
[LAUGHING]
[ALL WHISTLING]
Here.
Here's a marvelous convenient place for our rehearsal.
Ah!
[OTHERS CHUCKLE]
[LAUGHING]
[FAIRY SQUEALS]
This plot shall be our stage.
This Hawthorne-brake our tiring-house.
There is a play on foot.
I'll be the audience.
An actor too, perhaps, if I see cause.
[LAUGHING]
Come, sit down, every mother's son, and rehearse your part.
And we will do it in action as will do it before the duke.
Pyramus, you begin.
[CHUCKLES]
Well...
I begin.
Oh, Thisnay!
And when you have spoken your speech...
- Then I stop.
- No, no!
- Well, then I go on.
- No, no!
Then you enter into that break.
And so every one according to his cue.
QUINCE:
Thisbe, stand forth.
Speak, Pyramus.
-Oh, Thisnay, the flowers...
- "Oh, Thisbe."
-"Thisnay."
- "Thisbe."
-"Nay."
- "Be."
-"Nay."
- "Be!"
This...
This...
This... nebee.
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah.
[LAUGHING]
The flowers of odious savors sweet.
"Odorous," "odorous."
Odorous, odorous.
The flowers od...
The flowers of odorous savors sweet.
Oh, Thisbe, the flowers of odorous savors sweet.
So hath thy breath.
Oh, Thisbe.
My dearest Thisbe dear.
But, hark...
[COUGHING]
QUINCE:
Oh, no, Bottom.
Bottom.
Thisnay.
Thisbe.
But, hark.
[COUGHS]
A voice.
Stay you but here a while, and by and by...
I will to you appear.
Into that break!
Most radiant Pyramus...
Most radiant Pyramus!
Must I speak now?
[SNOUT CHUCKLING]
Ay, indeed, must you, for you must understand he goes but to see a noise that he heard, and he's to come again.
If I were fair Thisbe,
I were only thine...
I were only...
Most radiant Pyramus, most lily-white of hue...
Most lily-white of hue.
Of color like the red rose on triumphant brier.
Most briskly juvenal and eke...
Eke.
Eke most lovely Jew as true as truest horse that yet would never tire.
I'll meet thee, Pyramus, at Ninny's tomb.
- Ninny's?
- Ninny's.
- Ninny's.
- Ninny's.
Ninus' tomb, man!
Ninus' tomb, man!
But you must not speak that yet.
But you must not speak that yet.
[GRO ANS]
[GRO ANS]
That you answer to Pyramus.
That you answer to Pyramus.
[QUINCE GRO ANS]
You speak all your part at once, cues and all!
You speak all your part at once, cues...
I won't play anymore.
I won't play.
[SQUEALS]
[BLABBERING]
QUINCE:
Pyramus! Your cue is passed.
It's "never tire."
If I were fair Thisbe, I were only thine.
If I were fair Thisbe.
If I were fair Thisbe, I were only thine.
Oh, me.
Oh, monstrous.
Strange.
[SNOUT CHUCKLES]
We are haunted.
Pray, masters.
Fly, masters.
[ALL SCREAMING]
I'll follow you.
I'll lead you about, around, through bog, through bush, through break, through brier.
Sometime a hound I'll be.
[YELPS]
[BARKING]
A hog!
Murder! Murder!
Starveling.
[PUCK SCREECHES]
Help me!
[YELLING]
[LAUGHING]
[PANTING]
I won't play anymore.
Why do they run away?
[MO ANS]
I see their knavery.
This is to make an ass of me, to fright me if they could.
But I will not stir from this place, do what they will.
I will walk up and down here, and I will sing, so they shall hear I am not afraid.
[CLEARING THRO AT]
[SINGING]
The ousel cock so black of hue
With orange-tawny bill... 
The throstle with his note so true
The wren with little... 
Oh, me.
[SOBBING]
[CHUCKLES]
The finch, the sparrow and the lark
The plain-song cuckoo gray
Whose note full many a man doth mark
And dares not answer nay
What angel wakes me from my flowery bed?
I pray thee, gentle mortal, sing again.
[SOBBING]
Mine ear is much enamor'd of thy note.
And so is mine eye enthralled by thy shape.
And thy fair manliness and grace doth move me on the first view... to say, to swear, I love thee.
Methinks, mistress, you should have little reason for that.
And yet, to say the truth... reason and love keep little company together nowadays.
[BOTH LAUGH]
Thou art as wise as thou art beautiful.
Not so, not so.
Sing again.
[SINGING]
The ousel cock so black of hue
So black of hue
With orange-tawny bill
BOTH:
The throstle with his note so true
The wren with little quill
If I had wit enough to get out of this wood,
I'd have enough to serve mine own turn.
Out of this wood do not desire to go.
Thou shalt remain here, whether thou wilt or no.
I am a spirit of no common rate.
The summer still doth tend upon my state.
And I do love thee.
Therefore, go with me.
No.
I'll give thee fairies to attend on thee.
Peaseblossom.
Cobweb. Moth.
And Mustardseed.
PEASEBLOSSOM [SINGING]: Me
COBWEB [SINGING]: And I
MOTH [SINGING]: And I
Where shall we go? 
Be kind and courteous to this gentleman.
Hop in his walks and gambol in his eyes, feed him with apricots and dewberries with purple grapes, green figs and mulberries, the honey-bags steal from the humblebees and for night candles, crop their waxen thighs, and light them at the fiery glowworm's eyes to have my love to bed and to arise.
Nod to him, elves, and do him courtesies.
ELVES:
Hail, mortal, hail!
Hail! Hail!
[BOTTOM BRAYS]
[ALL LAUGHING]
[SOBBING]
I greet your worships most heartily.
I beseech your worship's name.
Cobweb.
Oh. Cobweb.
- Bottom.
COBWEB: Bottom.
I desire more of your acquaintance, good Master Cobweb.
Your name, honest gentleman?
Peaseblossom.
Your name, I beseech you, sir?
Mustardseed.
Oh. Mustardseed.
[LAUGHING]
I desire more of your acquaintance, good Master Mustardseed.
[WHINNIES]
Oh. Oh!
[LAUGHING]
The moon... methinks, looks with a watery eye.
And when she weeps... weeps every little flower... lamenting some enforced chastity.
[FAIRIES GIGGLING]
[SOBBING]
Tie up my love's tongue, bring him silently.
Come, wait upon him, lead him to my bower.
[SOBBING]
[OBERON YELLING]
[LAUGHING]
This falls out better than I could devise.
Have you slain him, then?
You spend your passion on a foolish mood.
I am not guilty of Lysander's blood, nor is he dead, for all that I can tell.
Stand close. This is the same Athenian.
This is the woman, but not this the man.
I beg you, tell me then if he is well.
And if I could, what should I get therefore?
[HUFFING]
A privilege never to see me more, so from your hated presence shall I go.
See me no more, whether he be dead or no.
[SCOFFS]
There is no following her in this fierce vein.
Here therefore for a while I will remain.
[PUCK SQUEALS]
From thy mistaking must perforce ensue some true love turn'd and not a false turn'd true.
Then fate o'er-rules, that, one man holding troth, a million fail, confounding oath on oath.
About the wood go swifter than the wind, and Helena of Athens look thou find.
By some illusion see thou bring her here.
I'll charm his eyes against she do appear.
I go! I go!
Look how I go, swifter than the arrow from the Tartar's bow.
Flower of this purple dye
Sink in apple of his eye
When his love he doth espy
Let her shine in glory high
When thou wakest, if there she be
Beg of her for remedy
[LAUGHING]
Captain of our fairy band,
Helena is here at hand
And the youth, mistook by me...
[LAUGHING]
...pleading for a lover's fee.
Stand aside. The noise they make will cause Demetrius to awake.
Then will two at once woo one.
That must needs be sport alone, and those things do best please me that befall preposterously.
Look, when I vow, I weep, and vows so born, in their nativity all truth appears.
- These oaths are Hermia's.
- Hermia's?
Love you her no more?
I had no judgment when to her I swore.
Nor none, in my mind, while you thus implore.
Demetrius loves her, and he loves not you.
[HELENA GASPS]
Demetrius, l...
[LAUGHS]
Helen, goddess, nymph.
Perfect, divine.
To what, my love, shall I compare your eyne?
Crystal is muddy.
Oh, how ripe in show your lips, those kissing cherries, tempting grow.
0, spite! 0, hell!
I see you all are bent to set against me for your merriment.
If you were civil and knew courtesy, you would not do me thus much injury.
MEN:
Helena.
You are both are rivals and love Hermia.
[MEN SCOFF]
And now, both rivals to mock Helena.
A fine exploit, a manly enterprise.
[TEARFULLY] To conjure tears up in a poor maid's eyes.
- Helena. Huh?
- You are unkind, Demetrius.
Be not so, for you love Hermia.
This you know, I know. l...
And here, with all goodwill, with all my heart.
Of Hermia's love, I yield you up my part.
- And yours of Helena's to me bequeath.
[DEMETRIUS SCOFFING]
For her I love, and will love till my death.
Lysander, keep your Hermia,
I want none.
If once I loved her, all that love is gone.
[LAUGHS]
My heart to her but as a guest sojourned.
And now, to Helena is it home returned.
There to remain.
Helena, it is not so.
Disparage not the faith you do not know.
- Hermia.
- Yes, Lysander.
Oh, Lysander.
Oh, my ear.
I thank it brought me to your sound.
But why unkindly did you leave me so?
Why should he stay, whom love does press to go?
What love could press Lysander from my side?
Lysander's love, that would not let him bide.
Why seek you me?
[LAUGHS]
Could this not make you know the hate
I bare you made me leave you so?
Oh, you speak not as you think.
- Here, it cannot be.
- Lo, she is one of this confederacy.
Now I perceive.
They have joined up all three to fashion this false sport in spite of me.
Injurious Hermia. Most ungrateful maid.
To join with men in scorning your poor friend.
It is not friendly, 'tis not maidenly.
I understand not what you mean by this.
Go on, persever, counterfeit sad looks.
Make mouths upon me when I turn my back.
Wink at each at other.
Hold the sweet jest up.
But fare you well.
MEN:
Helena!
'Tis partly my own fault, which death or absence soon shall remedy.
MEN:
Helena.
[MEN BLOW NOSE]
Stay, gentle Helena. Hear my excuse.
My love, my life, my soul, fair Helena.
[LAUGHING]
[LAUGHING]
Oh, excellent.
Sweet, do not scorn her so.
If she cannot entreat, I can compel.
You can compel no more than she entreat.
Your threats have no more strength than her weak prayers.
Helena, I love you. By my life I do.
I say I love you more than he can do.
If you say so, withdraw and prove it too.
- Come. Quick.
- Come. Quick.
- Come quick!
- Quick come!
[ALL CHATTERING]
- Lysander, to what leads all this?
- Away, you Ethiope.
[ALL CHATTER]
Am not I Hermia? Are not you Lysander?
Be certain, it is no jest that I do hate you.
And love Helena.
Oh, me.
You juggler.
You canker blossom.
You thief of love.
What? Have you come by night and stolen my love's heart from him?
Fine, I'faith! Have you no modesty?
No maiden shame?
No touch of bashfulness?
Why, will you tear impatient answers from my gentle tongue?
Fie, fie, you counterfeit, you puppet, you.
- Puppet?
- Puppet!
Puppet.
So that way goes the game.
Now I perceive that she has made compare between our statures.
She has urged her height.
And with her personage, her tall personage.
Her height! Her height!
She has prevailed with him.
And are you grown so high in his esteem because I am so dwarfish?
And so low?
How low am l, you painted maypole?
Speak. How low am I?
I'm not yet so low but that my nails can reach into your eyes.
[HELENA GASPS]
[HERMIA SQUEALING]
[HERMIA SCREAMS]
[LAUGHS]
I pray you, though you mock me, gentlemen, let her not hurt me.
I was never cursed,
I have no gift at all in shrewishness.
Let her not strike me.
You may think because she is something lower than myself that I can match her.
Lower, hark, again.
[TEARFULLY]
Let me go, let me go.
Why, get you gone.
Who is it that hinders you?
A foolish heart, that I leave here behind.
What, with Lysander?
With Demetrius.
[SCOFFS]
Be not afraid.
She shall not harm you, Helena.
No, sir, she shall not, though you take her part.
Oh, when she's angry, she is keen and shrewd.
She was a vixen when she went to school.
And though she be but little, she is fierce.
Little again? Nothing but low and little.
Low and little.
Let me come to her.
Get you gone, you dwarf, you minimus, you bead.
You acorn.
[DEMETRIUS COUGHS]
- You're too officious, sir.
- Sir.
Sir, sir!
In her behalf that scorns your services, let her alone. Speak not of Helena...
- Helena!
- Take not her part.
For if you should offer the very slightest show of love to her, you shall regret it.
Mmm, now she holds me not.
Now follow if you dare to try whose right of yours or mine is most in Helena.
Follow, ha! Nay, I'll go with you, cheek by jowl.
[LAUGHS]
You, mistress, are the cause of all this strife.
Nay, go not back.
I will not trust you, I.
Nor longer stay in your cursed company.
Your hands than mine are quicker for a fray.
My legs are longer, though, to run away.
You juggler! You thief of love!
[PUCK LAUGHING]
Thou see'st these lovers seek a place to fight.
Hie, therefore, Puck, overcast the night with drooping fog.
[PUCK LAUGHS]
Go lead these men astray, so one come not within the other's way.
Like to Lysander sometime frame thy tongue, then stir Demetrius up with bitter wrong.
And sometime rail thou like Demetrius.
Then crush this herb into Lysander's eye to take from thence all error with his might.
When they next wake, all this derision shall seem a dream and fruitless vision.
Up and down, up and down.
I will lead them up and down.
I am feared in field and town.
Goblin, lead them up and down.
Demetrius!
Demetrius!
- Demetrius!
- Lysander!
Speak again.
You runaway.
You coward.
Are you fled?
You coward.
Are you bragging to the stars?
Telling the bushes that you look for wars and wilt not come?
Demetrius! Follow my voice.
We'll try no manhood here.
Lysander.
Where are you, proud Demetrius?
Speak you now.
Here, villain, drawn and ready.
- Come you now.
- I'll be with you straight.
Follow me then to a plainer ground.
Lysander.
PUCK: You juggler, you thief of love, you painted maypole.
Little, acorn, puppet.
Lysander.
Lysander.
BOTH:
Ah...
He goes before me and still dares me on.
BOTH: When I come where he calls, then he is... gone.
[BOTH HUFF]
And the villain is much lighter-heeled than I.
I followed fast but faster he did fly.
[BOTH SIGH]
- Here will I rest me.
- Here will I rest me.
- Come, thou gentle day.
- Come, thou gentle day.
For if but once... you show me your grey light,
I'll find Demetrius.
- And revenge this spite.
- Spite.
[BOTH MUTTERING]
[CHUCKLES]
Oh, faintness constrains me to measure out my length on this cold bed.
By day's approach
Iook to be visited by day's approach.
[BABBLING]
[LAUGHS]
HELENA [TEARFULLY]: 0h, weary night.
PUCK [HIGH VOICE]: 0h, weary night.
- 0h, long and tedious night.
- 0h, long and tedious night.
Abate thy hours... that I may back to Athens by daylight.
For fear that my poor company detest.
[LAUGHS]
Yet but three?
Count one more.
Two of both kinds make up four.
[LAUGHS]
Here she comes, cursed and sad.
Cupid is a knavish lad.
Thus to make poor females mad.
[HERMIA SOBBING]
[SCREAMING]
[LAUGHING]
[SOBBING]
Never so weary.
So lost in woe.
Bedabbled with the dew and torn with briars.
My legs can keep no pace with my desire.
Here will I rest me till the break of day.
Heaven shield Lysander if they mean a fray.
[LAUGHS]
[CHUCKLING]
On the ground, sleep sound
I'll apply to your eye
Gentle lover remedy
When thou wakest, then thou takest
True delight in the sight
Of thy former lady's eye
And the country proverb known
That every man should take his own
In your waking shall be shown
Jack shall have Jill
Naught shall go ill
The man shall have his mare again
And all shall be well
What? Will thou hear some music, my sweet love?
I have a reasonable good ear for music.
[CLEARS THRO AT]
[SINGING] The aldercock so black of you
Will a... 
[GRO ANS]
Let us have the tongues and the bones.
The tongues and the bones.
[PLAYING CHEERFUL MELOD Y]
Scratch my head, Peaseblossom.
Where's Monsieur Mustardseed?
MUSTARDSEED:
Ready.
[BOTTOM MO ANING]
I must to the barber's, monsieur.
For I feel I am marvelous hairy about the face.
And I am such a tender ass, if my hair do but tickle me, I must scratch.
But say, sweet love, what thou desirest to eat?
Truly, a peck of provender.
I could munch your good dry oats.
Methinks I have a great desire for a bottle of hay.
Hay, hay, hay.
[SINGING] Good hay, sweet hay,
Has no fellow
[LAUGHING]
[BRAYING]
See'st thou this sweet sight?
I pray you, let none of your people stir me.
I have an exposition of sleep come upon me.
[ALL GIGGLING]
Shh. Faeries, begone.
[SINGING]
Sleep thou, sleep thou
I will thee wind in my arms
Sleep thou, sleep thou
So doth the woodbine, the honeysuckle
Sweet and gently entwist
The ivy so enrings
[BRAYING PLEASANTLY]
The barky fingers of the elm
As I
Will wind thee in my arms
Sleep thou, sleep thou
Oh, how I love thee
Oh, how I dote on thee
[BOTTOM SINGING PEACEFULLY]
Her dotage now I do begin to pity.
Now I have the boy.
I will undo this hateful imperfection of her eyes.
My fairy lord, this must be done with haste.
For night's swift dragons cut the clouds full fast.
[PUCK LAUGHING]
Be as thou wast wont to be
See as thou wast wont to see
Dian's bud o'er Cupid's flower
Hath such force and blessed power
My Titania, my sweet queen, now awake.
My Oberon.
What visions have I seen.
Methought...
I was enamored of... an ass.
[LAUGHS]
There lies your love.
Oh.
How came these things to pass?
0, mine eyes do loathe his visage now.
Come, my queen.
Take hands with me.
Now thou and I are new in amity.
Fairy king, attend and mark.
[BIRD SINGING]
Hmm, I do hear the morning lark.
My gentle Puck, take this transformed scalp from off the head of this Athenian.
So that he awaking when the other do may all to Athens back again repair.
And think no more of this night's accidents but as the fierce vexation of a dream.
Then, my queen, in silence sad, trip we after night's shade.
We the globe can compass soon swifter than the wandering moon.
Come, my lord, and in our flight, tell me how it came this night that I sleeping here was found with these mortals on the ground.
When thou wak'st, with thine own fool's eyes peep.
[LAUGHS]
[PUCK GRUNTING]
[LAUGHING]
Heigh-ho.
MAN [IN DISTANCE]:
Heigh-ho.
Peter Quince.
MAN:
Peter Quince.
- Flute, the Bellows-mender.
- Flute, the Bellows-mender.
- Snout, the tinker.
- Snout, the tinker.
- Starveling.
- Starveling.
God's my life stolen hence and left me asleep.
[YAWNS]
[MAN YAWNS]
I have had... a most rare vision.
I have had a dream.
Past the wit of man to say what dream it was.
Methought I was...
And methought I had...
[CHUCKLES]
Man is but an ass.
[BIRD SINGING]
[CHUCKLES]
[GRO ANS]
Man is but an ass if he go about to expound this dream.
Methought I was...
And methought I had...
Man is but a patched fool.
If he will offer... to say.
[LAUGHS]
What methought I was...
[LAUGHS] and what methought l...
[LAUGHING]
[BRAYS]
[WHIMPERING]
[LAUGHING]
[SMOOCHING]
[LAUGHING]
The eye of man has not heard, the ear of man has not seen, man's hand is not able to taste, his tongue to conceive nor his heart to report... what my dream was.
And I will get Peter Quince to write a ballad of this dream.
It shall be called "Bottom's Dream."
Because it has no bottom.
And... I will sing it in the latter end of our play before the duke.
And perhaps to make it the more gracious...
I shall sing it after death.
[SINGING] What methought I was
And what methought I had
What methought I was
And methought I had
[PLAYING BOLD FANFARE]
[ALL LAUGHING]
I beg the law, the law upon her head, my lord.
Good morrow, friends.
Fair lovers, you are fortunately met.
- My consent, my lord.
- Egeus, I will overbear your will.
For in the temple by and by with us, these couples shall eternally be knit.
Come, my Hippolyta.
[GIGGLES]
"We come not to offend, but with goodwill to show our... Our simple skills."
We come not to offend, but with goodwill to show our simple skills.
Masters, the duke is at the temple.
There were two or three more lords and ladies married.
[GIGGLES]
Have you sent to Bottom's house?
Is he come home yet?
If he cannot be heard of, without doubt he is... transported.
Where are all these lads?
Where are these hearts?
Bottom!
Oh, most courageous day!
Oh, most happy hour.
It is with our goodwill.
[ALL LAUGHING]
Masters, I will tell you of... wonders.
Let us hear, sweet Bottom.
[DONKEY BRAYS]
Not a word of me.
Get your costumes together, meet presently at the palace.
- Away. Go, away.
MAN: Come on.
[HORNS PLAYING GRAND MELOD Y]
[CHORUS SINGING JO YFULLY]
These things seem small and undistinguishable.
Like far-off mountains turned into clouds.
It seems to me that yet we sleep, we dream.
'Tis strange, my Theseus, what these lovers speak of.
Lovers and madmen have such seething brains.
Such wild imaginings that apprehend more than cool reason ever comprehends.
The lunatic, the lover and the poet are of imagination all compact.
The poet's eye, in fine frenzy rolling, doth glance from heaven to Earth, from Earth to heaven.
And his imagination bodies forth the forms of things unknown.
The poet's pen turns them into shapes and gives to airy nothing a local habitation and a name.
But all the story of the night told over and all their minds transfigured so together tells more to us than fancy's images.
Come now, what masques, what dances shall we have?
Where is our usual manager of mirth?
What revels are in hand?
"A tedious brief scene of young Pyramus and his love Thisbe. 
Very tragical mirth." Ha! 
No, my noble lord, it is not for you.
What are they that do play it?
Hard-handed men that work in Athens here who never labor'd in their minds till now.
And we will hear it. Go, bring them in.
[HORNS PLAY CHEERFUL FANFARE]
The actors are at hand.
And by their show, you shall know all that you are like to know.
For all the rest, let... uh, Lion...
Moonshine...
Wall...
Wall, wall, wall.
[GIGGLES]
And lovers twain... at large discourse, while here they do remain.
[ALL LAUGHING]
[WHISPERING]
In this same interlude.
Oh, yeah.
In th... This same interlude, it doth befall
[GIGGLING] that l, uh, one Snout by name, present.
[GIGGLING]
- Uh...
- Wall.
A wall.
[GIGGLING]
Uh, and such a...
- Wall.
- Wall.
Such a wall I'd have you think had in it a cranny hole or a...
QUINCE: Chink.
- Chink.
- Chink.
- Chink. Chink.
[PEOPLE LAUGH]
Chink. Chink.
Through which the lovers, Pyramus and Thisbe, did whisper often very secretly.
[GIGGLING]
Shh!
Yeah, I know.
This loam, this rough cast, this stone, doth show that I am that same.
QUINCE:
Wall. Wall. Wall.
Wall. Wall, wall, wall.
The truth is so and this cranny is...
This cranny is...
This cranny is right and sinister through which the fearful lovers are to whisper.
[LAUGHING]
Silence. Pyramus draws near the wall.
Oh, grim-Iooked night!
[ALL LAUGHING]
Oh, grim-Iooked night!
Oh, night with hue so black!
[WHISPERING]
Oh, night which ever art when day is not.
Oh, night which ever art when day is not.
Oh, night. Oh, night!
Alack, alack, alack.
I fear my Thisbe's promise is forgot.
And thou, oh, wall,
Oh, sweet, oh, lovely wall.
Show me thy chink.
Show me thy chink!
To blink through with mine eyne.
Thanks, courteous wall.
[GIGGLING]
Jove, shield thee well for this.
But what see I?
No Thisbe do I see.
Oh, wicked wall, through whom I see no bliss.
Cursed be thy stones for thus deceiving me.
The wall, I think, being sensible, should curse again.
No, in truth, sir, he should not.
"Deceiving me" is Thisbe's cue. 
Deceiving me.
PYRAMUS
Deceiving me.
[CROWD LAUGHING]
Yonder she comes.
Psst!
Oh, wall, full often hast thou heard my moans.
Moans, moans, moans, moans.
For parting my fair Pyramus and me.
QUINCE:
Psst! Psst!
My cherry lips have often kiss'd thy stones.
Thy stones with lime and hair knit up in thee.
Thisbe. Thisbe. Thisbe.
Pyramus, Pyramus, Pyramus.
[SNOUT GIGGLING]
[CROWD LAUGHING]
My love thou art, my love I think.
Not...
Shafalus to Procrus.
Not Shafalus to Procrus was so true.
As Shoproc, as Prochoc-shaf...
As Shaf... As Prer...
As I to you.
Kiss me through the hole of this vile wall.
[SNOUT GIGGLING]
PYRAMUS:
Mm, mm, mm, mm.
I kiss the wall, not your lips at all.
Wilt thou... at Ninny's tomb meet me straightway?
Tide life, tide death,
I come without delay.
[LAUGHTER & APPLAUSE]
[GIGGLING] Thus have l, the wall, my part discharged so.
And being done, thus the wall away doth go.
The best of this kind are but shadows, and the worst are no worse if imagination assist them.
Let us listen to the moon.
ALL:
Ahhh.
This lanthorn doth the horned moon present myself the ma...
He should have worn the horns on his head.
[ALL LAUGHING]
This lanthorn doth the horned moon present myself the man in the moon do seem to be.
- This dog...
- This is the greatest error of all the rest.
The man should be put into the lanthorn.
- How else is it the man in the moon?
- This lanthorn doth...
I am so weary of this moon, would he would change.
- This lanthorn...
- Proceed, Moon.
All that I have say is that the lanthorn is the moon. l, the man in the moon, this thorn-bush, my thorn-bush, this dog, my dog.
[RO ARING]
[CROWD LAUGHING]
This is old Ninny's tomb.
Where is my love?
[RO ARS]
QUINCE:
Psst!
- Ah!
[LION GROWLS]
Ah. Ah.
[DOG SNARLING]
[BOTH LAUGHING]
[RO ARING]
[RO ARING]
[BOTH LAUGH]
Well roared, Lion.
Well run, Thisbe.
[LAUGHTER & APPLAUSE]
And then came Pyramus.
[SINGING]
Sweet moon
I thank thee for thy sunny beams
But stay, oh, spite!
What dreadful dole is here.
Oh, dainty duck. Oh, dear.
Thy mantle good.
What? Stain'd with blood.
Ah, Fates, come, come.
Cut thread and thrum.
Quail, crush, conclude...
[SOBBING] and quell!
This passion doth go near to make a man look sad.
[SPITS]
Come, tears, confound.
Out, sword, and wound the pap of Pyramus.
Ay, that left pap.
Where heart doth hop.
Thus die I... thus... thus... thus.
Oh, bless my heart, I pity the man.
[GRUNTING]
Now am I dead.
Now am I fled.
My soul... is in the sky.
[GRUNTS]
PYRAMUS:
Moon, take thy flight.
Now... die, die, die, die, die.
[APPLAUSE]
[SINGING MERRILY]
[GASPS]
Oh.
THISBE:
Asleep, my love?
What, dead, my dove?
Come, Pyramus, arise.
Speak, speak, quite dumb?
Dead? Dead?
A tomb must cover thy sweet eyes.
Oh, sisters three, come, come to me... with hands as pale as milk.
[CROWD CHUCKLES]
Lay them in gore, since you have shore with shears his thread of silk.
Tongue, not a word.
Come, trusty sword.
[CROWD CHUCKLES]
Come, trusty sword.
[TEARFULLY]
Come, trusty sword.
Sword.
ALL:
Sword, sword, sword, sword.
Come, trusty sword.
Sword.
[CROWD CHUCKLES]
Come, trusty sword.
Come...
[CROWD CHUCKLES]
[CROWD CHUCKLES]
Come, trusty sword.
Come, blade, my breast in blue, blue.
[GASPING]
[CROWD LAUGHING]
[LAUGHING]
Come, blade, my breast imbrue.
So farewell, friends, thus Thisbe ends.
Adieu, adieu, adieu.
[CROWD LAUGHING]
Oh, this is the silliest stuff that ever I heard.
Will it please you to see the epilogue?
[LAUGHING]
No, no epilogue, I pray you.
No epilogue.
Or a Bergomask dance between our company?
Come, your Bergomask.
[SINGING MARCH]
[BELL TOLLING]
Through the house, give glimmering light by the dead and drowsy fire.
Every elf and fairy sprite hop as light as bird from brier.
[SINGING]
Hand in hand with fairy grace
Will we bless this place
And the owner of it blest
Ever shall in
Safety
Rest
FAIRIES [SINGING]:
Through the house, give glimmering light
By the dead and drowsy fire
Every elf and every sprite
Hop as light as bird from brier
Hop as light as bird from brier
The iron tongue of midnight hath tolled 12.
Lovers to bed.
'Tis almost fairy time.
I fear we shall outsleep the coming morn as much as we this night have overwatch'd.
Sweet friends, to bed.
A fortnight hold we this solemnity in nightly revels and new jollity.
[ALL LAUGHING & CHATTERING]
[PUCK LAUGHS]
If we shadows have offended, think but this and all is mended.
That you have but slumber'd here while these visions did appear.
And this weak and idle theme, no more yielding but to dream.
Gentles, do not reprehend, if you pardon, we will mend.
Else the Puck, a liar call, so good night unto you all.
Give me your hands, if we be friends and Robin shall restore amends!
How do you do?
Mr. Carl Laemmle feels it would be a little unkind to present this picture without just a word of friendly warning.
We are about to unfold the story of Frankenstein, a man of science, who sought to create a man after his own image without reckoning upon God.
It is one of the strangest tales ever told.
It deals with the two great mysteries of creation, life and death.
I think it will thrill you.
It may shock you.
It might even horrify you.
So, if any of you feel that you do not care to subject your nerves to such a strain, now is your chance to...
Well, we've warned you.
Amen.
Down! Down, you fool!
Now.
Come on.
Hurry, hurry.
The moon's rising.
We've no time to lose.
Oh, careful!
There we go.
Here he comes!
He's just resting, waiting for a new life to come.
Here we are.
Look. It's still here.
Climb up and cut the rope.
No!
Go on. It can't hurt you.
Here's the knife.
Look out!
Here's the knife.
Here I come.
Is it all right?
The neck's broken.
The brain is useless.
We must find another brain.
That will do, gentlemen.
And in conclusion, ladies and gentlemen, here we have one of the most perfect specimens of the human brain that has ever come to my attention at the university.
And here, the abnormal brain of the typical criminal.
Observe, ladies and gentlemen, the scarcity of convolutions on the frontal lobe, as compared to that of the normal brain, and the distinct degeneration of the middle frontal lobe.
All of these degenerate characteristics check amazingly with the case history of the dead man before us, whose life was one of brutality, of violence and murder.
Both of these jars will remain here for your further inspection.
Thank you, gentlemen.
The class is dismissed.
Herr Victor Moritz.
Victor.
I'm so glad you've come.
What is it, Elizabeth?
Oh, you've heard from Henry.
Yes. The first word in four months.
It just came.
Victor, you must help me.
Why, of course I'll help you.
I'm afraid.
I've read this over and over again, but they're just words that I can't understand.
Listen.
"You must have faith in me, Elizabeth. Wait.
"My work must come first, even before you.
"At night, the winds howl in the mountains.
"There is no one here.
"Prying eyes can't peer into my secret."
What can he mean?
What does he say then?
"I am living in an abandoned, old watchtower,
"close to the town of Goldstadt.
"Only my assistant is here to help me with my experiments."
Oh, his experiments.
Yes, that's what frightens me.
The very day we announced our engagement, he told me of his experiments.
He said he was on the verge of a discovery so terrific that he doubted his own sanity.
There was a strange look in his eyes, some mystery.
His words carried me right away.
Of course, I've never doubted him, but still I worry.
I can't help it.
And now this letter.
All this uncertainty can't go on.
I must know.
Victor, have you seen him?
Yes. About three weeks ago.
I met him walking alone in the woods.
He spoke to me of his work, too.
I asked him if I might visit his laboratory.
He just glared at me and said he would let no one go there.
His manner was very strange.
Oh, what can we do?
Oh, if he should be ill...
Now, don't worry.
I'll go to Dr. Waldman,
Henry's old professor in medical school.
Perhaps he can tell me more about all this.
Oh, Victor, you're a dear.
You know I'd go to the ends of the Earth for you.
I shouldn't like that.
I'm far too fond of you.
I wish you were.
Victor.
I'm sorry.
Good night, Victor, and thank you.
Thank you.
Good night.
And don't worry. Promise?
I won't.
- Victor?
- What is it?
I'm coming with you.
But, Elizabeth, you can't do that!
I must! I'll be ready in a minute.
Herr Frankenstein is a most brilliant young man, yet so erratic, he troubles me.
I'm worried about Henry.
Why has he left the university?
He was doing so well, and he seemed so happy with his work.
Well, you know, his researches in the field of chemical galvanism and electro-biology were far in advance of our theories here at the university.
In fact, they had reached a most advanced stage.
They were becoming dangerous.
Herr Frankenstein is greatly changed.
You mean, changed as a result of his work?
Yes, his work.
His insane ambition to create life.
How? How?
Please tell us everything, whatever it is.
The bodies we use in our dissecting room for lecture purposes were not perfect enough for his experiments, he said.
He wished us to supply him with other bodies, and we were not to be too particular as to where and how we got them.
I told him that his demands were unreasonable, and so he left the university to work unhampered.
He found what he needed elsewhere.
Oh, the bodies of animals.
Well, what are the lives of a few rabbits and dogs?
You do not quite get what I mean.
Herr Frankenstein was interested only in human life.
First to destroy it, then recreate it.
There you have his mad dream.
Can we go to him?
You will not be very welcome.
Oh, what does that matter?
I must see him.
Dr. Waldman, you have influence with Henry.
Won't you come with us?
I'm sorry, but Herr Frankenstein is no longer my pupil.
But he respects you.
Won't you help us to take him away?
Very well, Fräulein. I've warned you.
But if you wish it, I will go.
Fritz!
Hello.
Have you finished making those connections?
Yes, they're done.
Well, come down then and help with these attachments.
We've lots to do.
Look out.
Fool!
If this storm develops as I hope, you will have plenty to be afraid of before the night's over.
Go on. Fix the electrodes.
This storm will be magnificent!
All the electrical secrets of heaven!
And this time we're ready, eh, Fritz? Ready.
Why, what's the matter?
Look!
There's nothing to fear. Look.
No blood, no decay.
Just a few stitches.
And look, here's the final touch.
- The brain you stole, Fritz.
- Yes.
Think of it.
The brain of a dead man, waiting to live again in a body I made with my own hands.
With my own hands.
Let's have one final test.
Throw the switches.
Good.
In 15 minutes, the storm should be at its height.
Then we'll be ready.
What's that?
There's someone there.
Quiet.
Send them away.
Nobody must come here.
Here! Cover this.
Whoever it is, don't let them in.
Leave them to me.
Of all times for anybody to come, now!
Think I'm going to let these people in?
Not much.
I'll show them, messing about at this time of night.
Got too much to do.
Wait a minute! All right! All right!
Wait a minute. I'm coming.
It's Dr. Waldman, Fritz.
You can't see him. Go away.
All right, knock, but you can't get in.
- Henry!
- Frankenstein!
- Henry!
- Frankenstein!
Henry!
- Open the door!
- Let us in!
Who is it? Who is it? What do you want?
You must leave me alone now!
It's Elizabeth. Open the door!
- Henry!
- Henry!
- What do you want?
- Open the door.
- Let us in!
- You must leave me alone.
Henry, at least give us shelter!
- What's all this nonsense of locked doors?
- Henry!
Elizabeth, please. Won't you go away?
Won't you trust me, just for tonight?
Oh, you're ill. What's the matter?
Nothing. I'm quite all right.
Truly, I am.
Oh, can't you see
I mustn't be disturbed?
You'll ruin everything.
My experiment is almost completed.
Wait a moment. I understand.
I believe in you, but I cannot leave you tonight.
You've got to leave!
Henry, you're inhuman!
You're crazy!
Crazy, am I?
We'll see whether I'm crazy or not.
Come on up.
Are you quite sure you want to come in?
Very well.
Forgive me, but I'm forced to take unusual precautions.
Sit down, please.
Sit down!
You too, Elizabeth.
Please.
A moment ago, you said I was crazy.
Tomorrow we'll see about that.
Don't touch that!
I'm sorry, Doctor, but I insist.
Please.
Dr. Waldman, I learned a great deal from you at the university about the violet ray, the ultraviolet ray, which you said was the highest color in the spectrum.
You were wrong.
Here in this machinery,
I have gone beyond that.
I have discovered the great ray that first brought life into the world.
Oh, and your proof?
Tonight you shall have your proof.
At first, I experimented only with dead animals and then a human heart, which I kept beating for three weeks.
But now,
I'm going to turn that ray on that body and endow it with life.
And you really believe that you can bring life to the dead?
That body is not dead.
It has never lived.
I created it.
I made it with my own hands from the bodies I took from graves, from the gallows, anywhere!
Go and see for yourself.
You, too.
Dead, eh?
Quite a good scene, isn't it?
One man crazy, three very sane spectators.
- Is everything ready?
- Yes!
Get the batteries.
Look. It's moving.
It's alive. It's alive.
It's alive.
It's moving. It's alive.
Oh, it's alive!
It's alive! it's alive!
It's alive!
Henry, in the name of God.
In the name of God!
Now I know what it feels like to be God!
Henry is well, but he's very busy.
He said he would get in touch with you soon.
Don't worry about him, Baron.
He'll be home in a few days.
You two have it all arranged, haven't you?
You think I'm an idiot, don't you?
But I'm not.
Anyone can see with half an eye that there's something wrong.
And I have two eyes, pretty good ones, at that.
Well, what is it?
You're quite mistaken, Baron.
What's the matter with my son?
What's he doing?
He's completing his experiments, that's all.
Why does he go messing around an old, ruined windmill, when he has a decent house, a bath, good food and drink and a darned pretty girl to come back to?
Will you tell me that?
Oh, Baron, you don't understand.
I understand perfectly well.
There's another woman, and you're afraid to tell me.
Pretty sort of experiments these must be.
Oh, but you're wrong.
And how do you know?
If you please, Herr Baron, the Burgomaster.
Well, tell him to go away.
But he says it's important.
Nothing the Burgomaster can say can be of the slightest importance.
Good day, Herr Baron. Fräulein.
Well, what do you want?
If it's trouble, go away.
I have trouble enough.
Oh, there's no trouble, sir.
What do you mean, "No trouble"?
There's nothing but trouble.
I brought you these flowers.
Thank you, Herr Vogel.
Both in my private and official capacities as Burgomaster...
Yes, yes, yes, yes, we know all about that, but what do you want?
Well, what I really want to know is, when will the wedding be, if you please?
Unless Henry comes to his senses, there'll be no wedding at all.
But, Herr Baron, the village is already prepared!
Well, tell them to unprepare.
Oh, but such a lovely bride.
Such a fine young man, the very image of his father.
Heaven forbid.
But, sir, everything is ready!
I know that.
Don't keep on saying so, you idiot.
There's nothing to cry about.
Good day, Miss Elizabeth.
Good day, Herr Moritz.
Good day, Herr Vogel.
Good day, Herr Baron.
And good riddance to you.
There you are.
You see how it is.
The whole village is kept waiting.
The bride is kept waiting.
And I am kept waiting.
Henry must come home, if I have to fetch him myself.
- No, no, Baron.
- What do you mean, "No, no"?
What about his work?
Stuff and nonsense!
What about his wedding?
There is another woman, and I'm going to find her.
Oh, come and sit down, Doctor.
You must be patient.
Do you expect perfection at once?
This creature of yours should be kept under guard!
Mark my words, he will prove dangerous!
Dangerous?
Poor old Waldman.
Have you never wanted to do anything that was dangerous?
Where should we be if nobody tried to find out what lies beyond?
Have you never wanted to look beyond the clouds and the stars, or to know what causes the trees to bud, and what changes a darkness into light?
But if you talk like that, people call you crazy.
Well, if I could discover just one of these things, what eternity is, for example,
I wouldn't care if they did think
I was crazy!
You're young, my friend.
Your success has intoxicated you.
Wake up and look facts in the face.
Here we have a fiend whose brain...
Whose brain must be given time to develop.
It's a perfectly good brain, Doctor.
Well, you ought to know.
It came from your own laboratory.
The brain that was stolen from my laboratory was a criminal brain.
Oh, well. After all, it's only a piece of dead tissue.
Only evil can come of it.
Your health will be ruined if you persist in this madness.
I'm astonishingly sane, Doctor.
You have created a monster, and it will destroy you!
Patience, patience.
I believe in this monster, as you call it, and if you don't, well, you must leave me alone.
But think of Elizabeth, your father.
Elizabeth believes in me.
My father never believes in anyone.
I've got to experiment further.
He's only a few days old, remember.
So far he's been kept in complete darkness.
Wait till I bring him into the light.
Here he comes.
Let's turn out the light.
Come in.
Come in!
Sit down.
Sit down!
You see? It understands.
Watch.
Take care, Herr Frankenstein!
Take care!
Shut out the light!
Sit down.
Go and sit down.
It understands this time.
It's wonderful.
Frankenstein! Frankenstein!
Where is it? Where is it?
Quiet, you fool!
Get away with that torch!
Quick!
Fetch the rope. Quick!
Stop kicking!
Get him to the cellar!
Shoot it! It's a monster!
Quiet. Quiet!
Cooperate!
You'll have the whole countryside on us!
Come away!
He has the strength of 10 men.
This is madness. Give me that.
Oh, come away, Fritz.
Leave it alone. Leave it alone.
Listen. What's that? Who's there?
It's Fritz!
Come on, Doctor. Quick. Hurry.
Get back.
Get back. Get back.
Quick. Quick!
He hated Fritz.
Fritz always tormented him.
Come, come. Pull yourself together.
What can we do?
Kill it, as you would any savage animal.
We must overpower him first.
Get me a hypodermic needle.
- It's murder.
- It's our only chance.
In a few minutes he'll be through that door.
Come quick. Hurry.
- Got it?
- Yes.
Here it is. It's very strong.
Half-grain solution.
Good. Now, then.
You stand there.
When he goes toward you,
I will make the injection in his back.
Right.
- Ready?
- Yes.
Get back. Back!
Dr. Waldman? Dr. Waldman!
Are you hurt?
No, no, I'm all right.
It's nothing.
See who's at the door.
What's happening here?
Elizabeth and your father are coming up the hill to see you.
- You must keep them out.
- Too late.
They must not see that.
Here, quick, give me a hand.
Quick.
Down here.
Henry, you better hurry upstairs and get that blood off your face before your father and Elizabeth get here.
All right.
Well, pretty sort of place for my son to be in, I must say.
Is that the front door?
Yes, this is it.
Why,
I don't like it, but here goes.
Why, that...
There doesn't seem to be anybody in the place.
God!
What a forsaken place here.
You're trying to burn it down?
What's that for, eh?
What's the matter with you?
You look as though you've been kicked by a horse.
- Where's Henry?
- Why...
Well?
He can't be disturbed just now.
Oh, can't he?
I'll soon settle that nonsense.
Victor, where is he?
This place seems to drive everybody crazy. I...
Good heavens, what's that?
I beg your pardon.
I am Dr. Waldman.
Oh, are you?
I'm Baron Frankenstein.
Perhaps you know what all this tommyrot's about.
I'll be shot if I do.
I would advise you to take Henry away from here at once.
What do you suppose I'm here for, pleasure?
Where are you, my dear?
Oh, there you are.
Let's go and see what's up the awful stairs.
I don't know how the deuce
I'm going to get up them.
Just watch me. Do the trick.
Leave them alone.
No banisters or anything else.
God bless his soul.
How much further?
Come in.
Henry.
Elizabeth.
Henry!
Victor, Dr. Waldman, come quickly!
My dear, what have they done to you?
Poor, poor, Fritz.
It's all my fault.
- Get him on the sofa.
- Come on.
Oh, my boy.
Thank you.
Have you got any brandy?
- I did it.
- Quick, quick, quick, quick.
Here, I'll do that.
Come on, boy.
Now, now, now, drink. Drink this.
There. There, that's better.
I'm going to take you home with me, Henry.
No, I can't. My work.
What will happen to the records of my experiment?
We will preserve them.
- And... 
- I will see that it is painlessly destroyed.
- No.
- Yes, yes. Leave it all to me.
Poor Fritz. All my fault.
There, Henry.
You can't do any more now.
You must come home until you get well again.
You'll soon feel better when you get out of here.
It's like heaven, being with you again.
Heaven wasn't so far away all the time, you know.
I know, but I didn't realize it.
My work...
Those horrible days and nights.
I couldn't think of anything else.
Henry.
You're not to think of those things anymore.
You promised.
All right. Let's think about us.
When will our wedding be?
Let's make it soon.
As soon as you like.
For three generations, these orange blossoms have been worn at our weddings.
Your great-grandfather wore this, Henry.
Looks as good as new now, eh?
- Thank you. 
- And here.
Here's one to make the best man look still better.
Thank you, sir.
Thirty years ago,
I placed this on your mother's head, Henry.
Today you'll make me very happy by doing the same for Elizabeth.
And I hope in 30 years time, a youngster of yours will be carrying on the tradition.
And now, how about a little drink, eh?
Come on.
My grandfather bought this wine and laid it down.
My grandmother wouldn't let him drink it.
Oh, bless her heart.
Here's to your very good health.
Well, you all full?
Yes? Come along.
Here's a health to a son of the house of Frankenstein.
A son to the house of Frankenstein.
Here's a jolly good health to young Frankenstein.
Young Frankenstein.
Here, Hyde.
Give the servants some champagne.
This stuff's wasted on them.
Well, well, well, well.
Go on, mop it up, mop it up.
It'll do you good.
To the house of Frankenstein.
To the house of Frankenstein.
Thank you.
Now, then, now be off about your business.
Listen. Listen to them.
The boys and girls are busy, my dear.
It's extraordinary how friendly you can make a lot of people on a couple of bottles of beer.
Tomorrow they'll all be fighting.
No doubt.
They're calling for you, Baron.
Well, I suppose I'd better show myself.
Make a little talk.
Quiet!
Thank you all very much indeed.
I am very pleased to see you all, and I hope there's plenty of beer.
At all events there's lots more where that came from.
You stay here, Maria.
I'll just take a look at my traps.
Then we'll go to the village and have a grand time, huh?
- You won't be long, Daddy?
- Oh, no, no.
If Hans comes by, tell him I'll be back soon?
Daddy, won't you stay and play with me a little while?
I'm too busy, darling.
You stay and play with the kitty, huh?
Bye, Daddy.
Goodbye.
Be a good girl now.
Come on, kitty.
Who are you?
I'm Maria.
Will you play with me?
Would you like one of my flowers?
You have those, and I'll have these.
I can make a boat.
See how mine floats?
No, you're hurting me! No!
They're having a wonderful time, aren't they?
Henry.
Elizabeth.
Oh, how lovely you look.
But you shouldn't be here.
I must see you for a minute.
Well, what's the matter?
Could you leave us for a moment?
Why, of course.
Well, what is it?
Oh, I'm so glad you're safe.
Safe? Of course I'm safe.
But you look worried.
Is anything wrong?
No.
No, forget my foolishness.
It was just a mood.
There's nothing the matter.
Of course there isn't.
Henry, I'm afraid, terribly afraid.
Where's Dr. Waldman?
Why is he late for the wedding?
Oh, he's always late.
He'll be here soon.
Something is going to happen.
I feel it.
I can't get it out of my mind.
You're just nervous.
All the excitement and preparation.
No, no, it isn't that.
I felt it all day.
Something is coming between us.
I know it. I know it!
Sit down and rest.
You look so tired.
If I could just do something to save us from it.
From what, dear? From what?
I don't know.
If I could just get it out of my mind.
Oh, I'd die if I had to lose you now, Henry.
Lose me? Why, I'll always be with you.
Will you, Henry? Are you sure?
I love you so.
Sure.
How beautiful you look.
Henry! Henry!
- What's that? What's that?
- Henry! Henry!
-Henry! Dr. Waldman! Dr. Waldman!
- What about Dr. Waldman?
Henry, don't leave me.
Don't leave me.
No, darling, you stay here.
Henry. Henry!
Dr. Waldman's been murdered in the tower.
The monster?
He's been seen in the hills terrorizing the mountainside.
He's in the house.
He's upstairs!
Oh, God!
It's in the cellars.
It's Elizabeth. Come on.
Someone open the door!
Elizabeth.
Where is it?
- Don't let it come here.
- No, no, no, darling.
- Don't let it come here.
- It's all right.
Don't let it come here.
It's all right, darling.
It's all right.
Oh, look! Look, Maria!
Silence! Silence!
Silence. What is it? What is it?
Maria, she's drowned.
My poor man, why do you bring her here to me?
But she has been murdered.
Silence! I'll see that justice is done!
Who is it?
How is Elizabeth now?
I don't know.
She's still in a daze.
Just looks at me and says nothing.
- It's maddening.
- Easy, old man. She'll be all right.
- Our wedding day.
- Steady.
Your wedding will only be postponed a day at most.
A day? I wonder.
What do you mean?
There can be no wedding while this horrible creation of mine is still alive.
I made him with these hands, and with these hands, I'll destroy him.
- I must find him.
- I'll go with you.
No. You stay here and look after Elizabeth.
I leave her in your care, whatever happens.
You understand? In your care.
Quiet! Quiet!
Quiet!
Ludwig, you will search the woods.
Those are your group.
- We'll get him.
- Quiet!
Herr Frankenstein, you will take to the mountains.
Those are your people.
I will lead the third group by the lake.
Remember, remember, get him alive if you can, but get him!
Quiet!
Search every ravine, every crevice, but the fiend must be found!
- Are you ready?
- Yes!
Then light your torches and go!
- Stop! 
- Stop, men.
Frankenstein, mountains. Ludwig...
Lake party, this way!
Come on, men!
Come on, boys. Keep together.
Now, you search there.
The rest, come with me.
Go over there! Go on.
Come on, men! Come on! Come on!
Herr Frankenstein! Herr Frankenstein!
Come on, men!
Hurry up. This way.
Which way?
Which way did he go?
Hans, which way did he go?
Tell me. Tell me!
Over there.
You stay here and take care of him.
The rest, follow me.
Come on. Come on, quick!
Come on! Come on!
No, come back. This way!
Herr Frankenstein!
Herr Frankenstein! Where are you?
I think he's up there.
Come on, follow him. Follow him.
Follow him. Quick!
Hello!
There.
Fire. Fire!
Help! Help!
Listen!
- Help!
- It's Frankenstein.
That way!
This way. Come on.
Hurry. Hurry!
There! Turn the hounds loose!
Come on! Come on!
Once more.
There he is! The murderer!
Kill him!
Frankenstein?
Bring him down to the village, and let's take him home.
Burn the mill!
Burn the mill. Burn it.
- Have you got it?
- Yeah. Come on. Hurry.
Hurry up.
Quiet, quiet.
Well, go ahead and knock.
Well, well, well.
What's all this?
What do you want, eh?
What's this?
If you please, Herr Baron, we thought that Mr. Henry could do with a glass of his great-grandmother's wine.
Fine old lady, my grandmother.
Very foreseeing of her to prevent my grandfather drinking this.
Mr. Henry doesn't need this.
Well, as I said before,
I say again.
Here's to a son to the house of Frankenstein.
Indeed, sir. We hope so, sir.
How beautifully dramatic.
The crudest, savage, exhibition of nature at her worst, without, and we three, we elegant three, within.
I should like to think that an irate Jehovah was pointing those arrows of lightning directly at my head.
The unbowed head of George Gordon,
Lord Byron, England's greatest sinner.
But I cannot flatter myself to that extent.
Possibly those thunders are for our dear Shelley.
Heaven's applause for England's greatest poet.
- What of my Mary?
- She is an angel.
- You think so?
- (thunder)
You hear?
Come, Mary. Come and watch the storm.
You know how lightning alarms me.
Shelley, darling, will you please light these candles for me?
Mary, darling.
Astonishing creature.
- I, Lord Byron?
- Frightened of thunder, fearful of the dark.
And yet you have written a tale that sent my blood into icy creeps.
Look at her, Shelley. Can you believe that lovely brow conceived of Frankenstein?
A monster created from cadavers out of rifled graves.
- Isn't it astonishing?
- I don't know why you should think so.
What do you expect?
Such an audience needs something stronger than a pretty little love story.
So why shouldn't I write of monsters?
No wonder Murray's refused to publish the book. His public would be shocked.
It will be published, I think.
Then, darling, you will have much to answer for.
The publishers did not see that my purpose was to write a moral lesson of the punishment that befell a mortal man who dared to emulate God.
Whatever your purpose was, I take great relish in savouring each separate horror.
I roll them over on my tongue.
Don't, Lord Byron.
Don't remind me of it tonight.
What a setting in that churchyard to begin with!
The sobbing women, the first clod of earth
on the coffin. That was a pretty chill.
Frankenstein and the dwarf stealing
the body out of its new-made grave.
Cutting the hanged man down from
the gallows, where he swung in the wind.
The cunning of Frankenstein
in his mountain laboratory,
picking dead men apart and
building up a human monster
so fearful and so horrible that only
a half-crazed brain could have devised.
And then the murders,
the little child who drowned.
Henry Frankenstein himself
thrown from the top of the burning mill
by the very monster he had created.
And it was these fragile white fingers that penned the nightmare.
Ah! You've made me prick myself, Byron.
It's bleeding.
There, there. I do think it a shame, Mary, to end your story quite so suddenly.
That wasn't the end at all. Would you like to hear what happened after that?
I feel like telling it.
It's a perfect night for mystery and horror.
The air itself is filled with monsters.
I'm all ears. While heaven blasts the night without, open up your pits of hell.
Well, then, imagine yourselves standing by the wreckage of the mill.
The fire is dying down.
Soon the bare skeleton
of the building rolls over,
the gaunt rafters against the sky.
(yelling)
Well, I must say, that's the best fire
I ever saw in all me life.
- What are you cryin' for?
- It's terrible.
I know. But after all them murders and poor Mr Henry being brought home to die,
I'm glad to see the monster roasted to death before my very eyes.
It's too good for him.
It's all the devil's work, and you'd better cross yourself quick before he gets you.
Come along, come along. It's all over.
Get back to your homes and go to sleep.
There it goes again.
It ain't burnt out at all.
- There's more yet.
- Isn't the monster dead yet?
It's high time every decent man and wife was in bed.
That's his insides caught at last.
Insides is always the last to be consumed.
Move on. You've had enough excitement for one night.
This strange man you call a monster is dead.
Monster, indeed!
You may thank your lucky stars they sent for me to safeguard life and property.
Why didn't you safeguard those drownded and murdered?
Come, now. We want no rallying, no riots.
- Who's riotin'?
- Move on, move on.
Good night all, and pleasant dreams.
Ah, pleasant dreams yourself.
Thinks he's everybody just because he's a burgomaster. Huh!
Poor Mr Henry. He was to have been married today to that lovely girl Elizabeth.
Cover him up. Someone must break the news to the poor girl.
Ride as fast as you can to the castle, and tell the old Baron Frankenstein we are bringing his son home.
- Oh, dear.
- Oh, shut up.
Come home, Hans.
The monster is dead now.
Nothing could be left alive in that furnace.
Why do you stay here?
I want to see with my own eyes.
Oh, Hans, he must be dead.
And, dead or alive, nothing can bring our little Maria back to us.
If I can see his blackened bones,
I can sleep at night.
Come back, Hans!
You will be burned yourself!
Maria drowned to death and you burned up! What should I do then?
No!
(growls)
Hans. Hans!
Where are you? Hans!
Are you all right?
I hear you. Here, give me your hand, Hans.
Here.
(screams)
(growls)
(screams)
(bangs on door)
Oh, heaven, what is this?
Henry? Tell me.
Oh, milady, how can we tell you?
Bring him in.
- Albert.
- What do you want?
It's alive. The monster, it's alive!
- Ah, shut up, you old fool.
- I saw it.
It ain't turned to no skeleton at all.
It lived right through the fire.
Ah, go bite your tongue off.
We don't believe in ghosts.
Nobody'll believe me.
All right, I'll wash my hands of it.
Let 'em all be murdered in their beds.
- Speak to me, Henry.
- Oh, milady, he'll never speak again.
I was foretold of this.
I was told beware my wedding night.
Oh, look, milady! He's alive!
Henry, darling.
Elizabeth.
Oh, what a terrible wedding night.
You can go to bed now, Mary.
- You'll soon be better.
- I feel almost myself again.
When you're strong enough, we'll go away and forget this horrible experience.
Forget? If only I could forget.
But it's never out of my mind.
I've been cursed for delving into the mysteries of life.
Perhaps death is sacred, and I've profaned it.
For what a wonderful vision it was.
I dreamed of being the first to give to the world the secret that God is so jealous of.
The formula for life.
Think of the power to create a man.
And I did. I did it. I created a man.
And who knows? In time I could have trained him to do my will.
I could have bred a race. I might even have found the secret of eternal life.
Henry, don't say those things. Don't think them. It's blasphemous and wicked.
We are not meant to know those things.
It may be that I'm intended to know the secret of life.
It may be part of the divine plan.
No, no. It's the devil that prompts you.
It's death, not life, that is in it all and at the end of it all.
Listen, while you've been lying here, tossing in your delirium, I couldn't sleep.
And when you rave of your insane desire to create living men from the dust of the dead, a strange apparition has seemed to appear in the room.
It comes, a figure like Death. And each time it comes more clearly, nearer.
It seems to be reaching out for you, as if it would take you away from me!
There it is. Look.
- There.
- I see nothing, Elizabeth. Where?
There's nothing there.
There! There! It's coming for you!
Nearer! Henry! Henry! Henry! Henry!
(laughs hysterically) Henry!
(banging on door)
Albert! Drat the man.
He's never here when he's wanted.
- What's the good of footmen anyway?
- (bell rings)
All right. All right!
Don't knock the castle over!
We're not all dead yet.
- There's nobody at home.
- Let me in, my good woman.
I know the young
Baron Frankenstein is at home.
He's sick. He's in his bed, where all decent folk should be at this time of night.
Tell him that Dr Pretorius is here on a secret matter of grave importance, and must see him alone, tonight.
Dr Pretorius?
Pretorius?
- What was it? What was the name?
- Dr Pretorius.
There ain't no such name.
Now, you stay there.
- Who's there?
- It's Minnie, milady.
(Henry) Oh, come in.
It's Dr Pretorius.
He says he wants to see the master. Most insistent.
Pretorius?
He's a very queer-looking old gentleman, sir.
And must see you, on a secret, grave matter, he said.
Tonight. Alone.
- Bring him in.
- Henry, who is this man?
Dr Pretorius.
Baron Frankenstein now, I believe?
Won't you come in, Doctor?
I trust you will pardon this intrusion at so late an hour.
I would not have ventured to come, had I not a communication to make which I suspect may be of the utmost importance to yourself.
This is Professor Pretorius. He used to be
Doctor of Philosophy at the university.
- But, uh...
- But was booted out.
Booted, my dear Baron, is the word.
For knowing too much.
Henry's been very ill, Professor.
He shouldn't be disturbed.
I am also a doctor, Baroness.
Why have you come here tonight?
My business with you, Baron, is private.
Elizabeth, please.
I do hope he won't upset Henry.
- What do you want?
- We must work together.
Never. This is outrageous.
I'm through with it.
I'll have no more of this hell-spawn.
As soon as I'm well,
I'm to be married, and I'm going away.
I must beg you to reconsider.
You know, do you not, that it is you, really, who are responsible for all those murders?
There are penalties to pay for killing people.
And with your creature still at large in the countryside...
Are you threatening me?
Don't put it so crudely.
I had ventured to hope that you and I together, no longer as master and pupil, but as fellow scientists, might probe the mysteries of life and death...
Never. No further.
...and reach a goal undreamed of by science.
I can't make any further experiments.
I've had a terrible lesson.
That is sad, very sad.
But you and I have gone too far to stop.
Nor can it be stopped so easily.
I also have continued with my experiments.
That is why I am here tonight.
You must see my creation.
Have you also succeeded in bringing life to the dead?
If you, Herr Baron, will do me the honour of visiting my humble abode,
I think you will be interested in what I have to show you.
After 20 years of secret scientific research, and countless failures,
I also have created life, as we say, in God's own image.
I must know. When can I see it?
I thought you might change your mind.
Why not tonight? It is not very late.
- Is it far?
- No, but you will need a coat.
I think your coachman had better wait here.
Won't you sit down, Herr Baron?
Before I show you the results of my trifling experiments,
I would like to drink to our partnership.
Do you like gin? It is my only weakness.
To a new world of gods and monsters.
Creation of life is enthralling, distinctly enthralling, is it not?
I cannot account precisely for all that I am going to show you.
But perhaps now that you are my partner, you can.
My experiments did not turn out quite like yours, Henry.
But science, like love, has her little surprises, as you shall see.
Good heavens, Doctor. What are these?
There is a pleasing variety about my exhibits.
My first experiment was so lovely that we made her a queen.
Charming, don't you think?
Then, of course, we had to have a king.
Now he's so madly in love with her that we have to segregate them.
Now now. I have to be very careful with the king.
Now, behave.
My next production looked so disapprovingly at the other two that they made him an archbishop.
He seems to be asleep.
I must wake him up.
The next one is the very devil.
Very bizarre, this little chap.
There's a certain resemblance to me, don't you think? Or do I flatter myself?
I took a great deal of pains with him.
Sometimes I have wondered whether life wouldn't be much more amusing if we were all devils, and no nonsense about angels and being good.
Oh, there's the king out again.
Even royal amours are a nuisance.
(squeaking)
(blows whistle)
Poor Archbishop. He has his hands full.
There. That'll keep you quiet.
My little ballerina is charming, but such a bore.
She'll only dance to
Mendelssohn's "Spring Song", and it gets so monotonous.
My next is very conventional, I'm afraid.
But you can never tell how these things will turn out.
It was an experiment with seaweed.
Normal size has been my difficulty.
You did achieve size.
I need to work that out with you.
But this isn't science.
It's more like black magic.
You think I'm mad. Perhaps I am.
But listen, Henry Frankenstein, while you were digging in your graves piecing together dead tissues,
I, my dear pupil, went for my material to the source of life.
I grew my creatures, like cultures.
Grew them as nature does, from seed.
But, still, you did achieve results that I have missed. Now, think.
What a world-astounding collaboration we should be, you and I, together.
No. No, no, no.
Leave the charnel house and follow the lead of nature, or of God, if you like your Bible stories.
Male and female, created He them.
Be fruitful and multiply.
Create a race, a man-made race upon the face of the earth. Why not?
I daren't. I daren't even think of such a thing.
Our mad dream is only half realised.
Alone you have created a man.
Now together we will create his mate.
You mean...?
Yes, a woman.
That should be really interesting.
(cries out)
Please don't touch me!
- There she is! Quick!
- (screams)
There he is. Shoot.
Run to the village, quick.
It's the monster. Tell the burgomaster.
- What is it now?
- The monster! He's in the woods.
Get the bloodhounds. Raise all the men you can, lock the women indoors and wait for me.
Now then! Monster, indeed!
I'll show him. Follow me.
(growls)
Where is he?
Bind him securely.
I don't want anything slipshod.
Tie his feet first. His feet first!
I get no cooperation. None at all.
Have you got him? That's what
I want to know. Have you got him?
Of course we've got him, my good woman.
A good job too.
Mind he don't get loose again.
He might do some damage and hurt somebody.
- Bring him down when you've bound him.
- You want any help there? I'll bind him!
Now take him down to the old dungeon and put him in chains.
There you are.
Find some rope and tie him up.
Come on, then. Get back to your work.
Keep still.
That's quite enough. Come and lock your doors. We can't take all day over this.
I'd hate to find him under my bed at night.
He's a nightmare in the daylight, he is.
Get away, there! Clear that window!
Hah! You mind your own business and see he doesn't get out. He's dangerous.
Now I can get back to more important duties.
- Way past our hours.
- Hm?
- The night, sir.
- Monster, indeed.
Tush, tush.
(growls)
He's loose! Shoot him!
Help! He's loose!
Go to your homes.
Just an escaped lunatic.
Merely wanted someone to handle it, that's all. Quite harmless.
Shoot him! Why don't you shoot him?
Where's Frieda?
Frieda! Frieda!
- Frieda? Where's Frieda?
- She just left.
- Oh, look!
- (screams)
Frieda! Oh, what have they done to you?
(terrible scream)
Mrs Newman. Oh! Come on!
(moaning)
- Poor old Newman.
- Where's his wife, Frau Newman?
Frau Newman.
- Frau Newman!
- Frau Newman!
Frau Newman!
(moaning)
There's another one in there.
- Frau Newman.
- (gasps)
Aurora, you stay close to me.
We'd better get away from these parts.
- It isn't safe.
- Why?
I'm frightened. The monster.
Ah, there's no danger. He's safe in jail and they'll keep him there.
Where's the pepper and salt?
We got no pepper and salt.
All right, Mother. I'll get it.
Don't worry. You shall have your meat.
Ah.
(sniffs)
- (grunts)
- (screams)
Get away from there.
(cries)
(growls)
(# violin plays Schubert's "Ave Maria")
(small grunts of pleasure)
Who's there?
(growls)
Who is it?
You're welcome, my friend, whoever you are.
Who are you?
I think you're a stranger to me.
I cannot see you. I cannot see anything.
You must please excuse me, but I am blind.
(small grunts)
Come in, my poor friend.
No one will hurt you here.
If you're in trouble, perhaps I can help you.
But you need not tell me about it if you don't want to.
- What's the matter?
- (growls)
You're hurt, my poor friend.
Come.
Sit down.
Now tell me, who are you?
(faint moans)
I don't understand.
Can you not speak?
It's strange.
Perhaps... perhaps you're afflicted too.
I cannot see and you cannot speak.
Is that it?
If you understand what I'm saying, put your hand on my shoulder.
That is good.
No, you stay here.
I'll get you some food.
We shall be friends.
I have prayed many times for God to send me a friend.
It's very lonely here, and it's been a long time since any human being came into this hut.
I shall look after you, and you will comfort me.
Now you must lie down, and go to sleep.
Yes, yes, now you must sleep.
Our Father, I thank thee, that, in thy great mercy, thou hast taken pity on my great loneliness.
And now, out of the silence of the night, hath brought two of thy lonely children together, and sent me a friend to be a light to mine eyes and a comfort in time of trouble.
Amen.
And now for our lesson.
Remember, this is bread.
Bread.
Bread.
And this is wine... to drink.
- Drink.
- Drink.
Good. Good.
We are friends, you and I.
- Friends.
- Friends.
- Good.
- Good!
And now for a smoke.
(laughs)
No, no. This is good.
Smoke. You try.
Smoke.
Good, good.
Good.
Before you came, I was all alone.
It is bad to be alone.
Alone.
Bad.
Friend. Good. Friend. Good.
Now, come here.
And what is this?
This is wood for the fire.
Wood.
- And this is fire.
- (growls)
No, no. Fire is good.
Fire no good.
There is good and there is bad.
Good. Bad.
Good.
Music?
(knocking)
Can you tell us how to get out of this wood? We've lost our way.
Come in, friends, and rest a while.
- Look.
- It's the monster.
(growls)
What are you doing? This is my friend.
Friend? This is the fiend that's been murdering half the countryside.
Good heavens, man, can't you see?
Oh, he's blind.
He isn't human. Frankenstein made him out of dead bodies.
(growls)
My friend. Why do you do this?
Friend.
Look.
(screaming)
(growls)
Which way did he go?
This way! He's gone this way!
Friend.
(tapping)
(rattling)
- I can smell the ghosts already.
- I never could stand graves.
Shut up and follow me.
Read the inscription. What does it say?
"Died 1899. Maddalena Ernestine, beloved daughter of..."
Oh, never mind that. How old was she?
"Aged 19 years, three months."
Well, that's the one. Get to work.
- What are you waiting for?
- Mercy on us.
- You want me to send you to the gallows?
- Could be no worse than this.
- Well, are you ready?
- Yes.
Here goes.
Pretty little thing, in her way, wasn't she?
I hope her bones are firm.
- It seems lighter now.
- Yes.
Well, Doctor, I guess that's all for tonight.
- Can we go home now?
- Yes. I shall wait here for a bit.
I rather like this place.
- Be careful nobody sees you leave.
- We know.
- And leave me that lantern down there.
- All right, all right.
If there's more like this, what do you say, pal?
We give ourselves up and let 'em hang us?
- That goes for me too.
- This is no life for murderers.
(laughs)
I give you the monster.
(laughs)
Oh.
I thought I was alone. Good evening.
Smoke.
- Friend.
- Yes, I hope so.
Have a cigar. They are my only weakness.
Good, good.
Drink. Good.
Good.
You make man like me?
No. Woman.
- Friend for you.
- Woman?
Friend. Yes.
I want friend. Like me.
I think you can be very useful.
And you will add a little force to the argument, if necessary.
Do you know who Henry Frankenstein is?
And who you are?
Yes. I know.
Made me from dead.
I love dead.
Hate living.
You're wise in your generation.
We must have a long talk, and then
I have an important call to make.
Woman. Friend.
Wife.
That Dr Pretorius is here again, sir.
There, I knew it.
- Send him away. I won't see him.
- I certainly will.
Good evening, Henry.
Baroness, I've not yet had the opportunity of offering you my congratulations on your marriage.
- Pray accept them now.
- Dr Pretorius.
I don't know what your business is but, whatever it may be,
I tell you frankly that I am not frightened of it or of you.
Henry's been very ill. He's in no state to be alarmed or annoyed.
Your visit now is most unwelcome.
Henry, I heard the carriage drive up.
I'll see that the baggage is put in.
Then we're leaving.
I think you know why I am here, Henry.
All the necessary preparations are made.
My part in the experiments is complete.
I have created, by my method, a perfect human brain - already living, but dormant.
Everything is now ready for you and me to begin our supreme collaboration.
No, no. Don't tell me of it.
I don't want to hear.
I've changed my mind. I won't do it.
I expected this.
I thought we might need another assistant.
Perhaps he can persuade you.
- Nothing can persuade me.
- We shall see.
- No! Not that!
- Oh, he's harmless, except when crossed.
Frankenstein.
Yes, there have been developments since he came to me.
Sit down.
- What do you want?
- You know.
- This is your work.
- Yes.
I'll have no hand in such a monstrous thing.
- Yes. Must.
- Get him out.
I won't even discuss it until he's gone.
Go now.
(Iow growl)
Go.
- Must do it.
- Nothing can make me go on with it.
(growls)
Now.
Put the bags in the carriage and I'll be out in a moment.
Go and tell the master to hurry,
Minnie, or we shall lose the train.
Excuse me for being so nervous, milady, but I don't like leaving you alone.
- Oh, nonsense, Minnie, I shall be all right.
- I hope so, milady.
Is that you, Henry?
(screams)
Henry! Henry, help!
(screams) Henry!
Milady!
(screaming)
- Elizabeth.
- (Minnie screams)
What is it? What's the matter?
Oh, sir, she's gone!
The monster, he's got her!
I saw it. The baroness is gone!
This is Pretorius' doing. Quick, search parties. There's not a moment to lose.
(crash)
I charge you, as you value your mistress' life, to do nothing and say nothing of this episode.
I assure you that the baroness will be safely returned, if you will leave everything to me.
Nothing, that is, except what he demands.
I can find no trace of Elizabeth.
Oh, I admit I'm beaten.
But if you can bring her back,
I'll do anything that you want.
Are you ready to complete with me this final experiment?
- What about Elizabeth?
- She is well, and will be safely returned if you will proceed.
- I'm ready.
- Ah.
Mind the steps.
They're a bit slimy, I expect.
I think it's a charming house.
It is interesting to think that once upon a time we should have been burnt at the stake as wizards for this experiment.
Doctor, I think the heart is beating.
Look. It's beating.
- But the rhythm of the beat is uneven.
- Increase the saline solution.
- Is there any life yet?
- No, not life itself yet.
This is only the simulacrum of life.
This action only responds when the current is applied.
We must be patient. The heart is more complex than any other part of the body.
Look. The beat is increasing.
Yes...
- It's stopped.
- Shall I increase the current?
This heart is useless.
I must have another.
And it must be sound and young.
Karl.
You must go to your friend at the accident hospital.
What we need is a female victim of sudden death. Can you do it?
If you promise me a thousand crowns.
It will be well worth it, and the baron will pay.
- Yes, yes. Go and get it.
- I'll try.
There are always accidental deaths occurring.
Always.
I'll get your heart.
I'll go into that room, I'll go into that room and I'll take my knife out.
I'll get her. I'll hold her down and there she'll be.
Where, I ask you? Where will she be?
A thousand crowns.
It's beating perfectly. Just as in life.
- Oh, if only I can keep it going until...
- It was a very fresh one.
(crash)
Where did you get it?
I gave the gendarme 50 crowns.
- What gendarme?
- It was a...
- police case.
- Yes, very sad.
Only, we can't bother about that now.
Can I do anything?
No, no, no! I can work better alone.
(growls)
- Work.
- Where's Elizabeth?
- Have you brought her?
- She wait. I wait.
I'm exhausted. I must get sleep.
Work. Finish. Then sleep.
But I can't work like this.
He must go away. Send him away.
I'll settle him for a little while.
Drink.
Drink.
Good.
(drops glass)
(Pretorius laughs)
That'll keep you quiet.
Elizabeth - she's dead.
Elizabeth is alive and she is well.
- I don't believe you.
- I have proof.
- Proof?
- In a few moments from now, she will speak to you from where she is through this electrical machine.
- Where is she?
- Not far from here.
(buzzing)
Speak, and she will hear you and answer.
Yes, yes, this is Henry.
Henry, yes, I'm safe. But, oh, Henry, how long? Come for me. I'm in...
Elizabeth? Elizabeth!
- She's gone.
- That is all now. But you heard her.
Yes, she's alive.
As soon as our work is completed she will be returned to you.
The heart is beating more regularly now.
Yes, it's been beating for nine hours.
Not yet, but soon...
- And the brain?
- Perfect and already in position.
- Then we are almost ready.
- Almost.
Shall we put the heart in now?
- Yes.
- Ludwig.
It's beating quite normally now.
Bring it over.
(thunder)
- The storm is rising.
- All right.
The air is heavy with electricity.
It's going to be a terrific storm.
We shall be ready.
Isn't it amazing, Henry, that lying here within this cowl is an artificially developed human brain?
Each cell, each convolution ready, waiting for life to come.
(thunder)
Look. The storm is coming up over the mountains.
- It will be here soon.
- The kites. Are the kites ready?
- Yes.
- Send them up as soon as the wind rises.
- Hurry, hurry!
- The kites, the kites, get 'em ready.
Ludwig!
He wants the kites!
Stand back.
Careful on the roof!
The big diffuser!
Wires! Slip down your wires!
All right. Stop your winches.
I'm coming up!
- Now, off with the kites!
- You take number two, Ludwig.
- Have you made your connections?
- Yes.
Stand by!
Let go of number one!
Let her go!
It's coming up!
- Go back. Go back down!
- (growls)
Go back!
No! Get away! Frankenstein!
Get away! Get away!
(wild screams)
Don't come near me!
Get away! Don't! No! No!
Don't! Don't!
(screams)
Raise the cosmic diffuser.
Remove the diffuser bands.
(Iow moan)
She's alive! Alive!
The bride of Frankenstein.
Friend?
(strangled sound)
Friend?
- Stand back. Stand back.
- (growls)
She hate me. Like others.
- Look out! The lever!
- Get away from that lever!
You'll blow us all to atoms.
Henry!
Open the door! Henry!
- Get back! Get back!
- I won't unless you come!
But I can't leave them! I can't!
Yes, go! You live!
Go!
You stay.
We belong dead.
(growls)
(hisses)
Darling, darling.
Diana?
Yes, mother rukh.
Janos is still in the laboratory, of course?
Yes, he's checking his equipment before the people from england arrive.
I'm to let him know when I see the lights of the car.
It was on such a night that janos first caught his ray from Andromeda.
Your father worked the guides.
I held the detecting lens, and never saw again.
= dear mother rukh.
My son will not learn until too late, I fear, that the universe is very large, and there are some secrets we are not meant to probe.
Janos says the electricity will help the demonstration.
He is wrong to demonstrate to these people.
Who are they?
Pygmies that scoff at a giant, who have said that he is only a visionary, unscientific, a charlatan, huh.
He's greater than all of them.
He sent for them.
If he had waited, one day they would have begged, begged to come to him.
T see the car now.
I'll tell janos.
Janos?
Janos?
= Diana.
They're coming up the grade.
= sir Francis Stevens and the great Dr. benet from the university of Paris.
What do they know?
What will they ever know?
I'll take them somewhere they've never been.
Back into time.
It will work well tonight.
I'm sure and I'm ready.
They'll never laugh at me again.
= janos.
They'll be here any minute.
You must prepare to meet them.
Come.
Yes, yes.
= I'm Diana rukh.
My husband will be here presently.
I'm lady Stevens.
This is my husband, sir Francis.
How do you do?
= and this is Dr. benet.
Madame.
How do you do?
And this is my nephew, Ronald Drake.
How do you do?
May I present you to my husband's mother, frau rukh.
How do you do?
Oh, what a lovely fire.
I hope you didn't have too bad a time coming up.
It really is rather a terrible trip.
Oh, I don't mind anything, but my poor sit-downish husband minded it.
- Brandy?
- Oh, thanks.
That will help.
Thank you.
Would anyone ever expect to find anything like this on top of the carpathian mountains?
No.
= sir Francis.
To see you again after so many years is interesting.
Dr. benet, we meet at last.
But we already know each other.
True.
You've come to see me fail, but you'll be disappointed.
I have come to see that sir Francis isn't deceived.
Your doubts are very flattering.
They are mutual.
We have never seen eye to eye.
That is because I've always looked 200 years ahead of your theories.
= Dr. rukh?
You haven't met me.
Oh, lady Stevens.
Nor my nephew, Ronald Drake.
And you too are a scientist, sir?
No, I'm afraid not.
He doesn't know a thing about science.
But he's one of the three living men who crossed the mountains of the moon, made maps of the country.
And since that's where we're going, he'll come in useful.
Very commendable work, sir.
Good man.
I've seen him tested in Africa.
I read that you were going to Africa.
That's why I asked you here.
Because what I have to show you after dinner concerns Africa, and the claim I made many years ago.
= all of this makes a man like me feel quite small and useless.
But you've gone into uncharted places, too.
Oh, my explorations have all been on this planet.
They reach into space.
= this is the nebula in Andromeda.
A ray from this nebula will be caught here and electrically transferred to the projector in my laboratory.
There I will recreate what is recorded on that beam of light.
From Andromeda?
From Andromeda.
Three-quarters of a million light-years distant.
= can he do that?
Yes.
He will not fail.
He must not.
It would kill him.
Have you seen it?
= no one has seen it but janos.
= you'll wait here a few minutes.
I'll prepare the projector.
He seems very confident.
Yes.
Of course, the theory of reproducing vibrations from the past is not new.
But if proved, would be. = yes.
This may be very interesting.
Yes, very.
Doesn't all this sort of thing ever affect you?
Oh, no, I'm used to it.
My father was assistant here.
When he died three years ago, I married Dr. rukh.
Oh, I see.
I am ready.
A new development of barium crown glass which will protect you from all dangerous rays.
To reproduce what is written upon the beam from Andromeda, we must travel out into space upon that ray of light until we reach a point at which we turn and look back upon our own planet.
We approach the moon.
Dead ashes, where there is no air or water.
In the shadows, colder than our arctic.
In the sunlight, hotter than any desert of the earth.
Saturn we pass, with its twirling rings.
A vast cloud of tiny movements, each moving in its own orbit.
Another constellation speeds towards us.
The great nebula of Orion.
500 light-years distant.
But we travel at a speed far greater than light, the pace of electric magnification.
Otherwise it would take a million lifetimes to reach our goal.
We move by this chaotic mass and see Andromeda, our nearest neighbor among the island universes of space.
The light which we see left there before man existed, before our earth had cooled.
We speed towards this nebula and stop at a point where we will see our own planet, the earth, as it existed long ago.
Years ago, sir Francis, I voiced a belief that a great meteor bearing an element even more powerful than radium, struck an uncharted spot somewhere in the continent of Africa.
If you will bear with me for a moment,
I'll show you how 1 know this to be a fact.
That is all.
=- a trick?
No.
Reality.
But where has it gone?
Back into space.
What did we see?
What you saw tonight actually occurred a few thousand million years ago.
J see.
A tour in time.
Exactly.
Everything that ever happened has left its record on nature's film.
Every sound since eternity began still vibrates, recorded somewhere in outer space.
The cataclysm you witnessed tonight traveled back to us on the ray from Andromeda.
Well, I'm dazed.
Dazed, that's all I can say.
You have demonstrated something that I have always regarded as an unsupported theory.
I'm at a loss for words.
I congratulate you.
Perhaps you'd all like some Brandy.
Oh, thank you, that would be most acceptable.
I'll join you in a few moments.
Well, I, for one, am just beginning to recover from what we've seen.
= t don't think I ever shall.
It was unbelievable.
Well, sir, your discovery is breathtaking.
When do you plan to release it to the world of science?
Oh, not for some time.
It's not nearly ready yet.
And if there should be this meteoric deposit of an unknown element in Africa...
= there is.
It'd be interesting to discover what it is.
Very.
Will you consider joining forces with us and accompany our expedition?
You ask me to join forces with you?
But you forget I have no standing with your scientific congress.
I believe I have even been called unorthodox.
Oh, nonsense.
Our expedition isn't under the auspices of any association.
You will be doing us an honor.
Yes, I'll go with you.
Why not?
No, janos.
Why?
It will not be wise for you to go.
I'm listening, mother.
Even though you may make a great discovery, you'll not be happy.
You are not used to people, janos.
You never will be.
Your experiments are your friends.
Leave people alone.
Where do you suppose that madman rukh is, anyway?
After all, it is his own business if he wishes to go off on an exploration of his own.
See, Stevens, the little creature is going to live.
See his flesh glow.
He moves his arm with much more strength.
Very interesting.
This proves, I think that human organisms are only part of astrochemistry, controlled by radial forces from the sun.
Oh, I never doubted your theory.
What have you been using?
= zithilium.
One milligram, drawn directly from the spectrum of the sun.
Turn it off.
Interesting.
But I must admit I'm quite ready to leave Africa the moment that your experiments are completed.
After eight weeks of this,
I admit that I'm fed up.
I know every wheeze and every crack of every record.
Glad to see signs of rhino about.
We'll go out after them tomorrow.
Yes, you've only got six to your credit.
Oh, well, they're such nasty-tempered beasts, it's a pleasure to dispose of them.
This must be lonely for Diana.
= of course.
It's your fault.
Why do you say that?
Oh, Ronnie, the way you two avoid each other is most pointed.
Why can't you be pleasantly friendly with her as you were at first?
Well, if you must know, I don't dare to be.
Becoming interested?
Yes.
I thought so.
You're in love.
Well, what could be more natural?
An African moon, two healthy young animals.
Oh, stop it.
We're not animals, and that's just it.
And it isn't too easy, so please don't make us into fiction for your book.
Well, you are interested.
Oh, so you're back, Arabella.
Yes, we got an antelope and a fine leopard.
My ankles are worse.
I tell you, I'm getting heartily sick of Africa.
And I don't see any use in waiting for rukh any longer.
It's evident he has elected to desert us.
Well, we can't go and leave his wife here alone, even though he's forgotten she came along.
After all, she is rukh's affair, not ours.
She is my affair.
I'm fond of her.
Well, I'm not fond enough of anyone to make this my permanent abode.
Temba, more water, please.
Ah, ah!
Choco.
The small package.
Boss, put on hat, very hot here.
Boss found place he look for many days now, maybe?
= there's no doubt of it.
No doubt of it.
Safari boys no like this place, boss.
Why not?
Look in pit, fall in, many devil.
= pick me out a runner.
I want to send a letter to the main camp immediately.
Me do.
This boy go.
He very fast.
= hold box.
How long will he take to reach the main camp?
This time tomorrow night, he get there.
All downhill. =- good.
Boss, wants him to wait, bring back answer paper?
Yes.
Now, give this to the young mistress.
Don't say a word about where we are.
And make sure he understands.
Francis, are you asleep?
No, my dear, I was merely trying to imagine myself at home.
I'd give 10 pounds for...
Antelope stew again.
Take it away.
I'm not up to coping with it.
Oh, stop feeling so sorry for yourself.
What new secrets did you draw from the sun today, Dr. benet?
Proof that the sun is the mother of us all.
Is she?
I wonder why she bothers about us.
What are we all about anyway?
Astrochemistry, my friend.
Astrochemistry.
= it's from janos.
Excuse me.
He says very little.
But we're not to expect him back for some time yet.
Where is he?
He doesn't say.
He hopes he's on the trail of an interesting new discovery.
Runner boy want take paper back.
Yes, tell him to wait.
Will you all excuse me, please?
- But your dinner, dear.
- I'm not really hungry.
I want to see the runner boy in my tent.
You come, too, and talk for me.
I'll be ready in an hour.
I want three boys for safari.
Diana?
What are you going to do?
There's only one thing to do.
I'm going to him tonight.
Tonight?
= it's cooler.
Besides, there's a moon.
You're going alone?
I can't stay here now.
Why?
He's a great man, Ronald.
I'm his wife.
He needs me, and I can't let him down.
No, you wouldn't.
You're not the sort to let any man down, ever.
Goodbye.
Goodbye, Diana.
Power.
More power than man has ever known.
Well, what do you want?
Safari boys want go away this place.
No like him.
So, they want to leave me, do they?
Me wanna go, too.
= indeed.
Do you see that rock?
Yes, boss.
I want you to keep your eyes on that rock.
Tell the boys to do so, too.
Watch.
No, I sorry, boss!
You can all go if you want to, but you won't go far.
All that will be left of you will be like that.
Me stay, boss.
We'll all stay.
All right, then get back to work.
Take the lamp inside.
Draws the pests.
It's poisoned me.
Dead.
Boss house there.
Me take you.
No, I'll go alone.
Janos?
What are you doing here?
You must go away at once.
At once, do you hear?
= but it's Diana.
You shouldn't have come.
I wrote you I had important work to do.
I don't want to be bothered with anyone.
Oh, you must be ill.
What's happened to you?
Nothing's happened to me.
What makes you think anything's happened to me?
It's been weeks since you left.
Don't you want to see me?
I don't want to see you here.
This is no place for you.
You must leave here at once.
My place is where you are.
I won't be a bother.
I suppose you'll have to stay the night.
My headman will find shelter for you.
But I want you out of here the very first thing in the morning, do you understand?
Yes, I understand.
I'm leaving as soon as it's daybreak.
Yes, missy.
Me tell your boys.
Thank you.
Benet.
Benet. - Rukh?
Don't let anybody know I'm here.
You're exhausted.
= don't touch me.
What has happened?
I made the runner guide me here.
I've traveled day and night.
But why?
I found the place where the meteor fell.
I've discovered an element a thousand times more powerful than radium.
But it's done something to me.
Something horrible.
Horrible?
Look at me.
Look at me in the dark.
Why, you're poisoned.
Poisoned.
And everyone I touch is poisoned.
They die.
= die?
Yes, I khow.
Let's get back into the light.
Perhaps the metal cloth did not protect you.
No, no, it gave me complete insulation.
I must have been careless somehow.
Benet, you know more of the chemistry of the body than any man alive.
Something must be done for me so that I can go back and solve the power of this element.
There is a counteractive for radium poisoning derived from radium itself.
Have you a sample of this new element?
Yes, yes.
There.
Do you think I can be helped?
I can't say until I deduce the atomic structure of this.
I've done that.
You'll find my calculations there.
All right.
Then I'll begin at once to work out the counteractive.
No one must know what's happened to me.
Is there any place where I can hide myself?
Oh yes, there's a little tent in back where I store my instruments.
You can keep out of sight there.
I'll show you.
Wake up, rukh.
Wake up.
You've been asleep for an hour.
Look at yourself.
I gave you the counteractive exactly at midnight.
My hands are not glowing.
No, your hands aren't glowing, nor your face.
I can touch people now?
Yes.
But remember what I've told you.
Nothing can ever cure you.
At best, your state of poisoning can only be checked, suspended.
And now that a counteractive has gone into your bloodstream, you can only live if you use a small amount of it at regular intervals each day all the days of your life.
Here's the formula.
And if I exceed the time, what happens?
Your body again becomes the deadly machine it was.
Your touch will kill.
Shortly after that you will become deadly to yourself as well.
If you do not use the counteractive in time, you will literally crumble to an ash.
Remember, I told you all the conditions.
You accepted the risks.
Yes, yes.
But at least after each treatment, I should be immune.
Normal.
As I told you, I don't know enough yet to say what effect the violent surcharge of poison and antidote will have upon the brain.
Yes.
I took that risk.
= this is the counteractive.
Guard it carefully.
And what do you plan to do now?
Go back to my camp, complete my tests, and return here as quickly as possible.
Tell no one of this.
Promise me.
I promise.
There's no use pretending any longer.
You know that I love you.
I've known it for a long time.
That's why I have been afraid.
= of me?
No, of us.
Oh, Diana, why fight something that's so much stronger than we are?
We must.
Do you love him?
My father idolized him.
When he died, I promised him that I would marry janos.
What are we going to do?
= tt don't know.
Dinner.
We must go.
Yes.
- Yes, boss.
- Where's Dr. rukh?
Boss tent there.
Oh, yes, I want to see him.
= Dr. benet.
How did you find this place?
We listened to the drums.
They talked of a white man who made magic in the mountains.
How are you feeling?
No ill effects so far?
So far, none.
You'd better get out of the sun.
= huh?
Oh, ves, yes.
Some water? = there.
They expected you back in camp long before this.
Yes, I khow.
There was always one thing more to do.
Days passed, and before I knew it, weeks.
I have harnessed it at last, benet.
I could crumple up a city a thousand miles away.
I could destroy a nation, all nations.
You have harnessed its power to destroy.
Have you harnessed it to heal?
That will come later, when I devise a filter to curb its power.
But in the meantime, it's mine to experiment with.
Stevens and I felt that would be your attitude.
That was why we decided your discovery was too important to be in the hands of one man.
Just what do you mean?
Stevens is now on his way to the international scientific congress that opened in Paris last month.
He's taking with him the specimen you left with me.
Why, you thieves!
Thieves!
You forget we came to
Africa for a common purpose.
= it discovered it.
= oh, the credit will be given you for the discovery.
Never fear.
Oh, thieves!
Thieves!
We couldn't wait for you forever, rukh.
Besides, your wife has been quite ill, so we decided to break up camp and go.
My wife? = yes.
She is on her way to Europe with Stevens.
I join them at lake nyanza.
Diana gone?
Stevens' wife is looking after her.
She asked me to hand you this letter.
She doesn't believe I love her.
She loves someone else.
Drake?
Yes.
To come like thieves in the night and steal everything from me.
Get out of here, benet!
Get out before I...
Don't move, mother.
Sit quite still.
In a few moments, we will know.
Look.
Hand, hand.
Yes.
Yes.
Yes, I see.
T can see!
You see everything?
More clearly than I ever saw before.
Oh.
I am frightened by what I see.
I have harnessed it, harnessed it.
It's mine at last.
You have work to do that will take you all your life.
Tomorrow I leave for Paris.
No.
No, stay here and work.
I must go, mother.
You will find tragedy there.
I know.
In case I do find tragedy,
I leave my secret with you.
It is all there.
More power than man has ever possessed.
Power to heal, power to destroy.
Guard it for me.
Don't be afraid, my dear.
You will be all right.
= I'm not afraid.
= that is fine.
Load it, please.
I'm Dr. janos rukh.
Come, please.
Baby, baby.
Can you see me?
Yes, mommy, I can see you.
Oh!
My baby.
Where does one find Dr. benet?
I am janos rukh.
= janos rukh?
Dr. benet is in his laboratory.
I will show you there immediately.
Now you must go, make way for the others.
Prepare the next patient.
Thank you.
My baby can see.
My baby can see.
- Yes, mommy, I can see.
- Oh, baby, baby.
= rukh.
I seem to have arrived at an interesting moment.
You have arrived to see what your discovery has done for this little one.
She was blind.
It has made her see.
Thank you.
Oh, thank you.
Thank you, doctor, thank you.
= that's all for now.
It seems, as usual, I am a little late.
No, all Paris is waiting to pile honors on you.
You know, of course, the nobel prize was awarded to you.
Yes, yes, I know, I know.
Everybody considers you and sir Frances Stevens very generous men.
I wondered about your health.
= the counteractive is still effective.
And Diana?
Oh, she is well.
She has become lady Arabella's secretary.
She and Drake plan to marry, of course?
They are in love, but she declares she will do nothing until she hears from you.
She will hear of me, shortly.
I will not stand in the way of their happiness.
This is very fine of you, rukh.
Well, I must leave you to your ministrations.
You see, I was right, rukh.
Your discovery is too great for one man to control.
Some day you will realize that you haven't even scratched the possibilities of radium x.
And I am still the only man to control it fully.
Yes, you'll do.
Same height, same width.
What do I want?
I want to do you a benefit.
Yes.
The greatest benefit one man can do another.
Those who have never seen the moonlight over the African veldt have missed a thrilling vision which can be witnessed in no other land.
A lion caught in the Thorn bush and...
Milady.
Briggs, you have been instructed never to interrupt me when I am at dictation.
- But the paper, milady.
- The papers?
You know I never read them.
This is important.
Oh, very well.
What is it?
With all my worldly goods I thee endow.
With all my worldly goods I thee endow.
Whom god hath joined together, let no man put asunder.
- Goodbye, dear.
- Goodbye, darling.
- Ronnie, dear.
- Goodbye, dear.
I'm sure you'll both be very, very happy.
- Bon voyage.
- Goodbye, my boy.
Goodbye.
Six.
Six of us.
Are you the manager? = yes.
Have you a room vacant?
A front room? - A room?
Providentially, sir, I have.
Step this way, sir.
It's Mrs. legrand, sir, I'm
British to the backbone, though misfortunes and a French husband has brought me to Paris lodgings.
You'll like the room.
It's a lovely fireplace and it don't smoke, and the bed is excellent.
Me poor husband, he died in it so comfortable.
= I'll take the room.
And I'd like the Paris herald every morning.
Yes, sir.
That will be 50 francs a week, sir.
Oh, oh.
Thank you, sir.
Sir Francis Stevens, thief.
Have you ever seen anyone so incredibly happy as Diana and Ronald when they started on their honeymoon?
I hope they will be happy.
We should be late if
Francis doesn't hurry.
Go to sir Francis' room and tell him
Dr. benet and I are waiting.
Poor dear.
When he came from his lecture tonight at the university, he was so utterly exhausted that I told him to lie down.
He is feeling better since we returned from Africa?
Oh, yes.
He has even forgotten to complain about his ankles.
What's that?
Celeste, Celeste.
Speak, you fool.
What is it?
Dr. benet, come up please, at once.
- Pierre.
- Sir Francis.
Sir Francis!
= oh!
Oh.
This is awful.
Look at his eyes.
What hideous thing did he see, do you think?
The police must be sent for at once.
But before they come,
I would like to try an experiment.
It must be done before the eye tissues glaze.
Yes.
= is there an ultraviolet camera here?
Yes, I'll get it for you.
Please.
Rukh.
I knew it.
In New York, in Rome.
= come in.
Good morning, sir.
Good morning, Mrs. legrand.
Oh, there's more excitement.
Yes.
What has happened across the street?
Vandals, sir.
They come in the night and they smashed the entire one of them figures.
They didn't leave nothing but a little pile of melted stuff.
But that's impossible.
That's what everybody says.
But a fact's a fact, sir.
If you'll excuse me, sir,
I'll just pop across and see what the latest is.
Yes, Mrs. legrand.
Do come back and tell me more.
Well, I'll find out, sir.
I won't be a second,
I'll find out all I can.
Lady Stevens, matchmaker.
= radium x claims third victim.
Paris edition of the New York herald.
Radium x claims third victim.
Radium x claims third victim.
Radium x claims third victim.
Radium x claims third victim.
No, please.
It will be better, I think, if you take Diana away.
I will answer any questions.
We'll be downstairs if you do need us.
Now I will explain why I insisted the medical examiner and his assistants wear insulated gloves when they touch the body.
Will you turn out the lights?
Look closely at the neck of the victim.
Lights, please.
You observe those finger marks cannot be seen in the light.
It is phosphorus, possibly?
No.
Radium x.
Inflicted by the grasp of someone contaminated by the poison.
Do you know such a person?
Only one, he is dead.
But there is a story behind all this.
And I am going to ask you to listen to some facts.
= there's some curse.
Diana, my dear, there are no such things as curses.
Well, they needn't look any farther for the murderer.
Here she is. - Stop it!
I won't let you talk like that.
If I hadn't left him, they would all be alive today.
Janos, sir Francis and Arabella.
Stop it.
We loved each other.
We belong to each other.
You never belonged to him.
And no law of nature or man can make it anything but right for us to have done what we did.
He shan't reach out of his grave and spoil our lives.
I'll fight it.
But what are you going to fight?
Something you can't see?
Something you can't reach?
Something you can't touch?
Oh, darling.
Hold me tight.
We're going to need each other so very much.
Yes, I have feared something like this ever since the day he left my laboratory.
And I always doubted his death.
So now you know all I have to tell you.
You believe that the man who was buried as Dr. rukh was not Dr. rukh?
Yes.
I believe that rukh is alive and in Paris.
I believe that this city is at the mercy of a madman whose body is an engine of destruction.
I talked to his mother on the telephone a little while ago, and it is also her belief that rukh is alive.
We will take immediate steps to locate him.
Gentlemen.
A figure melted while a crowd of people watched.
Only one element on earth could have done it.
Diana and I were married at that church, and there were six of us in Africa.
Do you suppose rukh's crazy brain drew some analogy between that fact, and the six figures of the saints on the church?
He killed two of us and destroyed two of the six figures.
= a man and a woman in each case.
You and your wife must go into seclusion immediately.
Also you, Dr. benet, while we comb Paris for this madman.
It might be simpler to get him to come here.
How do you propose this?
Ask him for dinner?
No, not quite.
But that's the general idea.
Let the newspapers give out a story that the three remaining survivors of our African expedition are leaving Paris immediately for an unknown destination.
But before departing, there will be a meeting here.
What sort of meeting?
Well, what do you think would draw him, doctor?
A lecture concerning my recent experiments with radium x, and a chance to reach you and me.
You are both willing to take such risk?
= of course.
Yes.
I will invite a limited number of scientists, to be admitted by card only.
Do you think it's fair to expose them to the danger?
There are only two people he wants to destroy.
Two, or perhaps three.
My men can check the list of invitations at the gate and maybe capture him there.
Also mingle with your guests.
Exactly.
I will set the hour of midnight for the lecture.
At that time his luminosity will be strong as he will delay taking the counteractive, hoping for a chance to use his deadliness upon Drake and me.
If your men fail to capture him at the gate, and darken the entire house.
His face and hands will appear like, like phosphorus, regardless of any disguise.
And if he touches anyone?
They die.
- Professor lemaire.
- Professor lemaire.
- Professor gothe.
- Professor gothe.
- Dr. benet.
- Professor reinhardt.
A very strange hour for such a meeting, don't you think?
Perhaps.
But radium x is a very strange subject.
Benet has his reasons.
Undoubtedly.
He must have something of importance to show us.
Even the president of our congress is here.
Professor meiklejohn, if I am not mistaken?
Yes, I am meiklejohn.
Who are you, sir?
Jones, of the university of wales.
We met once, but perhaps you don't recall me.
= t think I do.
One meets so many people.
I shall never forget your treatise on radiation, sir.
Oh, you remember that, huh?
No doubt you are on your way to Dr. benet's demonstration.
= it should indeed.
I understand that no one is to be admitted without a card.
Yes.
Oh, that reminds me.
Yes, yes, I've got it.
Forgetful sometimes.
Well, under the circumstances.
= of course.
A nasty night.
Most disagreeable indeed.
I think I've caught a chill.
Napoleon Brandy, sir.
I believe a sip or two would help us on our way.
I suggest that we step in here, out of the rain.
I am not very much on spirits, but considering the night, why.
Dr. Reno. = Dr. Reno.
- Dr. Fergie.
- Dr. Fergie.
- Professor meiklejohn.
- Professor meiklejohn.
All are here, except one name.
To be admitted instantly.
Beaudine, you will stand at the main house switch.
It is to be thrown at exactly 12:00 o'clock.
No stranger has tried to come in, and all invitations are accounted for.
Perhaps he won't come.
He will be here.
Probably he's here now.
Monsieur le president.
Oh, Dr. benet.
If you will be patient for just a few minutes longer,
I will make final adjustments in my laboratory and be ready.
We expected you.
T knew that.
Five thieves.
Two are gone, three are left.
Do you intend to kill us all?
Yes.
I felt it was better to let things alone when you were first poisoned.
I warned you about your brain.
It began to affect my brain almost immediately.
I could feel it coming, crawling for cells.
Aren't there ever moments when you think as you used to think, when you were human?
Not often now, not often.
= and because of that we must die.
No, because you are thieves.
Five thieves, all thieves.
It will be easiest just to shake hands.
It will all be over in a second.
My wife?
In her room with Mrs.
Noyer, as you desired.
But she's nervous, sir.
So am I.
Still, it will soon be over, one way or the other.
Yes, sir.
One way or the other.
I know something awful has happened.
Try to compose yourself, madame.
I can't stand this any longer.
Find Mr. Drake and tell him I must see him, if only for a moment.
= t was ordered to remain here.
Oh, please go.
Oh, as you say, madame.
Madame rukh.
It's good of you to come.
It's my duty to be here.
Where is Diana?
Oh, she's upstairs in her room.
= Ronnie.
Ronnie!
= Diana.
= janos!
Strange Dr. benet doesn't return, don't you think?
Yes, very strange.
Dr. benet?
Dr. benet!
He isn't here.
Yes, he is.
And so is rukh.
Don't go any closer!
Max, Louie, the front stairs.
No, I can't kill you, I can't.
But he must die.
No, janos!
Mother.
No.
= t must have time.
I must go on to reach one more.
Drake.
= don't fire.
My son.
You have broken the first law of science.
Yes, you are right.
It's better this way.
Goodbye, mother.
Dianal
Diana.
My darling, you're safe.
Madame rukh, permit me to pay you my homage.
Janos rukh is dead, but part of him will go on eternally working for humanity.
